Outside the tent
Under the tent
Leah Aden with friends
and friends
friend
The Lauder table
the Honorable Dana Winslow
and Mykola Alyskewycz
UALC board member
UALC board
UALC board member
UALC board
UALC board member
UALC board member
UALC board member
Fujiko Nakaya's "Veil" envelops the Glass House.
Procession over the eyebrow bridge on way to Painting Gallery
Margaret Russell in the Sculpture Gallery
Co-chairs Jean Shafiroff
Grammy‐Award winning artist
Children's Right honoree Shaffer "Ne‐Yo" Smith with former foster youth Crystal Bentley
Chairman of Children's Rights Board of Directors Alan Myers
host of the benefit
Children's Rights Honoree
Kasseem "Swizz Beatz" Dean with Rocco Bray
Children's Rights Honoree
Children's Rights Interim Executive Director
The Society of Memorial Sloan Kettering’s Associates Committee's annual Fall Party at the Four Seasons Restaurant.
and Eugénie Anglès
Baroness Didi d'Anglejan
Eugénie Anglès
Eugénie Anglès
Didi d'Anglejan
Charlie poses with his book
Charlie giving his lively talk to a rapt audience
Didi d'Anglejan
Eugénie Anglès
Charlie signing his book
François Delattre
AFB Eugénie Anglès
Baroness Didi d'Anglejan
Eugénie Anglès
French consul Bertrand Lortholary
François Delattre
The scene at Michael's 25th anniversary celebration.
Lifeline New York Board members
friend
ZZ Top's Billy Gibbons
Blues Traveler's John Popper
Warren Haynes of the Allman Brothers
Martin Sorrell being interviewed about his life
career by PBS host Charlie Rose
Martin Sorrell with Israel's Consul in New York
family with Eddie Redmayne
Bryan R. Murphy with his wife Brooke Baran
ANDRUS Vice of Community-Based Programs Kerron Norman with Bradley
guest
Barbara Baran with ANDRUS Vice of Human Resources
The scene at Ovarian Cancer Research Fund's 20th Anniversary Legends Gala
hosted by Harry Connick Jr.
Kelly Rutherford with friends
Carter Burden Center for the Aging Executive Director William J. Dionne
Carter Burden Center for the Aging Board of Directors: Margaret Smith
NYC Department for the Aging;
NYC Department for the Aging
Vice Corporate Communication Employee Volunteerism at Macy's
Carter Burden Center for the Aging Senior Participants: Jenny Rodriguez
The Horticultural Society of New York's 21st Annual Fall Luncheon the Metropolitan Club.
Click to order “Barefoot to Billionaire: Reflections on a Life’s Work
a Promise to Cure Cancer."
HRH Prince Abdulaziz bin Talal bin Abdulaziz Al-Saud
HH Princess Sora bint Saud
Storefront Academy First Grade students
SAH Student s
friends
and Falkenbergs and
friends
friend
friend
Kathleen Giordano as Tippi from Hitchcock's "The Birds"
Virginia Silver with BBRF
The scene in the Wade Thompson Drill Hall of the Park Avenue Armory for Park Avenue Armory's 2014 Gala Masquerade.
Guests gathering at their places for the dinner at the Park Avenue Armory Gala.
Peter Sellars in conversation
Peter Sellars camera ready
friend
Martha Glass at The Society of Memorial Sloan Kettering's 26th Annual Preview Party for The International Fine Art
friend
Ernest de la Torre
Ginna le Vine
Sold out NY City Center for Career Transition for Dancers 29th Jubilee.
James Earl Jones presented Angela Lansbury with the ROLEX Dance Award
Chuck Scarborough welcomes Chita Rivera
Sotheby's Hugh Hildesley helped garner over $140
000 from bidders
Tony Waag's American Tap Dance Foundation
Dance Theater of Harlem performs Popcorn from Return
World Premiere of New York Church of Mambo choreographed by Alex Sanchez
American Ballet Theatre's Veronika Part
Blaine Hoven in the pas de deux from Seven Sonatas
The brilliant Michael ski
Karen Ziemba &amp
The Rockettes Alumni in I want to be a Rockette
Samba by Silva Dance Company
Michael ski
honoree Joe Tremaine
Prima ballerina Cynthia Gregory
The dance pros take the floor ...
Ballet Hispanico rocked the party
friends
Rainbow Room - from upper balcony
Martini man
Thelma Golden with Honoree David Adjaye
Colette Arredondo with John Soane figure
A happy gala guest on departure
Dinner on the promenade of the David Koch Theater at the American Ballet Theatre's annual Opening Night Fall Gala benefit.
The table decor
‘Timeless Hollywood icon' with a twist ...
friends
children
Buddy from The Jim Henson Company's Dinosaur Train
Mini member with his Family Party backpack
Museum members Mark
family
Weaving the Wild
daughter
children
children
family
son
Trustee Roberto Mignone with their children
Committee Member Dana Wallach Jones with Chairmen Amy Griffin
their children
children
Clyde Peeling's Reptiland
Visitors get up close to a giant squid
Visitors got to see a climbable model of a Hercules beetle from the Museum's upcoming Spring 2015 exhibition Life at the Limits
Cozy's Cuts for Kids
Bottom row: Copland House Board Fred Pack
Gala Susan Geffen. Middle: pianist
composer Daniel Brewbaker
Lidia Bastianich addresses the crowd
The Music from Copland House ensemble performing
The room at Del Posto
Lidia Bastianich overseeing her kitchen
after Rossini
Kate McClure with Patrick
Robert &amp
New York City Council Member Daniel R. Garodnick receiving the Community Services Award from the Executive Director of James Lenox House
honoree Ted Moudis
Executive Director of James Lenox
recipient of Lifetime Achievement Award;
of Carnegie East House Board of Directors
Senior Vice of Corporate Services
Executive Director of James Lenox House
with Terence Campo
Marketing Director of Carnegie East House
and Alyssa Moudis
Dinner in the West Gallery at the Frick Collection's annual Autumn dinner.
The tablescape in the West Gallery
Dinner in the Oval Room
Dinner in the East Gallery
the evening's honoree Barbara Fleischman
Frick Associate Curator of Decorative Arts Charlotte Vignon
Frick Associate Director of Media Relations
Frick Manager of Media Relations
Frick Deputy Director of External Affairs Tia Chapman
Frick Deputy Director of External Affairs Tia Chapman
Frick Associate Curator of Decorative Arts Charlotte Vignon
Prince Dmitri of Yugoslavia
Prince Dmitri of Yugoslavia
Prince Dmitri of Yugoslavia
Susan Jackson at "Safe hood Initiative: Protecting the s of New York
Liev Schreiber with children Samuel Kai Schreiber
ara DiPasquale
Liev Schreiber in the batting cages
Naomi Watts with sons Samuel Kai Schreiber
Guests attend the 25th Anniversary of Light Up A Life benefiting the NewYork-Presbyterian Komansky Center for Children's Health
Swifty's Cafe
the Potterton Group
Robert Matheson squires his grand
her favorite dachshund
across the porch to receive guests for an event for friends
family to learn more about the work of leading national nonprofit Compassion &amp
recipient of the Health Care Leadership Award
with his wife
recipients of the Distinguished Community Service Award
Paul E. Francis about to receive the Special Tribute from Jim Tallon
Princess of Ethiopia
Liz Derring viewing auction items
USO performing
Ruth told her guests: "I watched both of my late husbands have terribly painful
drawn-out deaths because they didn't plan ahead by naming resolute healthcare proxies
completing comprehensive advance directives. They hadn't spoken to their families about their own deeply held end-of-life values
shared what truly living meant to them. I hope each of you — including my own children
grandchildren — gathered here will not make the same mistakes. Life for me is more than just existing
I don't want to be here if I can't truly enjoy all of it — especially dancing!"
Leilani Brenner chat with Compassion &amp
his guest Phoebe visiting for the season from England -
Leilani Brenner discuss the lively debate currently in process in the House of s on an "Assisted Dying" bill modeled after the Oregon Death With Dignity Act. Phoebe shared that Carey
the recently retired Archbishop of Canterbury
Archbishop Emeritus Desmond Tutu both support the assisted-dying legislation. The iconic roof of the Chinese Tea House folly at neighboring Marble House rises above the hedge in the background.
chief program officer of Compassion &amp
discusses death-with-dignity legal strategy with Ronald Lee Fleming
his wife
visiting from Maryland.
Ruth Buchanan chats on her porch with Carolyn du Pont
a life-long friend of her daughter Bonnie Matheson from their Holton-Arms days.
Lila Ohrstrom confers with Diana Bunting on plans to host an event for Compassion &amp
Choices at Diana's home in The Plains
this fall.
Ron Fleming discussing the end of life choice movement
Hostess Ruth Buchanan listens to Compassion &amp
Choices' Chief Program Officer Mickey MacIntyre's response after sharing her story of the grueling end-of-life experiences of two of her late husbands with Brown University Art History
longtime Compassion &amp
Choices friend Anne Schultz
Patricia Norton-Kidder of the Newport Hospital Advisory Committee
new friend
donor social-scene
Newport social-scene fixture Leith Adams. Mickey shared the range of legal options terminally ill people have to control the manner
timing of their deaths. He suggested anyone who wanted more information could call Compassion &amp
Choices' free end-of-life consultation program at: 800-247-7421.
Bonnie shared how she came to learn about Compassion &amp
Choices from her
her experiences with her difficult end of life experiences with her 's late husbands.
Compassion &amp
Choices' CPO Mickey MacIntyre tells about the organization's aggressive push to have active Death with Dignity Campaigns in 20 states by the year 2020.
Guests learn about Compassion &amp
Choices End of Life Consultation work
individuals families
their families to share information on how to take charge of ones dying process
effect a peaceful death on ones own terms. Guests also learn about the action plan for making aid in dying a legitimate
open end
accessible end of life option for all Americans as it is currently in Oregon
the largest county in New Mexico.
son George
New York-based artist
longtime family friends Kit Forrestal
Lila Ohrstrom discuss end-of-life planning
Vivian's work on Senator Sheldon Whitehouse's staff as special projects coordinator for aging issues
health policy.
Robert Matheson enjoy longtime family ties.
shares her views on Death with Dignity.
New friend
supporter Nick Brown shares the six words about what death with dignity means to him.
Proudly Emmanuel's oldest parishioner at 93
Natalie Pfanstiehl is a well-known watercolorist who believes in end-of-life choice. She shares her views on Death with Dignity.
rector of Emmanuel Church
husband Steve MacAusland were the hosts at Emmanuel for a screening of Oscar-nominated documentary film The Last Campaign of Booth Gardner.
LPN Mary Miranda shares her views on Death with Dignity.
Compassion &amp
family friend of to Emmanuel parishioners shares his # DWDin6Words.
Jane Dyer shares her views on #DWDin6Words.
June Wing shares her views on Death with Dignity.
Ellie Fish shares her views on Death with Dignity.
Attorney Mercedes Deines shares her views on Death with Dignity.
John French perusing Compassion &amp
Choices materials at Redwood Library &amp
Athenaeum before its screening of How To Die in Oregon.
director of programs
says a few words about Compassion &amp
its work to expand choice
improve care at life's end.
Jared Hughes sets up the Sundance Award Winning film
how it came to be made
speaks about the work of Compassion &amp
Choices which it chronicles.
the site of Carnegie Hall's post-concert dinner to celebrate its 2014-2015 Opening Night Gala.
the Berliner Philharmoniker
the Berliner Philharmoniker
where they held a post-concert dinner
Under theTent on the Weill Roof Terrace
Sanford I. Weill with Congresswoman Carolyn Maloney
Nicola Bulgari with daughters Veronica
Gala Chairman Oscar de la Renta
Sanford I. Weill with Bill Cunningham
Fact vs. Fiction Panelists: Adam Kolker
Cocktails on the terrace of the at The Explorers Club
Guests seated for dinner
The Pink Agenda's seventh annual gala at the IAC Building.
Guests enjoy a special screening of Great White Shark in 3D
Curator in the Division of Paleontology
Guests in the Hall of Biodiversity
Steering committee members Erin
friends
Ruthie Reisner with friends
Steering committee member Carla Franklin
Co-chair Holly Okner
friend
with co-chairs Zachary
Junior Committee of the Alzheimer's Association
Junior Committee of the Alzheimer's Association
Alzheimer's Association
New York City Chapter &amp
Brian Morgan leave with a Medal of Honor book
friend
her guests
Dinner at the "Masked Ball" at Hearst Castle during the sixth annual Hearst Castle Preservation Foundation Benefit Weekend.
Michelle d'Arcambal
Ukiyo-e style woodcut
Edition of 51
Published by Pace Editions
friend
Summoning the guests at the annual Rose Garden Dinner Dance at The New York Botanical Garden.
Entering The New York Botanical Garden's rose collection
and Nina Edwards Anke
friend
The opening number ...
Angela Lansbury with the Gala Honorary Chairs
The scene from above at The Society of Memorial Sloan Kettering’s 26th Annual Preview Party for the International Fine Art &amp
Michael Boodro book signing
Ernest de la Torre
The High Representative of the United Nations Alliance of Civilization
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Around the table
ELEW performing.
ELEW w/ Stacey Shore
Michelle Grayson with a friend
friends
Jeff Koons at the 2014 High Line Art Dinner.
Colin can Lang
Cocktails before dinner
High Line staff
Opening night at the New York Art
Antique &amp
Jewelry Show at the Park Avenue Armory.
The rooftop garden at the Waldorf Astoria where The Horticultural Society of New York's Circle of Friends hosted a private reception
tour.
Sharen Benenson with The Waldorf Astoria's Charlie Romano
The Waldorf Astoria's Executive Chef David Garcelon with The Hort's George Pisegna
Champagne reception before the "tea"
"Tea" in the Grand Ballroom of the Waldorf Astoria Hotel
Gina Rizzo explains Stock the Shelves pledge cards
The Women of Valor with Fr. Francis
Margaret Grioli with Joseph Sano
Karen Murray table
Faith Hope Consolo table
Mt Carmel-Holy Rosary School Violin Ensemble of East Harlem
dean
Board of Trustees
Director of the Jay Monahan Center
Chief Operating Officer at NewYork-Presbyterian/Weill Cornell
of NewYork-Presbyterian Hospital
Director of the Monahan Center;
Director of Surgery at the Jay Monahan Center
former Director of the Jay Monahan Center
Chief Operating Officer at NewYork-Presbyterian/Weill Cornell
of the NewYork-Presbyterian Healthcare System
Surgeon-in-Chief at NewYork-Presbyterian/Weill Cornell
Kevin Babington of Ireland guided the young mare Shorapur to the fastest fault-free jump-off time to claim the $250
presented by Land Rover
in an exciting climax to the 39th Annual Hampton Classic.
Under the VIP tent
her children enjoy the action
of Southampton Mark Epley
Georgina Bloomberg with her son Jasper
friend
The Classic also recognized the best designed tables in its famed VIP tents as selected by HC&amp;G. Honored as winner was the table of Benhamo/Thomas
followed by those of English Country Antiques
the Crown Family.
guest
James Breese home 'The Orchard' now known as Whitefield
The Music Room at Whitefield
Cocktails on the great lawn
Co-authors Gary Lawrance
Kilkare from the beach.
Margaret Thornton with Sheikh Shakhboot Bin Nahyan Al Nahyan
Margaret Thornton with Olivier Cheng waitstaff
Charleston Coolers at the ready
Ava Safir guarding the books
Sasha Cutter arrive
John Eastman arrives
Guests on the terrace
The Baum family
chair of Long Island Women’s Philanthropy
with her husband Steven
chairs
chair
Long Island region with his wife
UJA-Federation's 24th Annual Summerfest
Susan Claster presents the Robert S. Boas Award to Todd Richman
chairs
The Perlman Music Program Class of 2014
Toby Perlman addresses the crowd
Catherine Cho perform with PMP Chorus
guests
friend
Marc d'Hubert
Co-chairs Eaddo Kiernan
Abby Self with Cara Darden
conversation ...
Kelly Rutherford with Wendy Murphy
her littlest fan
Scott Rothkopf at Weantinoge Heritage Land Trust's 2014 Midsummer Party Benefit.
Shopping at UJA-Federation's Hamptons Trunk Show
tenor Josh Dennis
soprano Corinne Winters
tenor Paul Groves
tenor Alek Shrader
composer Huang Ruo
Connie Girard-diCarlo
Management &amp
Francis Pierrel &amp
of LACOSTE North America
LPGA pro
former US Open champion
Director of Sports
Management &amp
Director of Sports
LPGA pro
former US Open champion
Scholarship recipient
&amp
of LACOSTE North America
Director of Sports
Management &amp
Scholarship recipient
LPGA pro
former US Open champion
Under the tent at East Hampton Library's 10th Annual Authors Night.
Author Richard Ravitch makes it official
Author Nelson DeMille with Library Director Dennis Fabiszak
Waiting in line to get their books signed ...
Dick Cavett having some fun with his book
James McBride signing his book The Good Bird
Author Mary Emmerling with author Jennifer Esposito
Robert Caro ready to sign some books
Sen. Rand Paul chatting with Alexandra Howard
Author Joe Pintauro with Tovah Feldshuh
Getting the shot....
Booklovers with their score
Children's Health Fund Moblie Unit
The Jaguar F-Type convertible
Julianne Moore with daughter Liv Freundlich
The participating chefs of A Hamptons Happening
Paul Winter on saxophone
Philippe Petit on high wire at LongHouse Reserve
The scene at Kidsfest Hamptons to benefit Free Arts NYC.
family
family
family
daughter
family
family
Christina deForest Keys
Under the tent for the Southampton Hospital's 56th Annual Summer Party.
Some of the artist-designed surfboards
Emcee Chuck Scarborough welcomed the guests
Guests danced to the music of the Alex Donner Orchestra
performers on stage at "One Thousand Nights
Graziano d
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Meredith &amp
Meredith &amp
AnnaKelly &amp
Guy Davis of Holland &amp
Donald &amp
Fernanda Kellogg &amp
Michael &amp
Brandi &amp
Selina van der Geest
A scene from the Collector Car Parade
Beth Chaves on Tully
Ashley Adams on Lup the Loop
riding Gloria
Craig Callen's Welcome Shadow
winner of the Preliminary Horse Division
Tony of Champagne Paul Goerg
this year's honorees
Millbrook Hunt Hounds with Honorees
Peter &amp
Lulu &amp
Spencer Moore with Winnie
Anne Zevmer demonstrates DuBarry of Ireland waterproof boots
his
Roberto Rivas measures Darren Henault for boots at LaMondial Custom Boots
Texas belle
The Madd Hatter herself
her daughters
One of 50 shops in the Fitch's Market
Vallerino Saltonstall shoes
Connor Thomes in Fairchild Baldwin shop
Patricia's Presents shop
The Super Saturday scene.
Michelle Smith with Sophia Oshrin
guest
A huge fluffy white event tent welcomed the 650 guests
IYRS Terry Nathan Welcomes a Record Crowd to the Schools Annual Summer Gala
Under the tent for the IYRS Gala dinner
Sotheby's Auctioneer Hugh Hildesley leading the Live Auction
Lyle Lovett tweeted after the performance
Thank you for having the band
me. We had a great time with you all ...
Tesa Van Munching both Gala co-chairs
Chairman of the Board Joe Dockery
Greg Oram Loriana De Crescenzo Director of Philanthropy for IYRS
IYRS supporter
NYYC member Lauretta Bruno
Betty Easton flanked by festive Gala guests
Vice Chairman of IYRS Chuck Townsend with wife Jill
friends cheer IYRS
The silent auction table
their son Henry
guitars
accordions give
more give Poor Old Shine their unique sound
Max Shakun joins the audience
her husband Geoff
Poor Old Shine on the Jay Veranda: Harrison Goodale
JHC Board members Bob Garry
Jim Kelsey with friends
family
friends
Suzanne Clary with David Vecsey
his wife Joelle
Poor Old Shine's Antonio Alcorn
his family
Dancing to Ophelia at the end of the night
winner of $250
at the Hampton Classic Horse Show.
Stables table
Feffer Family table.
winner of $250
Mark Kate Olsen in the grandstand
Inside the Grand Prix tent
grandson Jasper
children
son
Owner of Campbell stables Bobby Campbell
wife Barbara Campbell
wife Annette
Dancing on the grounds of the LongHouse Reserve at its WHITE HOT + Blue 2 summer benefit.
Pre-dinner under the tent
The showhouse grounds
The Showhouse designers
The sun sets on Beechnut Hill Farm for Acria's Cocktails at Sunset.
Xavier Vey conducting the ball toss
The drinks
The buffet
The crowd
Komen Greater NYC Young Professionals Committee's Pink Rocks the Rock at The Rink Bar in Rockefeller Center.
Komen Greater NYC Young Professionals Committee members
friends
Komen Greater NYC Young Professionals Committee founder Sandra Kozlowski
founding member Dawn Reinholtz
his Korn Ferry colleagues
Komen Greater NYC Linda Tantawi with Sandra Kozlowski
friends
Lauren Klayman with friends
Young Professionals Committee Founding Advisory Board member Pablo Ogarrio
Young Professionals Committee Founding Advisory Board member Dawn Reinhotz
friends
friends
friend
Models showcasing Nicole Miller's Spring/Summer 2014 collection
The Mashomack Polo Club hosted the 17th Annual Mashomack International Polo Challenge &amp
Dancers at Bellevue House
Audience watching an aquatic ballet
One of two Winged Victory statues
Pres. of the Board John LaRocca welcomes guests
Olympian bronze medalist Marissa Castelli
Event Designer/artist John Sawicki
IMC choreographer
daughter Mary Van Pelt
Karen Klopp with Team Italia
Under the tent
sons
Sarah von Maltzahn with children
friends
Pet friendly fan
Cast from Matilda
Cast from Beautiful - The Carole King Musical
Cast from Bullets Over Broadway
Dinner at Parrish Art Museum's Midsummer Party 2014.
Scenes at Parrish Art Museum's Midsummer Party ...
Entertianment on the lawn of the Bayfront home of Alexandra Lebenthal
Madison's Youth of the Year with Henrik Slipsager
Madison's Youth of the Year with Board
Vice Chairman of CTPartners Barry Bregman
The 52nd Annual Swan Ball in Nashville
Tennessee featured Steve Martin
Board of Trustees Claire Knopf presenting Mark Gilbertson with his award
Mark Gilbertson accepts his honor
event Co
party host
Guests mingle on the Wisteria Arbor
Swan Ball decor
The Swan Ball 2014 Swan Award recipient Bunny Williams
The Swan Ball 2014 Honorary Chairman Jane Anderson Dudley chats with guests
son Nico Landrigan
The Swan Ball 2014 Swan Award Recipient Bunny Williams escorted by Benson Sloan IV
and John Riddick
Julie Stadler models Verdura earrings for Laurel Buntin
Brenda Rae judging the annual tailgating contest on Opening Night
Act 2 of Friday's performance of Carmen
Roberto De Biasio in Friday's performance of Carmen
David Barker on Opening Night in the Opera Club
Shelley Jackson at the Company Party following the opening of Don Pasquale
On Saturday evening
guests enjoyed dinner in a private home
Andrew Shore in Saturday's performance of Don Pasquale
The Santa Fe Opera's Chief Conductor Harry Bicket
AIS client speakers Bares family
AIS client speakers Ojo family
Atlanta Falcons Owner Arthur Blank with NY Jets Ellis Lankster
wife Deby Staley
The Russo family
wife Ellen Abrams
auctioneer Patrick Shane O'Neill
AIS client speaker Joel Viera
James Mischka with their "Wedding Celebration."
Duke Merriman at Young New Yorkers for the Philharmonic's annual Summer Benefit.
British Military Adviser to the UN
speaking about The Queen
Teachers who won ESU scholarships to study at Oxford University - Ethan Warner
Shakespeare Competition winners - Ashish Ramachandran
ESU members in millinery
Cocktails on the lawn of Robin
Fred Seegal's East Hampton home
Dinner under the tent
Early Birds &amp
Bookworms author breakfast held at RL with Steven Stolman as guest speaker
Linda Heister with Ralph Lauren sunglasses
with Gala Chairs Rabby
First of Iceland Dorrit Moussaieff
of Iceland
ASF Edward P. Gallagher greets Liv Ullmann
Gala Vice-Chair Joanna Heimbold greets Gala Chairs Kristján
Lena Kaplan with her daughter
The company of One Thrilling Combination performing "One" at The Public Theater's annual Gala.
Original company members of A Chorus Line
Jane Lynch performing "Sing"
Director of One Thrilling Combination Ted Sperling
Gala co-chair Reneé Beaumont
Gala co-chair Lizanne Rosenstein
Bank of America Senior Vice Connie Verducci
A special screening of the Museum's Space Show Dark Universe
Co-chairs Iain
co-chair Lori Pomerantz
friend
friends
Co-chair Gaelin Rosenwaks
Co-chairs Holly
Marty Okner with Steering committee members Joe
co-chair Jameson McFadden
co-chair Zachary Pomerantz
Steering committee member Jessica Yau
friends
Co-chairs Zachary
friend
Steering Committee members Matt
friends
Leona Clague with friends
artist Lawrence Schiller
Gaby Pacheco accepts the 2014 Women of Distinction Award for Advocacy
Sister Simone Campbell accepts the 2014 Women of Distinction Award for Women_s Empowerment
Chair of YWCA USA Board
presenting YWCA Local Association Excellence Awards
of the Feminist Majority Foundation
with Dara Richardson-Heron
Stacey Meadows with Judge Glenda Hatchett
of the YWCA USA
Chair of YWCA USA Board
middle
with guests of the 2014 Women of Distinction Awards
left
with staff from the YWCA Great Lakes Bay Region
his
who won the 2014 Women of Distinction Award for Military
Veteran's Issues
Cocktails on the Esplanade at the Chicago Botanic Garden Summer Gala.
in Bibhu Mohaptra designed auction dress
Ashley Van Egeren in Bibhu Mohaptra designed gown
Sara Griffen receiving painting from Washburn Oberwager
Cocktails on the Esplanade
The pavilion on the Esplanade
HDesigns created the beautiful setting inside the tent with white peonies
a modern green-and-white palette
The co-chairs of the 2014 Summer Dinner Dance were Peter B. Foreman of Chicago
David R. Casper of Northbrook
Steven J. Gavin of Winnetka.
Summer Dinner Dance co-chairs Jane
David Casper of Northbrook
Summer Dinner Dance co-chairs Cassie
Steven Gavin of Winnetka
Summer Dinner Dance co-chairs Peter
Ginny Foreman of Chicago
Marvin Kocian of Northfield
all of Chicago
Kayla Lubicz of Chicago
Lou Affetto of Park Ridge
Barry Frank of Naples
Jim Glasser of Lake Forest
Ed Teixeira of Glencoe
Stacy Ratner of Highland Park
Jay Henderson of Northfield
Eric Reeves of Chicago
Darrel Hackett of Chicago
Purple Haze performed for the Summer Dinner Dance
the Shivers played while guests danced the night away
Dinner in the pavilion on the Esplanade
The Summer Dinner Dance was on the night of the full moon
The scene at Jay Sugarman
Kelly Behun's Southampton home for the 14th Annual Midsummer Night Drinks benefiting God's Love We Deliver.
friend
Gregory de la Haba
of Patina Restaurant Group
Co- of the Citymeals Board of Directors
Executive Director of Citymeals-on-Wheels
Participating chefs included:
Brasserie Jonathan Benno &amp
SD26 Restaurant &amp
WineBar Daniel Boulud &amp
Aubergine the Restaurant at L’Auberge Carmel Leah Cohen
Pig &amp
Sitka &amp
The Conservatory for American Food Studies Marc Forgione
Commonwealth Clark Frasier &amp
M.C. Spiedo Yuhi Fujinaga &amp
The Sea Grill Luke Holden &amp
Luke's Lobster
Girl &amp
the Goat
Assembly Restaurant &amp
Le Bernardin Charlie Palmer &amp
Payard Patisserie &amp
Cafe SFA at Saks Fifth Avenue Ted Rozzi
The Regency Bar &amp
Grill at Loews Regency Hotel Joachim Splichal
Telepan &amp
ink. Jean-Georges Vongerichten
Barbuto Jennifer Yee &amp
Lafayette Grand Café &amp
Father’s Office
Soy Sauce from Chef Nobu Matsuhisa
Raclette andCheeze Whiz
and Mini Baguetteand from Chef Richard Diamonte
Robiolina from
Jalapeando from Chef Craig Koketsu
a Citymeals-on-Wheels Board Member
Citymeals-on-Wheels Board Member
Co- of the Citymeals Board of Directors
Citymeals-on-Wheels Board Member
Citymeals-on-Wheels Board Member
of Citymeals Young Professionals Committee
Cocktail hour under the tent
Cocktails at the 31st Annual Calvary Hospital Awards Gala.
Melissa Errico performing
The after party at the Apollo Theater's annual Spring Gala.
Savion Glover with Doug E Fresh on beatbox
friends
BNY guest
BNY guest
Apollo board chairman Richard Parsons with a friend
friends
friends
Jonelle Procope with a friend
friends
friends
friends
friend
friend
friends
friends
friends
friend
friends
Alfred Liggins with a friend
friends
Briana Bigham with friends
friends
The scene at The Glass House Summer Party
Wynn Burson and Grazia D'Annunzio
Natalie deCleve
Picnicing inside Donald Judd's first concrete work
Cocktails at 583 Park
The tables set for dinner
of The Municipal Art Society
Chair of the MAS Board of Directors
2014 Jacqueline Kennedy Onassis Medal honoree
&amp
2014 Jacqueline Kennedy Onassis Medal honoree
Principal at SHoP Architects;
founding partner of SHoP Architects
MAS board member
MAS board member
wife Vivian Selbo with Peter Marren
his wife Margaret Newman
NYC Council member
U.S. Court of Appeals Judge Dennis Jacobs
Great Granddaughter of Cass Gilbert
U.S. Court of Appeals Judge Dennis Jacobs
&amp
Senior Architect &amp
The Couture Council of The Museum at FIT hosted a conversation
lunch for 75 Couture Council members
Board members with Zac Posen at Doubles.
actors Victor Garber
of
of the Alzheimer's Association
actor David Hyde Pierce
who emceed the event
of
of the Alzheimer's Association
Alzheimer's Association
of Board of Directors
Alzheimer's Association
Greg Johnson of EmblemHealth
Greg Johnson of EmblemHealth
Leader of PwC Health
Live auction led by Jamie Niven
Items from the silent auction
Leader of PwC Health
Prince Amukamara of the New York Giants
wife Pilar Amukamara
of
of the Alzheimer's Association New York City Chapter
actors Victor Garber
who emceed the event
Prince Amukamara of the New York Giants
wife Pilar Amukamara
honoree Dominic Chianese
of
of the Alzheimer's Association
Alzheimer's Association
Michael Breed leads a group golf clinic
George Fox presents Donald Jonas with a commemorative gift
Connecticut National Guard who presented the Colors
Assemblyman Michael Montessano with trustees Abby O'Neill
Community Foundation of Oyster Bay's
Anita Salembier with her son
Bob Lindsay with trustee Christie McNicol
her husband Paul
Chris Hogg with trustee Liz Feldman
her son
her husband Frank
trustee Abby O'Neill
Community Foundation of Oyster Bay past Trustee
Trustee Betsy Cochrane with her husband James
Stephanie zu Guttenberg
The cocktail reception
Corporate Impact honoree Pfizer's Patti Jewel
Nicole Shaffer with Komen Greater NYC Linda Tantawi
Physician of Impact honoree Jose Baselga
PhD with Komen Greater NYC Board member
Community Impact &amp
Innovation honoree God's Love We Deliver
represented by &amp
with presenter
God's Love board member Tamara Tunie
Surviving with Impact honoree Amy Robach receives her award from host
colleague Josh
friend Josh Elliott
Amy Robach accepts the Surviving with Impact Award
honorees Amy Robach
Pfizer's Nicole Shaffer
guest
Animal Care &amp
Control of NYC trailer outside The National Arts Club
Walking the red carpet ...
Kevin de l'Aigle
Kevin de l'Aigle
Kevin de l'Aigle
and Anthony Rubio
Kevin de l'Aigle
Kevin de l'Aigle
The dance floor at the New York Botanical Garden's annual Conservatory Ball.
Rainy arrivals
The crowd taking it in
"All you need is Love" finale
Les Crystal interviews Tanenbaum Media Bridge-Builder honoree Charlie Rose
Steve Resnick presents The Adam Solomon Award for Excellence to Erin Boyaijian
Tanenbaum Founder &amp
Tanenbaum Peacemaker in Action Ephraim Isaac
guest
guests
Esra Munnell and Jack Ovadia
The dinner scene at New York Restoration Project's 13th Annual Spring Picnic.
Under the tent for dinner
Grant National Memorial in Riverside Park lit up for the occasion
friend
Maggie Gyllenhaal reading Anna Karenina
the Janus Prize
presented by The Folio Society
Chris Giarmo performing "In the Gloaming"
Brian d'Arcy James
Brian d’Arcy James
Abe Goldfarb aka Bastard Keith
The scene at The Frick Collection's Spring Garden Party
Sprezzatura: A Celebration of Italian Renaissance Poetry
Parmigianino's Schiava Turca.
Chairman of the Frick Board of Trustees Margot Bogert
Bill Cunningham shooting Neil Totton
Jazz Band "The Flail" performing in the Garden
Blue Quail Wine provided the wine
Frick Associate Director of Media Relations
Frick Deputy Director of External Affairs Tia Chapman
Frick Associate Curator of Decorative Arts Charlotte Vignon
Frick Director of the Center for the History of Collecting Inge Reist
Frick Head of Human Resources Dana Winfield
Chairman of Frick's Board of Trustees Margot Bogert
Frick Manager of Media Relations
Guests in the Garden Court
Frick Associate Director of Media Relations
guest
Zoe Hoare at ARF's 4th Annual Designer Showhouse.
Table settings
Nicole diCocco
ands Christine Biddle.
ands Christine Biddle.
ands Christine Biddle.
Fulbright grantee Nilofar Varzgani
Fulbright grantee Riccardo Vittoria
Fulbright grantee Vincent Ogutu
Hugh Hogan Bill deBlasio
Priscilla Gonzalez accepts the Frederick Douglass Award on behalf of Communities United for Police Reform
Michael Waldman presents the North Star Award to Gail Furman
Katrina vandenHeuvel
Board member Alvarez Symonette
Brooklyn Food Coalition Kady Ferguson leads the conga line
El Museo del Barrio's annual Gala at Cipriani 42nd Street.
Ross Award Winners from Salve Regina University
Board of Directors Honoree Jacob Collins
Post concert at Redeye Grill
friends
friends
Thomas Robert at the 13th Annual Women Who Care Luncheon benefitting United Cerebral Palsy of NYC.
Richard Edelman with Laure M. Tisch
Emcee reporter
WNBC reporter
the night's honoree with Board
Let's Get Ready Students
Executive Director of Let's Get Ready Lauri Novick
and founder of Let's Get Ready
Linnae Boyer amd Dan Schneider
Cocktails at The Metropolitan Club for The Animal Medical Center's Sixth Annual Living Legends Luncheon.
Princess Firyal of Jordan
AMC's
Snoot donor
AMC donor
AMC Trustee with Paul Greene
AMC's CFO
Living Legend Luncheon co-chair
Living Legend Luncheon Eva Usdan with Carly Bloom
Chief Medical Officer of The AMC
friend
and Elise Gold
Jonathan deVeer
Elizabeth deVeer
Kurpis deVeer
Kipp deVeer
Colleen deVeer
Music by JUS SKE
Dinner in the Milstein Hall of Ocean Life
The after-party
Ionela Thomas dancing
Kipp deVeer
Jessica Cosmus with friends
Laughter during Seth Meyer's performance
Prince Dmitri of Yugoslavia
The Dankner family
Marianne Howatson with a friend
Under the tent at the 29th Mount Sinai Crystal Party.
The beautifully decorated tent at the Central Park Conservatory Garden
Boards of Trustees
Mount Sinai St. Luke's
Church of the Intercession
Church interior
of Citi
his wife
one of the evening's chairwomen
The three princes: Shadrach
The cast performing Benjamin Britten's one hour long opera "The Burning Fiery Furnace"
The Cast in procession
who designed the costumes
Model Alva Chinn in vintage Stephen Burrows
Christophe deMenil
Band leader
who is Jerry Lee Lewis' son
violin De
piano
members of his family
On the Promenade of the David H. Koch Theater
Aaron Lazar performing an excerpt from Carousel
NYCB Ballet Master in Chief Peter Martins with former NYCB Principal Dancers Jacques d'Amboise
Event chairmen Earle
NYCB Chairman of the Board Jay Fishman
his wife Randy
designer Prabal Gurung
Juan-Carlos Torres of Vacheron Constantin
NYCB Ballet Master in Chief Peter Martins
dean
dean NYU
dean NYU
Consul of France Bertrand Lortholary
Exe. Director Joseph Patuleia with Honorees Elaine Turner
Admiring the bags
with Gala Chairs Rabby
First of Iceland Dorrit Moussaieff
of Iceland
Gala Vice-Chair Joanna Heimbold with Gala Chairs Kristján
Lena Kaplan with her daughter
Dancing to the music of Vince Giordano
the Nighthawks
Rusty Wright at Pratt Institute's Art of Packaging Award Gala.
Tom Meehan with guests
and Dan Dispigna
team at Publicolor's annual benefit
Ruth Shuman with honorees Michael Kaiser
S·ndor Nosz·ly
An incredible lineup of Classic Comedians at the step-and-repeat
Grand Ballroom of the Pierre Hotel
Howard Lorber hosted top names in NYC Real Estate at his table
Friars Club Dean Emeritus Freddie Roman toasts the Club members
families
Gilbert Gottfried telling his version of the famous "Aristocrats" joke
Lunch in the Milstein Hall of Ocean Life for the American Museum of Natural History's 24th annual Spring Environmental Lecture
panelist Armando Valdés-Velásquez
Museum Ellen V. Futter announces the naming of the Coral reef ecosystem after Chair Connie Spahn
panelist Director of the CBC at the Museum Eleanor Sterling
panelist of
Director of the CBC at the Museum Eleanor Sterling
panelist Director of the CBC at the Museum Eleanor Sterling
Chairman of the Museum's Board of Trustees Lewis Bernard
panelist
Director of the CBC at the Museum Eleanor Sterling
Foundation Director Gillian Fuller with Their Royal Highnesses Prince
Princess Karl Friedrich of Hohenzollern
Her Royal Highness The Princess Elizabeth of Bavaria
Dinner in the Cotillion Room
Royal Highness The Princess Sophie of Prussia
Shaikh Khalifa al Khalifa
Cassandra Seidenfeld with Cadets
Family Dynamics Governing Board member Alexandra Alger
Honorary Chair artist Erik Parker
Family Dynamics Art Auction at Site 109
Family Dynamics Governing Board member Derek Schuster
Contributing artist Vadis Turner
SCO Board member Benjamin Bram
Committee member Sharon Zambrelli
Art Auction Committee members Lesley Dryden
Committee member Natasha Prince
Contributing artist Ryan Keeley
Family Dynamics Governing Board member Natasha Prince
of Chicago
of Chicago
of Chicago
Symphony Space's Spring gala
Fiddler at 50
to celebrate the 50th anniversary of Fiddler on the Roof.
The crowd at Tao Downtown
Kamie Lightburn's table
Team Swifty's
Holly Peterson's table
Mary Van Pelt's table
Magic with Christina Rose looking on
City Harvest's 20th annual "Evening of Practical Magic" at Cipriani 42nd Street.
son with Holly Peterson
Questlove with City Harvest Drivers
The dance floor at New Yorkers for Children's Annual Spring Dinner Dance
New Year’s in April
A Fool’s Fete.
friends
Megan del Valle
Special performances by members of the Kips Bay Boys &amp
Baruch College student
former contestant of NBC's "The Voice" Catherine Ochoa
known as Cathia
performs a song
aruch College Mitchel B. Wallerstein
scholarship recipient Danny Acosta
t Flo Anthony
Baruch College benefactors Sam Perelson
his wife Maggie
Drew Fellman with a lemur
The Ninth Annual Opera News Awards in the Grand Ballroom of The Plaza Hotel.
editor in chief of "Opera News
of the Metropolitan Opera Guild
Maestro James Levine reads his tribute to award winner Christa Ludwig
Susan Graham presents award to Christa Ludwig
editor in chief of "Opera News"
of the Metropolitan Opera Guild
authors Peter Miller
Diane de la Bgassire
The Grand Ballroom at The Plaza
decorated by David Monn for Orchestra of St. Luke’s annual Gift of Music gala.
Master of Ceremonies David Hyde Pierce
Principal Conductor Pablo Heras-Casado conducts Orchestra of St. Luke's
Master of Ceremonies David Hyde Pierce
The Slipper Chairs were designed by more than 40 designers from across the country
friend
Kevin Spacey on the red carpet at the Museum of Moving Image's annual gala.
Brandon del Pozo
guests
guests
Jim Jones with Duncan
an Eastern Screech Owl
a Barred Owl
Board of Directors Nina DeNigris
Volunteers for Wildlife Staff: Rachel Neville
The New York Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Children's third annual Spring Luncheon at the Pierre.
Linda Fairstein signing books
Barbara Ehrenreich singing books
friends
guest
Lori Griffiths with a friend
Stephen Covello with a friend
friend
guests
friend
Guests at Authors In Kind
guests
guest
Ballet Hispanico dancers at Ballet Hispanic'os 2014 Spring Gala honoring the Ford Foundation.
Ballet Hispanico dancers ...
100 filled the Grand Ballroom at the Waldorf Astoria to support NewYork-Presbyterian Hospital
Carole King at piano
Craig Smith &amp
of New York-Presbyterian Hospital Robert Kelly
of New York-Presbyterian Hospital Steven J. Corwin
of New York-Presbyterian Hospital Robert Kelly
of New York-Presbyterian Hospital Steven J. Corwin
friend
The scene at the Guggenheim Museum for the 30th Anniversary Gala for Works &amp
Betsy Johnson tote
Publicolor students
The scene at Bendels
Kate Davis entertain the crowd
Pat Cleveland at the premiere of "Dom Hemingway
" hosted by The Cinema Society
Links of London.
Ra˙l Esparza
Dinner at Chez Josephine
An Evening of Chamber Music at Kristy
Jim Clark's Palm Beach home with the Perlman Music Program musicians.
PMP musicians
and Cynthia Reede
The cocktail reception
Robbie Gordy of Christie's leads the Live Auction
with Pamela Healey
Cynthia Fischer with friends
friend
Winter Heat at the Edison Ballroom
Mission Society Youth s
Beat the Odds Rising Stars at the Children’s Defense Fund's annual benefit.
honoree
with Beat the Odds recipients Moke Hein
NYC First Chirlane McCray addresses the crowd
honoree
honoree
honoree
Ali Wentworth runs text to pledge
Vicki Fuller with Geoffrey Canada
emcee
gala
former Michael Bloomberg
former Michael Bloomberg
at Hewlett-Packard Company;
Chairman of the Board of Trustees
at Hewlett-Packard Company;
Chairman of the Board of Trustees
Co-Chief Executive Officer of Deutsche Bank
Purim Ball honoree
Co-Chief Executive Officer of Deutsche Bank
Purim Ball honoree
Partygoers at Purim Ball 2014 Michael Slocum
Partygoers at Purim Ball 2014
Co-Chief Executive Officer of Deutsche Bank
Purim Ball honoree
Co-Chief Executive Officer of Deutsche Bank
Purim Ball honoree
threeASFOUR: Angela Donhauser
threeASFOUR: Angela Donhauser
Andrew &amp
Andrew &amp
Purim Ball 2014 After Party attendees
Purim Ball 2014 After Party attendees
Maggy Frances Schultz with Serge Cajfinger of PAULE KA at Frick Collection's 15th annual Young Fellows Ball.
Guests enjoying the West Gallery
Guests enjoy an impromptu tour of the Living Hall
Steering committee member Jennie Tarr Coyne gives guests an impromptu tour of the Boucher Room
Celestial ambience in the atrium ...
Guests enjoyed champagne provided by Louis Roederer
Organic Spirit by American Harvest
Stag's Leap Wine Cellars KARIA Chardonnay Napa Valley
Pomegranate glazed eggplant on beet chips from Caterer Olivier Cheng
on an illuminated constellation-inspired platter
PAULE KA designer Serge Cajfinger
the Frick's Associate Director of Development Maureen Nash
dressed in PAULE KA
Presentation of champagne provided by Louis Roederer
Guests enjoy the West Gallery
Benefit chairman Melanie Lazenby
dressed in PAULE KA
Benefit committee member Cator Sparks in the Oval Room
Director of The Frick Collection Ian Wardropper
Deputy Director for External Affairs at the Frick
Steering committee member Jennifer Wright
steering committee member Elizabeth Kurpis
steering committee member Amory McAndrew
Benefit committee member Cator Sparks
friends dance in the Frick's Music Room
Kim Le dance in the Frick's Music Room
Guests dance on the dance floor the Frick's Music Room ...
Hal Rubenstein welcomes guests
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
violinist Koenig
accompanist
Augustine Hadelich playing a duet by Moszkowski
Audience with Augustin Hadelich
violinist Koenig
accompanist in foreground
League Chair with Jay DiLorenzo
a sponsor of the event
a sponsor of the event with Robert Koenig
accompanist
violinist Hadelich
violinist
Fielding Dreams Gala cocktail reception held inside the Theodore Roosevelt Rotunda at the American Museum of Natural History
Fielding Dreams Gala dinner held in the Milstein Hall of Ocean Life at the American Museum of Natural History
of The Mount Sinai Hospital
Clinical Director of the Corinne Goldsmith Dickinson Center for Multiple Sclerosis at Mount Sinai
Guests enjoyed dancing to the soulful sound of the Eturnity Band
Daniel Chefs at Burgundy
Blue Jeans: Sunday Supper at Daniel Benefiting Citymeals-On-Wheels.
Jim O'higgins
Cassandra del Viscio
Joe Roberto with BankUnited team
and Sanjeev Handa
Orrin Devinsky addresses the guests at the NYU Langone Medical Center's Finding A Cure for Epilepsy
Department of Pediatrics
Chief of Staff
honoree Edie Windsor
gala co-chair Marcia Riklis
daughter of honorees Klara
Gala co-chair Tami Schneider
gala co-chair Marcia Riklis
Honoree Edie Windsor greets Jessica Lappin
Alliance for Downtown New York
Gala co-chair Morris Offit
his wife
honoree Joan Wachtler
honoree Dominic Chianese
Alzheimer's Association NY Chapter
Jewish Home Lifecare board member
UJA Alisa Robbins off
Escada models
The Associates Committee of The Society of Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Center's 23rd Annual Bunny Hop at 583 Park Avenue.
Big Apple Circus juggler
Face-painting
Face-painting
Balloon-making
Cupcake decorating
children
&amp
family
daughters
their children
son
son
daughter
sons
sons
sons
son
daughter
daughter
son
daughters
The sixteen 2014 Viennese Opera Ball Debutantes on the stairs of the Waldorf with their escort dance partners.
Two Norwegian Fjord horses open the Ball
Opera singers Nathan Van Arsdale
Amy Shoremount-Obra perform an adaptation of Mozart's "The Abduction from the Seraglio"
West Point cadets
Rarely seen in the US
the Schuhplattlers
traditional Austrian folk dancers
show the celebratory style of the countryside
far from Vienna's glittering concert houses
The debutantes
escorts perform a majestically choreographed "human swing"
his wife Irmeli
Included in the Ball's honored guests were a glamorous age-divergent duo: 82-year-old supermodel Carmen Dell'Orefice
19-year-old Teen USA Cassidy Wolf. Between them is Austrian official Andreas Mailath-Pokorny
Councillor for Culture
Science in Vienna
UN luminary Amir Dossal poses with his wife Tas
ORF-TV news personality Hannelore Fauqueux-Veit
Viennese choreographer Heinz Heidenreich
his wife Irmeli with EU Thomas Mayr-Harting
his wife Elisabeth
Former Chief of Protocol Marife Hernandez
her husband
Two dancers from "Dance With Me" studios perform "The Evolution of Ballroom Dancing 1814 to 2014"
Sherrill Milnes waltzes with his wife Maria Zouves
Austrian banker F. Dieter Beintrexler
wife
wife Neline Koornneef-Heindl
West Point cadet with former VOB deb Stephanie Nass
Midnight Quadrille with Andreas Launer
Chiu-ti Jansen
Dinner on the Promenade of the David H. Koch Theater
Rock the Casbah.
Beth deWoody
Anne Hathaway welcomes Jared Leto to the club.
The stars gather at Spago's.
The Annual Vanity Fair Oscar Party in 1992.
Lupita Nyong'o
"One Enchanted Evening: In the Garden
Under the Stars
By the Sea" in the Moore Grand Lawn of The Four Arts Hulitar Sculpture Gardens.
Brian del Toro
Ten Girls on the Isle of Capri
J.C.O. by the Sea
Ina Giscard d'Estaing
The dinner scene at The New York Botanical Garden's annual Orchid Dinner.
" the theme of the 12th Annual Orchid Show at the Garden
served as the creative source for each of the imaginative centerpieces.
Megan Zilis with friends
Executive Director of Main Street Association
of the Board of Trustees
Board of Trustees
Town of Oyster Bay
Board of Trustees
Chairmen of the Director's Council with Susan Henshaw Jones
Director of MCNY
at Museum of the City of New York's Winter Ball.
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
friend
Director of MCNY
her table
Pilar wearing Reem Acra
Apollo Theater's Fourth Annual Dining with the Divas Luncheon.
Dining with the Divas Committee members Michelle Gadsden-Williams
Yolanda Ferrell-Brown with Divas host Tamara Tunie
Committee members Carolyn Mason
Dining with the Divas ...
Lisa-Renee Dumas with a friend
Dining with the Divas co-chairs Michelle Gadsden-Williams
Branding &amp
Owner &amp
senior vice of Corporate marketing Estee Lauder
executive vice
director of corporate programs Esteee Lauder
friends
friend
Jonelle Procope with Divas committee members Rita Jammet
Divas co-chair
with Joyce Newman
Jonelle Procope with Joan Haffenreffer
friend
friends
guests
friend
Young collectors ...
friend
Diane de la Begassiere
Cocktails at The Breakers in Palm Beach for Caron
Cast of "NERDS" performs
Guests watching the performance
circus performer
More clowning around
Stilt walker
R. Scot Evans with Luminary Awards
Dinner guests at The Explorers Club for Empowers Africa's annual gala dinner.
Cocktails at The Explorers Club
Nick Brandt prints
Zita deZagon
The Lake at the Loeb Boathouse
Special guest Hoda Kotb
Special guest Hoda Kotb with Komen Greater NYC Young Professionals Executive Committee Steve Simmons
Guests on the Trading Floor listen to the program
Young Professionals Chair Sandra Kozlowski surrounded by guest
YPC Executive Committee member Dawn Reinholtz
Komen Greater NYC Board member
his fiancée Amy Tremonti
Guests enjoy the after-party
Dancing to DJ Jason Fioto
and Gina and
Special Events Chair at New York Philharmonic's third-annual Chinese New Year Gala.
A traditional Dragon Dance was performed by the Nai-Ni Chen Dance Company on Lincoln Center's Josie Robertson Plaza
the New York Philharmonic
Vocalist Song Zuying in traditional attire
Vocalist Song Zuying in traditional attire
vocalist Song Zuying
vocalist Song Zuying
vocalist Song Zuying
The Komansky Center for Children's Health at NewYork-Presbyterian/Weill Cornell's 4th annual Plates for Pediatrics benefit at the St. Regis
friends at China Arts Foundation's Chinese New Year Celebration.
Pre-luncheon at The Breakers
L. to r.: Lauder opens the luncheon
Alina Cho talks about Evelyn Lauder's legacy
BCRF's work
The Panel: Chairman of BCRF's Scientific Advisory Board Cliffor Hudis
grantees Joan Marks
The Venetian Room at the Breakers during the fashion show put on by Neiman Marcus
Myra Biblowit annouce the winner of the raffle for $30
000 Margot McKinney earrings at close of luncheon
Co-chairman of the luncheon
BCRF &amp
Beth Pine of Neiman Marcus
designer David Meister
friend
BCRF Co-chairman Kinga Lampert
BCRF Co-chairman Leonard Lauder
friend
Don Langdon of Douglas Elliman
wife
Co-Chairman of BCRF
coach of the New England Patriots
Sri Lankan to the U.N.
Maria Sierra with Judy Kuriansky
Jim Luce with Kate Baker
Irene Minkoff at Youth America Grand Prix's "The Making of an Artist."
friend Bernie
friend
Lev Grossman of Time Magazine with wife Sophie Gee
Lev Grossman of Time Magazine with wife Sophie Gee
Madeline Caldwell of Alfred A Knopf
BJ Novak of The Office
author of Absurdistan
Annie Eggers of Alfred A Knopf
Madeline Caldwell of Alfred A Knopf
BJ Novak of The Office
author of Absurdistan
Annie Eggers of Alfred A Knopf
Elissa Schappel of Vanity Fair's Hot Type
author of Cost
author of Devotion Zoe Triska
Elissa Schappel of Vanity Fair's Hot Type
author of Cost
author of Devotion
author of Then She Found Me
author of Angie I Says
husband Mike Wing
author of Then She Found Me
author of Angie I Says
husband Mike Wing
L. to r.: Stella McCartney Blouse
L. to r.: Stella McCartney Blouse
Garrison duP. Lickle
Garrison duP. Lickle
Hayden Hosford Margaret M. n
Margaret M. n
Shabnam Henry at The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center 's Winter Lunch at DANIEL.
and Shabnam Henry
Guests milling about And settling in Celerie Kemble
Quadrille Ball Committee members at the Pierre Hotel for the 54th Annual Quadrille Ball.
Quadrille dancers
Robert Weingarten print
Bidders enjoying the evening
A private cocktail reception to welcome the Randall’s Island Park Alliance Fielding Dreams NYC Gala Honorees.
and Irina Tolstoy
agna Rucewicz
The Heinemann family
Outside the Bohemian National Hall for The New York Ceramics Fair.
Inside the Bohemian National Hall
Oscar de la Renta fashion show ...
Hospice Evening décor by Scott Snyder
Guests at the Milly boutique celebrating the launch of the Friends of Finn T-shirt line to benefit The Humane Society of the United States.
Prince Georg Friedrich of Prussia
Central Park Conservancy's Annual Skating Party at Wollman Rink
Geoffrey Beene National Scholarship winners.
The scene at the Waldorf Astoria for YMA Fashion Scholarship Fund &amp
Geoffrey Beene Foundation's annual benefit dinner
"Venetian Splendor" in the Grand Ballroom at the Mar-a-Lago club
Scientific Advisory Board Co-chair Eric Winer
Gloria Hollis with Gary Greene
4-year-old Bettina Gannon
Shawny Greenstein with David McClymont
Brian Saipe with costumed greeter
Paul T. Lehr with YoungArts Alumni Award Winner Andrew Rannells
2013 Coconuts — 1st row: David Ober
Leonard Lauder. 2nd row: Michael McCarty
A fashion presentation by Gala sponsor
Marie line Grind
Marsee the nurse
Muna Rihani al Nasser
Muna Rihani al Nasser
Ellen Levine addresses the guests at at the Metropolitan Club
Event co-chair Bob Reynolds
Pops conductor Keith Lockhart
co-chair David Long
Chairman of BSO Board of Trustees Ted Kelly
David Long with Ted Kelly in the center
Keith Lockhart conducts while Boston Tom Menino narrates Twas the Night Before Christmas
John Henry leads the Boston Pops
Keith Lockhart unveils the 2013 Red Sox Trophy before John Henry guest conducts the Boston Pops
Kristen Chenoweth with the Boston Pops
Kristen Chenoweth with the Boston Pops
Boston Children's Chorus
Director of Client Engagement Marketing
2013 Volunteer of the Year Award recipient
Assistant Director of Development
2013 Volunteer of the Year Award recipient.
New Jersey resident
wife of fallen Fireman Johnnie Williams
Director of Development
Staten Island resident
wife of fallen Police Officer James Leahy
Glendale resident
wife of fallen Police Officer Ramone Suarez
Queens resident
wife of fallen NYPD Officer Anthony Mosomillo
New York resident
wife of fallen NYPD Officer Kevin Gillespie
Bruce Gelb with his wife Lueza
Youth of the Year Aieyla S.
Luc with
Aieyla with
his wife
his wife Diedre with Youth of the Year Aieyla
Employees of Lenox Advisors
Board of Trustees
Vice-Chairman of CTPartners Barry Bregman
Hugh Hildsley of Sotheby's
Guests in the Zebra Lounge at Jay Heritage Center's Zebra Soiree at American Yacht Club.
Frannie Scaife and Susie Elson
from l. to r.: Jerome Chazen
of Louis Armstrong House Museum
from l. to r.: Honorees Jay Hershenson
presenter George Avakian.
mastermind of several Louis Armstrong albums
presents music legend Quincy Jones with the 'Louie' Award.
New York State Attorney Eric Schneiderman with Donald Marshall
Louis Armstrong House Museum's Marketing Director
his wife Zebra Soiree Elisabeth Casey
his wife Zebra Soiree Elisabeth Casey
welcomes the guests
Law Office of Jeffrey Schwartz
Tony Lo Bianco on stage at the Robert F. Kennedy Center for Justice
Human Rights 2013 Ripple of Hope Awards Dinner.
Gary Parr speaks during dinner
Ban Soon-taek
Muna Rihani al Nasser
Ban Soon-taek
Muna Rihani al Nasser
Ban Soon-taek
Muna Rihani al Nasser
Muna Rihani al Nasser
Ripple of Hope Honorees
of the Robert F. Kennedy Center for Justice
with Stephen Colbert
the evening’s emcee
Stephen Colbert serves as Master of Ceremonies
daughter of Ripple of Hope Honoree Muhammad Yunus
daughter of Ripple of Hope Honoree Muhammad Yunus
Muhammad Yunus accepts the Ripple of Hope Award
Deputy Secretary of the United Nations
Robert F. Kennedy Jr. embraces Ted Kennedy Jr.
Ripple of Hope Award Honoree John Boyer
Ripple of Hope Award honoree John Boyer
Chair of RFK Center Board of Trustees
Gala co-chair Frederic Rich
honorees Betsy Barlow Rogers
Secretary- Ban Ki-moon
Gala co-chair Janet Ross
The restored Council chamber
West Terrace with lights of the Queensboro Bridge in background
Gala co-chair Janet Ross
honoree Betsy Barlow Rogers
League Jay DiLorenzo with honorees
Gala co-chair Janet Ross
honoree Betsy Barlow Rogers
The 18th Annual ACRIA Holiday Dinner in the Stephan Weiss Studio at the Urban Zen Center.
Park Avenue before the 2013 Tree Lighting ceremony
Knickerbocker Grey cadets
Brick Church Children’s Choir
friends on Park Avenue
A rooftop party across from Brick Church
The lit trees on Park Avenue
First Snowball of the night
the New Leash Productions table
McDowell Winn's group at the dessert table
Holly Kinney's table
Courtney Moss' table
friend
The dessert table ...
Music by Bob Merrill
Bruce herlich
Catherine herlich
Julie Macklowe at a holiday cocktail event hosted by La Perla to benefit New Yorkers For Children.
&amp
COO of The Mount Sinai Hospital
Marisa Brown and
The 4th Annual UCP of NYC Santa Project Party
friends
Lenox Hill Neighborhood House's Associates Committee Chairs at its Fall Benefit.
Chair Christopher Spitzmiller with Sam Allen
Emily Leonard with John Sargent
friend
Missey Condie with a friend
Sponsorship by: Valentino
Arpels models
Arpels models
Anne harrison
Anne harrison
HRH Princess Katherine of Serbia
honoree Governor David Paterson
HRH Prince Alexander of Serbia
HRH Princess Katherine of Serbia
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Ambassabor of Cypress Jacovides with Kip Forbes
Madam Yoo Soon-taek
HRH Princess Katherine of Serbia
HRH Prince Alexander of Serbia
HRH Princess Katherine of Serbia
Madam Yoo Soon-taek
HRH Prince Alexander of Serbia
HRH Princess Katherine of Serbia
HRH Princess Katherine of Serbia
HRH Princess Katherine of Serbia
HRH Prince Alexander of Serbia
Madam Yoo Soon-taek
Muffie Potter Aston kicking off The 27th Annual Miracle on Madison Avenue festivities with the 2nd annual "Light Up The Holidays."
Hewitt Carolers singing
After the lighting ceremony
a private kick-off reception was held at The Marquand
Natasa De luca
Natasa De luca
Guests enter The Power of Poison
Co-chair Gaelin Rosenwaks
Museum curator Mark Siddall
Steering Committee members Elizabeth
Andrew Yanev with Julia Bosson
Steering Committee members David
Co-chair Zoe Wilson
Live theater presentation
Guests discover the exhibition’s “enchanted book”
David J. Arena with Master Sgt. Mary Kay Messenger
former Executive Director
with Jami Landi
Director of Development
of Police Athletic League
with Raymond W. Kelly
NYC Police Commissioner &amp
Honorary of Police Athletic League
former NYC Police Commissioner &amp
Vice Chairman of Police Athletic League
with Mitchell E. Rudin
Jr. with their team
The scene at Fountain Gallery's Mad About Art
the Gallery’s Annual Art Auction
Petraeus with students from CUNY's Macaulay Honors College
Fountain Gallery artist Rivky Grossman
Fountain Gallery artist Rivky Grossman
Fountain Gallery artist Rivky Grossman
Fountain Gallery artist Rivky Grossman
Fountain Gallery artist Bernard Stote
Fountain Gallery artist Julio Mendoza
Fountain Gallery artist Bernard Stote
Fountain Gallery artist Julio Mendoza
Fountain Gallery artist Mercedes Kelly
Fountain Gallery artist Paula Isaac
Fountain Gallery artist Paula Isaac
Fountain Gallery artist Gail Shamchenko
Fountain Gallery artist Anthony Newton
Liv Tyler with her grand
co-author Dorothea Johnson
Liv Tyler takes a break between book signings
sings a few holiday favorites with the carolers
Benefit co-chairs: Lynn Halbfinger
Jacqueline Bates with Rachel Stern
Jacques d'Amboise
Director of the Neuberger Museum of Art
Helen Stambler Neuberger with Jacques d'Amboise
Designer Manish Arora's collection on the runway at The Indo-American Arts Council's 15th anniversary.
Holiday House designers
Event Co-chairs Sharon Coplan Hurowitz
inventor of the Menurkey
lighting the Hanukkah candles
with Sasha Hurowitz
Event Co-chair Jacqueline Harris Hochberg
Event Co-chairs Richard Hurowitz
Event Co-chairs Kenneth Rosenblum
Event Co-chair Lyss Stern
Author Salman Rusdhie being honored by Aroon Shivdasani
chef/author Madhur Jaffrey
Pianist Kenny Ascher performing with vocalist Paul Williams
Homeland's Sarita Choudhury
Filmmaker Mira Nair with IAAC Exec. Dir. Aroon Shivdasani
House of Cards' Sakina Jaffrey
Sunjay Guleria with Indian designer Manish Arora
wife Mohini Guleria
Wendy Carduner with Cowboys
Elizabeth Frogel with Charlie
friends drawing the raffle
winner of the original illustrated drawing
Cocktails at the Carlton Hobbs Gallery for the Winter Antiques Show Committee
East Side House Settlement's inaugural Expert Eye Evening.
Torian Robinson with a friend
Keli Goff with a friend
Susan Fales-Hill with a friend
friend
Angela Vallot with a friend
Maya Harris with a friend
friend
Halona Shaw with a friend
Renika Moore with friends
Guests gather for remarks at the Carlton Hobbs Gallery
Carlton Hobbs with guests
Kathy Clark with Pat Battle
The Manolo Blahniks designed exclusively for Breast Cancer Alliance ...
Georgetown Cupcake helped the event end on a sweet note
having donated over 1
000 edible custom cupcake centerpieces
Jeffery Immelt receiving his award from Projo the Robot
Tony Bennett sings his acceptance "speech"
Guests take the Apollo stage for a post Gala dance party
Clockwise from top left: Jerry
friend
Dinner at The Metropolitan Museum of Art for the 16th Annual Food Allergy Ball benefiting Food Allergy Research &amp
Dinner at the New York Academy of Medicine
Cocktails in the Roosevelt Rotunda
Dinner in the Milstein Hall of Ocean Life
co-chair Tina Fey
Chairmen of the Museum's Board of Trustees Lewis Bernard
and Michael Bloomberg
Florence + the Machine
Co-chairs Tina Fey
Co-chair Lorne Michaels
Co-chairs Lorne
friend
co-chair Lorne Michaels
Graff models
Chairmen of the Museum's Board of Trustees Lewis Bernard
Co-chairs Jodie
Cocktails at the Metropolitan Club for The New York Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Children's annual fall benefit.
chef Jonathan Waxman
founder of
of WWO Jane Aronson
host Seth Meyer
WWO Board of Directors
Host Seth Meyers taking a group selfie
Founder of
of
model Nyamuoch Girwath
The Dignity of Family Life Award recipient Al Roker
Guests at the Silent Auction
Abbott House Board Chairman Gregory Mooney announcing the Fifty Forward Campaign
Al Roker receiving The Dignity of Family Life Award from Abbott House
Al Roker delivering his acceptance speech
Chairman of the Board of Directors of Abbott House
&amp
of Abbott House
his wife Nancy Hanson
his brother
actor John Finn
New York Rangers great Adam Graves
Friend of Abbott House Award honorees Diane N. Wade
Friend of Abbott House awardee Susan Corcoran
Abbott House Assistant Executive Director for Human Resources Myra Gray
Cynthia Lamontagne at New York City Center’s Gala.
&amp
of New York City Center
Chairman Emeritus of New York City Center
the Gala's Honoree
&amp
of New York City Center
Board Member of New York City Center
Board Member of New York City Center
Board Member of New York City Center
Board Member of New York City Center
Board Member of New York City Center
guest speaker Isabella Rossellini
The New York Women’s Foundation® has worked hard to make New York a better place
ensure it remains a city of possibility for us all. This evening’s gala is a wonderful chance to not only raise support for this outstanding organization
but also to recognize several of its supporters for their unwavering dedication to the foundation’s mission: Carolina Herrera
the Ford Foundation. Together
we celebrate everything that women contribute to the five boroughs each day
look forward to a stronger
more equitable future for all New Yorkers. Now therefore
of the City of New York
do hereby proclaim Thursday
in the City of New York as: “New York Women’s Foundation Day.”
guests
honoree Aaliyah Bell
friend
Honoree Alyssa Strykers with Estelle Strykers
Christodora students
Host of the evening Brian Williams
Strolling Supper event co-chairm
Strolling Supper event co-chair
Bill Ritter of WABC-TV
emcee for the evening
Mickey Conlon &amp
Tom Postilio of CORE
stars of HGTV's Selling New York
Grammy award winning blues artist Delbert McClinton
singer Caroline Jones
guest
guests
guests
Baroness Didi d'Anglejan
Didi d'Anglejan
Eugenie d'Angland
2 nephews
Eugand nie d'Angland s
Baroness didi d'Anglejan
Cocktails at the Metropolitan Club
Rivera with Richard Essey
recipient of the Jacob K. Javits Lifetime Achievement Award
Board Members with Honorees Mariano Rivera
Phil Simms with Howard Cross
Former NFL player
the night's auctioneer Howard Cross
Phil Simms with Chapter Honorary Board Member Tommy John
Board of Directors Member Allen Popowitz with Honoree Ron Darling
U.S. Congressman Eliot Engel with Honoree Ron Darling
Board of Directors Member Lee Brodsky
Former NFL player Kevin Turner receives the Lou Gehrig Sports Award
given by the ALS Association Greater New York Chapter
from the ceremony's emcee Jeremy Schaap
Fountain House Kenn Dudek at Fountain House's Sixth Annual Fall Fête.
eyes open
Gaga from the back
Guests at table
James Turrell with Pratt Design students
Elizabethan-style dinner to honor Leonard Polonsky
his wife Georgette Bennett
her husband Leonard Polonsky
cast member David Harewood
Cast members Zach Appelman
Brendan Averett with Leonard Polonsky
his wife Georgette Bennett
his wife Georgette Bennett
cast member Roger Clarks
cast member David Harewood
Cast members Joe Grifasi
Susan Jablonski at the Hope for Depression Research Foundation's annual "HOPE" Luncheon Seminar.
CBCA Board of Directors – David Méneret
Carter Burden Center Board of Directors &amp
Lauren Bush Lauren at World of Children Award's 16th Annual Awards Ceremony
Children's Aid Society Chorus
Honoree Chaeli Mycroft with mom Zelda
James Banks Design's Heidi Nahser Fink
ESCADA Resort 2014 collection
The 2013 Designers of "Home Is Where The Heart Is" Designer Showhouse to benefit the American Heart Association
of Foundation Scientific Council
Brain &amp
Behavior Research Foundation National Awards Dinner at The Pierre
with J. Randolph Lewis
Senior Vice of Logistics
Distribution at Walgreen Co.
guests
SAP employees
guests
guests
David Monn designed the decor for the 2013 Library Lions Gala at The New York Public Library
and Irene Moscahlaidis
Patricia d'Arenberg
Annette de la Renta
Ardmore Ceramics at Creel
Cora Sheibani at Creel
More from the Cora Sheibani collection.
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
The scene at the New York Public Library for the Altman Foundation's Centennial Celebration.
Founder &amp
Chairman Emeritus of the Benefit Fund Rusty Staub
Former Deputy of NYC
Board Member of Benefit Fund Edward Skyler
Honorary Chairs at 28th Annual Gala of NY Police &amp
Fire Widows' &amp
Children's Benefit Fund Today Show Anchor Al Roker
Superintendent of Port Authority Police Department Michael Fedorko
Chairman of Benefit Fund Stephen Dannhauser
Founder &amp
Chairman Emeritus of Benefit Fund Rusty Staub
Director of Development of the Benefit Fund Arielle Lenza Di Ciollo
actress Gloria
James Quella with wife Linda Quella
VP of Community Affairs for the Benefit Fund Mark Messier with his wife Kimberly
Stephen Dannhauser with wife Beth Dannhauser
Philip V. Moyles Jr. with wife Beth Moyles
John Doyle with wife Katherine Doyle
husband David Moszer
Students from
alumni from
Former Prime Minister of New Zealand Helen Clark
Joan Jett Draws the Line
Alfre Woodard Draws the Line
Katie Lee Draws the Line
friend
The Saints from STUDIOS Architecture at Bette Midler’s New York Restoration Project’s Annual Hulaween Gala.
The scene of Hulaween: Waldorf Grand Ballroom
Hulaween centerpieces
Bette Midler with Mardi Gras Indian Show
the moon goddesses
creepy crunchy fingers
Liz Brown sporting 50 Shades of Gray
Faiza Khan with Perseus
Rod Gilbert makes the rounds at The Children’s Cancer &amp
Blood Foundation's annual “Breakthrough Ball” at the Plaza Hotel.
Amar'e Stoudemire
Amar'e Stoudemire
Amar'e Stoudemire
Amar'e
The Grand Promenade of the David H. Koch Theater designed by Bronson van Wyck for ABT's annual Opening Night Fall Gala.
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
friends
Consul of China
of the Republic of Indonesia to the United States
Natalie Morales hosted The Moving Families Forward Gala for the third consecutive year
Martha Fling presented the Moving Families Forward Award to Colin Farrell
John O'Neill presented the Ackerman Distinguished Service Award to Jeannie Ackerman Curhan
Martha Fling presented the Moving Families Forward Award to Colin Farrell
John O'Neill presented the Ackerman Distinguished Service Award to Jeannie Ackerman Curhan
his wife
his wife
Alec Baldwin entertain the crowd at Coalition for the Homeless's 19th annual ARTWALK NY.
Amerlia Osborne annd Charles Osborne
Dan off
Oscar de la Renta
Eve de la Mothe Karoubi
Anne de la Mothe Karoubi
AFL's Sue Devine
Cocktails during The Drawing Center's 10th Annual Benefit Auction at Sotheby's.
Rosemarie diSalvo
Rosemarie diSalvo
Camille Roche at Galerie Dumonteil
7th Marquess of Cholmondeley
the Marchioness
the Duchess of Marlborough
Guests listening to Isaac Mizrahi
Joanna Coles at the Central Park Conservancy's Annual Fall Luncheon at the Mandarin Oriental.
dean NYU
director NYU Cancer Institute
dean NYU
honoree Richard Shapiro
2013 Family Party Leadership. Back row: Jacqueline Sackler
Benedetta Casamento. Front row: Don Watros
friends
Rebekah Mercer with children
children from
performer from Weaving the Wild
Performer from Weaving the Wild
"A Touch of Nature" with Jerry Zelenka
Tiffany &amp
The Museum's Associate Dean of Science Christopher Raxworthy
Buddy from The Jim Henson Company's Dinosaur Train
Tiffany &amp
Co. Decorate a Crown
Cozy's Cuts for Kids
the Rock Star Dancers
The Women's Media Center's 2013 Women's Media Awards at 583 Park Avenue
Pat Mitchell presented to Christiane Amanpour
Board Chair Emerita of The Women's Media Center
Women's Media Award Honoree Christiane Amanpour
Women's Media Center Co Founder Gloria Steinem embraces Women's Media Award Honoree Sheila C. Johnson
Women's Media Award Honoree Sheila C. Johnson
Women's Media Award Honoree Maria Teresa Kumar
Women's Media Center Co-Founders Robin Morgan
Co Founder of The Women's Media Center
Women's Media Center Co Founder Jane Fonda presents the Social Media Award
of The Women's Media Center
Betsy West accepted The Women's Media Award for Makers
the 3 hour documentary
digital platform
of The Women's Media Center
Betsy West accepted The Women's Media Award for Makers
the 3 hour documentary
digital platform
Women's Media Award Honoree Lindy West
Editor in Chief of Time Inc.
Co Chair of The Women's Media Awards
Women's Media Center Board Chair Lauren Embrey
WMC SheSource intern Julia Bahl
Women's Media Center Board Chair Lauren Embrey
WMC SheSource intern Julia Bahl
children from The Sylvia Center program
Beyond! at New York City Center.
Rosie's Theater Kids
Ann Marie DeAngelo with Maya
Ann Marie DeAngelo with Maya
and John
Candace Cavanaugh with Designers Circle member
VP of Public Relations with Ariane Trimuschat
Enthusiasts Chairs with Maria Sullivan
John Urben with Victoria Zitrin
Enterprise Board Members with Riccardo Benavides
Brooks Brothers SF Store Manager with Barbara Cohen
Golden Hearts volunteers at God's Love We Deliver's Seventh Annual Golden Heart Awards
Jack deLashmet
Paul Oakley stovall
friend
The Duke of York
Medal of Honor Recipient Col. Jack Jacobs
The Duke of York
The Duke of York
The Duke of York
The Duke of York
The Duke of York
of the United War Veterans Council
The Duke of York
Military Ball Sponsor's Committee Co-Chairman Cynthia Maltese
Military Ball Sponsor's Committee Chairman Jean Shafiroff
Greetings the guests at The Wallis Annenberg Center for the Performing Arts.
Nicole Richie with Hilary Tisch
"It was not an outfit one could disappear in ..."
Bollywood Actor Omi Vaidya emcees
Isheeta Ganguly performing
Bhangra artist Bikram Singh
Friends of Pratham
Pratham Tristate Chairman Dinyar Devitre with Chelsea Clinton
Pratham co-founder
Madhav Chavan with guest
Guests dancing at Pratham Gala
Storefront student Jasmine Q. with Marcus Samuelsson
an adoptable dog
Guests arriving
Sofia van der Dys
At the Breast Cancer Research Foundation's annual Symposium
New York Stem Cell Foundation scientists
Piero Incisa della Rocchetta
Outside the tent
Under the tent for lunch catered by The Farmer's Wife
Local Honey at table
her children
his daughte Kathleen
friends
The pumpkin tumblr in action
Concert featuring Geri Allen &amp
Afro Blue at New Jersey Symphony Orchestra's opening night concert
gala at the New Jersey Performing Arts Center in Newark.
Executive Director Sharon Crary with event co-chairs Carolyn Mullins
NJSO performance on opening night
Concert featuring Geri Allen
Geri Allen takes her bow
The audience at the New Jersey Performing Arts Center in Newark
Pres &amp
James Roe at the post-performance dinner
Special dinner performance by Geri Allen
Pres &amp
James Roe conversing with dinner guests
Dinner with guests Bob
Cast of Orphan Train with Richard Buery
pianist House
cellist Alexis Pia Gerlach take a bow
Chef Michael Lomonaco welcomes the crowd
Chef Michael Lomonaco welcomes the crowd
friends
The Director's Council Chairs of the Museum of the City of New York.
The scene at The Four Seasons for “New York After Dark"
Joel Schumacher with Graff models dressed in Oscar de la Renta
Piaget models in Rose Garden
ABT Studio Company dancer Katerina Eng
ABT Studio Company members performing
Karen Oguma and friends
ABT Studio Company dancers
The scene at the Frick Collection's annual Autumn Dinner.
Sarah Flint in the Boucher Room
Chairman of the Board of Trustees Margot Bogert
Guests enjoy the Library gallery
Chairman of the Board of Trustees Margot Bogert
Guests in the Oval Room
Dinner is served ...
Frick Director Ian Wardropper presents honoree Michel David-Weill with an engraved silver tray from Tiffany
soprano Anna Netrebko
Composer in Residence David Lang
wife Suzanne Bocanegra
Violinist Joshua Bell addresses the gala attendees
Opening Night Gala Dinner in the Grand Ballroom at the Waldorf Astoria
Gala guests dance the night away
sister Lauren Shmalo
the board of directors of The Pink Agenda
Perri Peltz at The Dubin Breast Center of The Tisch Cancer Institute's second annual Fact vs Fiction luncheon.
Guests in the Jill
Lewis Bernard Family Hall of North American Mammals
Co-chairs Martin
Steering Committee members Peter
Steering Committee members Andrew Goldberg
and Susan
Steering Committee member Alessia Menegon
friends
Steering Committee members Michael Lackman
Ruth Ann Blankenheim with friends
Co-chairs Iain
Steering Committee member Emanuel Michael
Co-chair Gaelin Rosenwaks
friends
Co-chairs Zach
of the Republic of Chad
of the Republic of Chad
Head of State
of the Republic of Chad
Head of State
PAL Honorary Raymond W. Kelly with former NYC Police Commissioner
Central Park Conservancy's kickoff for "Autumn in the Park" at Valentino on Madison Avenue.
Julia Loomis with friends
Guests gathering for the concert
Gina de Franco with chef Stephane Raimbault
models from Herlod Scherman Paris
Jack Melki of Maison Herold Scherman Paris
Robert Hughes of Christopher Peackcock with models from Maison Herold Scherman Paris
Patricia Bonus with Patrice Bernan
friend
Nadine Thil enjoying the spread
Submitting their names to win Lalique price
friends toast the National Law Enforcement
Firefighters Children's Foundation's inaugural Hero Awards.
James Esposito Chief of Operations
BAC VP of Development Will Maitland Weiss
Michael-Ann Rowe can't wait until October 22nd
The scene at The Boys' Club of New York's 65th Annual Fall Gala at The Pierre Hotel.
all wearing Celia Kritharioti Haute Couture
wearing Celia Kritharioti Haute Couture
wearing Celia Kritharioti Haute Couture
wearing Celia Kritharioti Haute Couture
wearing Celia Kritharioti Haute Couture
friend
friend
both wearing Celia Kritharioti Haute Couture
both wearing Celia Kritharioti Haute Couture
Avery Fisher Hall on opening night
Music Director Alan Gilbert leads the Philharmonic
Performance shot of Golijov's Azul
Ken Buckfire with Yo-Yo Ma
designer Neri Oxman
composer Osvaldo Golijov
friends
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
The luncheon table set for 19
her daughter Olivia hosted a luncheon
fashion show in her garden to benefit the Greenwich YWCA.
The crowd in the plaza on opening night
Amar'e Stoudemire
The luncheon guests
Audra McDonald sings with the Boston Pops Swing Orchestra led by Eric Stern.
Audra McDonald sings with the Boston Pops Swing Orchestra led by Eric Stern.
Audra McDonald sings with the Boston Pops Swing Orchestra led by Eric Stern.
James Taylor with brother Livingston Taylor.
James Taylor with brother Livingston Taylor.
James Taylor with brother Livingston Taylor.
wife BSO Assistant Principal Viola Cathy Basrak.
wife BSO Assistant Principal Viola Cathy Basrak.
wife BSO Assistant Principal Viola Cathy Basrak.
James Taylor with Roslyn Burbank
James Taylor with Roslyn Burbank
James Taylor with Roslyn Burbank
BSO Managing Director Mark Volpe with Audra McDonald.
BSO Managing Director Mark Volpe with Audra McDonald.
BSO Managing Director Mark Volpe with Audra McDonald.
Adriann Singer with a friend
Prime Minister of Antigua
with Hedy Klineman
Dinner on the promenade of the David. H. Koch Theater celebrating New York City Ballet's 2013 Fall Gala.
Frederique van der Wal
friend
Lupit Nyong'o
Gala Chairs at the New Yorkers For Children 2013 Fall Gala at Cipriani 42nd Street.
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Opening night party at the Museum of the City of New York for Picturing Central Park: Paintings by Janet Ruttenberg.
Oscar de la Renta
On the promendae of the David H. Koch Theater for the Couture Council of The Museum at the Fashion Institute of Technology's benefit luncheon.
Muna Rihani al Nasser
The restored former home of Albert Rogers
John Rist holding one of his "Fabulous Fish
Guest on the lawn of the historic Rogers Mansion
Southampton councilman Chris Nuzzi
Southampton councilman Chris Nuzzi
Chiu-Ti Jansen at the China Beauty Charity Fund's inaugural China Fashion Night Gala at the Pierre Hotel.
Katharine Page sandals
Katharine Page sandals
The Rumbough family
Kent Farrington riding Zafira
Jennifer Judkins at the 38th Annual Hampton Classic Horse Show
Georgina Bloomberg sails over the fence
winner of the FTI $250
Georgina Bloomberg sails over the fence
winner of the FTI $250
Sophia Vergara And poses for one
Kramer table
Robbins Wolffe table
Sotheby's International table
Jos. M. Troffa table
Bloomberg table
actor Robert Davi
actor Robert Davi
Pilatus table
Firefly Farm table
Marders table
Wolffer Estate table
daughter Georgina Bloomberg
daughter Georgina Bloomberg
Hermes' table
Callan Solem table
Oakland table
Crown family table
Valerie Angeli with DaVinci
Jill Rappaport with with Rubie
Longines presenting a check for $5
000 to the ASPCA honoring Jill Rappaport
her work
family
Gilles Robert of Longines
of the US Equestrian Association
friend
Exec. Dir. pf the Hampton Classic
VP International Marketing Longines with Mark Udell of London Jewelers
Holding a place at the table
Luncheon guests
Surprise gift from Longines
Click to order Houses of the Hamptons.
The scene at Ann Madonia Antiques
John Wanamaker-Leas's Family Home was in the book
Sophy Haynes with Gary's replica of her Family Home "Keewaydin"
Esther Paster was thrilled to have her copy signed
Suzette Smith whose Home "Villa Mille Fiori" is in the book. Her Family called it "The Villa".
BAC Co-Founder Michael Christensen clowns around with BAC Artistic Director Guillaume Dufresnoy
Host Charles Brock with BAC Board Chairman Rick Mayberry
The Teryazos's
Hostess Mary Jane Brock with Guillaume Dufresnoy
the Brocks
family
A hole in one!
The host says it's time for the show
Volunteer Russell Byrnes didn't know he had so much red string in his ear
The BAC acrobats demonstrated their amazing skill
This demonstrated skills of his own
The scene at Rydell High School Sock Hop benefitting the Prostate Cancer Foundation at East Hampton Studio in Wainscott.
Julie Welles takes a jump
mom Kelly Klein
son Carter Thompson
daughter Gia Curatola
Dennis Susskind takes Governor Andrew Cuomo on a tour of the Hampton Classic Horseshow
artist Suzanne La Fleur
The birthday cake
The birthday boy
Hillary 's home in Sagaponack for the summer.
Hillary 's home in Sagaponack for the summer.
Hillary 's home in Sagaponack for the summer.
Clockwise from top left: Ron Perelman
Clockwise from top left: Ron Perelman
Clockwise from top left: Ron Perelman
the birthday boy Ben Bradlee with friends Mort Janklow
the birthday boy Ben Bradlee with friends Mort Janklow
the birthday boy Ben Bradlee with friends Mort Janklow
daughter
the Baum family
Lisa Perry at The Breast Cancer Research Foundation's second annual “Hamptons Paddle &amp
Party for Pink."
Danger: Press Check-In for the 65th Annual Artists vs. Writers Softball Game.
Danger: Press Check-In for the 65th Annual Artists vs. Writers Softball Game.
Danger: Press Check-In for the 65th Annual Artists vs. Writers Softball Game.
Carl Bernstein at the plate.
Carl Bernstein at the plate.
Carl Bernstein at the plate.
Jay McInerney catching.
Jay McInerney catching.
Jay McInerney catching.
Lori Singer rounds the bases.
Lori Singer rounds the bases.
Lori Singer rounds the bases.
Matt umping.
Matt umping.
Matt umping.
The Writers team.
The Writers team.
The Writers team.
The Artists team.
The Artists team.
The Artists team.
Bernadette Peters with a couple of beauties.
Bernadette Peters with a couple of beauties.
Bernadette Peters with a couple of beauties.
Dick Cavett with Riley. Jane Notar
Dick Cavett with Riley. Jane Notar
Dick Cavett with Riley.
Gabrielle Reece cheering on her husband
Laird Hamilton in the water
Laird Hamilton at the finish
Edie Falco BCRF towel
Martha Stewart signature
Models in LEVIEV diamonds
Lisa Perry dressed with LISA PERRY
Artist Tomek Sadurski with his '80s vintage surfboard
Brendan Fallis up close
The "Writers" at The East Hampton Artists Writers Annual Softball Game.
Writers huddle
The arrives
everybody wants a picture
Clinton makes an appearance
Bill Clinton signing autographs
with writers Ken Auletta
sports broadcaster
Strategizing before the game
Matt Lauer during the National Anthem
Carl Bernstein at the bat
Jay Mcinerney catching
Eric Ernst at bat
Mort Zuckerman pitching
Matt Lauer umping
James Lipton in the announcers booth...
1010 WINS broadcaster Juliet Papa with WPPB broadcaster Bonnie Grice
Bob Balaban came to support the artists
Matt Lauer helping out some friends
Matt Lauer with Dan Rattiner
Mike Lupica conferring with Leif Hope
The leaves the field
The Living Statues of Rhode Island welcomed guests to the black-tie event
Living Statues dressed as Venetian Courtiers
Claire Knopf with her son James Knopf
Claire Knopf with her son James Knopf
Director of Development Laurie Bratone
Director of Development Laurie Bratone
Jeffrey Wrightson with friends
Association Claire Knopf with her husband Woody
Guests gather at the Eleventh Annual "Women of Valor" Awards Tea at the Waldorf Astoria.
Over 750 guests attended the Eleventh Annual "Women of Valor" Awards Tea at the Waldorf Astoria
Mt Carmel Holy Rosary the Honors Violin Ensemble
Guest of Honor Rosalie Mignano-Aste
Macy's table
Brian J. McCarthy with friends
Bill Tanzi with Catherine Michaelson
Daniel Kenny with Whitney Webster
and Joanna and
Bailey House board member Deb Gordon
Gina Quattrochi with Board Chair Thomas Farrell in the background announces the raffle
Event Chair Chris Rizzo addresses the crowd - board chair Thomas farrell in background
Guests gather at Guild Hall in East Hampton for John Heminway 's screening of “Battle for the Elephants.”
Guests gather at Guild Hall in East Hampton for John Heminway 's screening of “Battle for the Elephants.”
Guests gather at Guild Hall in East Hampton for John Heminway 's screening of “Battle for the Elephants.”
the Judelsons.
the Judelsons.
the Judelsons.
Dorothea Bon Jovi at the UA East Hampton Cinema for a screening of "The Butler."
Dorothea Bon Jovi at the UA East Hampton Cinema for a screening of "The Butler."
Dorothea Bon Jovi at the UA East Hampton Cinema for a screening of "The Butler."
Guests at the Wolffer estate.
Guests at the Wolffer estate.
Guests at the Wolffer estate.
Vito Schnabel with mom Jacqueline.
Guests arrive by boat at The Perlman Music Program's Annual Summer Benefit "Taste of Shelter Island."
Guests out by Grey Gardens Pool
The flowers at Grey Gardens
Nelson DeMille with his latest
Path to Power
authors books
their books
Author Dava Sobel with Barbara Goldsmith
Chris Martin chatting with author Mickey Paraskevas
Clive Davis signing The Soundtrack of My Life
her books
a fan ...
why we love the Water
with Nile Rodgers
Armfuls of books ...
event décor by Ned Kelly
Paul Rosenblum with Joe Masteroff
the original creator's of She Loves Me
Zita Rosenthal with Caramoor's Chairman
The Red Ball theme inspired attendees to add a splash of red to their summer attire
Honoree Zita Rosenthal with Stephen Lowey
Honoree Zita Rosenthal with Gala Co-Chairs Judy Evnin
Susan Freund Caramoor's new Jeff Haydon
Honoree Zita Rosenthal with Gala Co-Chairs Judy Evnin
Caramoor's new Jeff Haydon
celebrity "Eventiste" Marcy Blum
Paul Rosenblum with Alexandra Silber
Caramoor's Director of Special Events
After Dark Party with the cast of She Loves Me
Guests in the concert tent
Maestro Itzhak Perlman leads the PMP String Orchestra
Chorus led by Maestro Patrick Romano
Guests walk to dinner
Dinner in the tent
Founder Toby Perlman speaks
Boyd Martin on Pancho Villa
Emily Hottensen at Fitch's Corner Horse Trials.
Kirk presenting his gift to Fernanda
Champagne Paul Goerg at the Sunday Spectator Luncheon
Kirk Henckels with Chris
The McLaughlins with Jack Lynch
Marion deVogel
Parasols from Joyaux Marisol
Fitch's Market had 50 shops to choose from
J. McLaughlin swag bags
UJA-Federation of New York's Hamptons Trunk Show chairs Jamie Mitchell
Ramy Sharp with UJA-Federation of New York Hamptons Trunk Show vendors
UJA-Federation of New York's Hamptons Trunk Show shoppers ...
Nina Griscom at the Alzheimer's Association's official Rita Hayworth Gala Hamptons Kick-Off Reception in Watermill
Princess Yasmin Aga Khan wearing a Sintessi Ring
Peter diPaola Anne Hearst McInerney
Peter diPaola
Dancing became more expressive as the night moved on at the Southampton Hospital's 55th Annual Gala.
Dancing became more expressive as the night moved on at the Southampton Hospital's 55th Annual Gala.
Dancing became more expressive as the night moved on at the Southampton Hospital's 55th Annual Gala.
Dinner under the tent.
Dinner under the tent.
Dinner under the tent.
Alex Donner entertained ...
Alex Donner entertained ...
Alex Donner entertained ...
Komen Greater NYC's Young Professionals Committee's Pink Rocks the Rock.
Oysters on the half
Basil Panna Cotta with heirloom tomatoes
crisp pannacotta
Smoked Duck Loin with tomato confit
pickled watermelon from Stone Creek Inn
Beet Risotto with goat cheese presented by Topping Rose House
Delectable desserts
Chef Jason Weiner from Almond Restaurant Bridgehampton with his Corn Vichyssoise with Basil Marinated Tomatoes
Nick &amp
Toni's Restaurant
Chef Josh Capon from Lure Fishbar
Samantha Yanks with Avery Rudin
the Parlor
Komen Greater NYC's Young Professionals Committee's Pink Rocks the Rock
YPC Exec Committee member
event hostess Dawn Reinholtz
YPC member Evan Kaufman
friend
YPC Executive Committee member Robert Waldele
guests
YPC Exec Committee members Dawn Reinhotz
Devon Ott with Komen Greater NYC Linda Tantawi
Dancing to DJ Jason Fioto
The entrance to Watermill Center's "Devil's Heaven."
The entrance to Watermill Center's "Devil's Heaven."
The entrance to Watermill Center's "Devil's Heaven."
Tree nymphs were everpresent.
Tree nymphs were everpresent.
Tree nymphs were everpresent.
Marina Abramovic. Robert Wilson with Gaga.
Marina Abramovic. Robert Wilson with Gaga.
Robert Wilson with Gaga.
Gaga taking a taste. Abramovic
Gaga taking a taste. Abramovic
Gaga taking a taste.
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia.
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia.
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia.
Richard Yasztremski at last night's preview reception of Art Southampton.
Dietrich Klinge sculpture on the grounds of f Art Southampton
Pamela Cohen with the Tansey family
his aliens
Models with Graff Jewelry
Models with Graff Jewelry
Ted Allen taking selfie pictures
Under the tent ...
Chefs at work
Chef Alex Stupak serving sweet corn
lobster mayonnaise
epazote mayonnaise
Aldea Restaurant presents his grilled quail
coriander olives
black olives
Iron Chef Morimoto signature Ale
Chef Stefan Karlsson from Fond Restaurant with his Swedish creations
JBF Award winner
Coleen Grapes with assistants from the Harrison Restaurant
Cornmeal Cake with Strawberries from Craft Restaurant
Tasting sipping
champagne sipping
Mango mouse by Chef Caroline Perego
Restaurant Latour at Crystal Springs Resort
Chef Andrew Weiner of Almond Restaurant
Chef Caroline Perego with her assistant chefs from Citarella
Fulton restaurants
Chef Billy Oliva from Delmonico's
The littlest foodie
Brian del Toro
Rosemarie diSalvo
Annemarie diSalvo
Richard Yasztremski at last night's preview reception of Art Southampton.
Dietrich Klinge sculpture on the grounds of f Art Southampton
Pamela Cohen with the Tansey family
his aliens
Models with Graff Jewelry
Models with Graff Jewelry
Ted Allen taking selfie pictures
Under the tent ...
Chefs at work
Chef Alex Stupak serving sweet corn
lobster mayonnaise
epazote mayonnaise
Aldea Restaurant presents his grilled quail
coriander olives
black olives
Iron Chef Morimoto signature Ale
Chef Stefan Karlsson from Fond Restaurant with his Swedish creations
JBF Award winner
Coleen Grapes with assistants from the Harrison Restaurant
Cornmeal Cake with Strawberries from Craft Restaurant
Tasting sipping
champagne sipping
Mango mouse by Chef Caroline Perego
Restaurant Latour at Crystal Springs Resort
Chef Andrew Weiner of Almond Restaurant
Chef Caroline Perego with her assistant chefs from Citarella
Fulton restaurants
Chef Billy Oliva from Delmonico's
The littlest foodie
Brian del Toro
Rosemarie diSalvo
Annemarie diSalvo
The scene at The Studio Museum in Harlem's summer opening reception.
The Pantzer living room.
Coffee reception at Ralph Lauren before Author Breakfast with guest Pamela Fiori
Gem Palace's Jewels
The dinner setting in the new Herzog &amp
de Meuron-designed building at The Parrish Art Museum's annual Midsummer Party.
The magnificent view of Long Island Sound
designed by John Collins
Sherrell children: Bracie
executive director of Raynham Hall
of the Board of Trustees
wife
friend
Entering Governor's Island
The dancing begins
The scene from Governor's Island
friends
Schoolhouse Projects from Brooklyn
friends at the sixth annual ArtHamptons on the Sculpture Fields of Nova's Ark.
the student workshop
was transformed into a setting for the silent auction
Gala guests packed into Restoration Hall on the IYRS campus during the Annual Summer Gala
to enjoy cocktails amidst examples of students' boat- restoration work
Guests mingled amidst the event’s display of silent auction items
C. Hugh Hildesley of Sotheby’s—who has conducted some of the auction house’s most prestigious sales
including those of the Estate of Jacqueline Kennedy Onassis
the Collection of the Duke
Duchess of Windsor—conducted the live auction
Jill Townsend enjoy the school’s Annual Summer Gala with family
friends
IYRS alumnus Carter Richardson
Curator of IYRS/The Museum of Yachting Jay Picotte
Kimberly Gonzales of Boat International Media
IYRS alumna Gigi DiRenzo
The Teams at the 16th Annual Mashomack International Polo Challenge &amp
Wide World of Ferrari
Dream Hotel with co-chairs Karen Klopp
Ferrari row – Wide World Ferrari entrance to field side luncheon
Team Parade led by Ferrari
Dream battle it out
The crowd roots for their favorites
boys
Wide World of Ferrari cheerleader
Leslie Stephens warming up a Ferrari
Wide World of Ferrari Team: John Klopp
Castello di Vicarrelo Team with the Carlyle Hotel Team
Team s: Carlos Mansur
Celebrating Brazilian style
Teresa Colley review silent auction
Tom Flexner Jr. with friends
A model with Cindy Stebbins
laura Lehmann
friends
Eugene Colley with NY State Troopers
who benefited from the day
Director of the Glass House addresses guests
Guests picnicing on the lawn at Glass House
Estevan Rael-Gálvez
Chef Brian Lewis of Elm restaurant
Patrons enjoy a pre-performance dinner at a private home as part of a three-day extravaganza to benefit The Santa Fe Opera.
Maria Cuomo Cole in coversation
former Governor Mario Cuomo
former Governor Mario Cuomo
fromer Governor Mario Cuomo
W llie garson. I'll also agreeto ave not an apage bance lex iditsn engle.jpg
friend
Susan Graham as Grand Duchess in The Grand Duchess of Gerolstein
Emily Fons as Cherubino
Lisette Oropesa as Susanna in The Marriage of Figaro
Susan Graham as Grand Duchess in The Grand Duchess of Gerolstein
The cast of The Marriage of Figaro at the Opening Night Cast Party: Susanna Phillips
The cast of The Grand Duchess of Gerolstein at the Opening Night Cast Party: Charles MacKay
Dancers from The Grand Duchess of Gerolstein at the Opening Night Cast Party for the Santa Fe Opera.
Patrons participate in a backstage tour of The Crosby Theatre
Executive Chef of the Four Seasons
judge the tailgate picnic contest
Tailgate picnickers on opening night
Clay Brakeley in the gardens of the Nedra Matteucci Galleries
Ken Williams at The Grand Duchess of Gerolstein Opening Night Dinner
The scene at LongHouse Reserve's annual horticultural event
PLANTERS: On + Off the Ground VI.
friends
Carol Schapiro and Charlotte Loyazaga
Carol Schapiro and Charlotte Loyazaga
her sister
Barbara Tober with a friend
Robert Disanto of Thorin
Jack deLashmet
Jack deLashmet
Poolside at the inaugural Holiday House Hamptons
HHH designers
Chelsea Pensioners at Masterpiece London
Barber Osgerby outside the front of Masterpiece London
Collector with Elle Shushan
Esther Leong with Nazy Vassegh
guests
Thomas Woodham Smith with Kravis colleagues
of Masterpiece London
of Masterpiece London
Harry van der Horn
friend
Michael Shara discusses stellar explosions
Steering Committee member Carla Franklin
Museum's Curator of Astrophysics Michael Shara
friend
Steering Committee member Joseph Shatz
friend
Steering Committee member Emanuel Michael
Steering Committee member Alessia Menegon
Danielle Lerner with Co-Chairs Robin Roberts
Steering Committee members David
Steering Committee member Carla Franklin
friends
friends
Paula &amp
3 teachers receiving ESU scholarships to British universities in 2013
Over 250 attended The Culture Project Commemorative gala
naming ceremony for its newly christened Lynn Redgrave Theater in honor of the late Ms. Redgrave.
Governor of Massachusetts Deval Patrick backstage with Jacob's Pillow Executive
New York City Ballet star Wendy Whelan
soloist with the Martha Graham Dance Company Lloyd Knight
Governor of Massachusetts Deval Patrick backstage with 2013 Jacob's Pillow Dance Award Winner Michelle Dorrance
Lloyd Knight in Martha Graham's Canticle for Innocent Comedians
Jacob's Pillow Director of Education J.R. Glover
The School at Jacob's Pillow Jazz/Musical Theatre Program Director
choreographer of PIPPIN Chet Walker
Jacob's Pillow Board member Wendy McCain
Jacob's Pillow Director of Preservation Norton Owen
Pillow supporters Lynne Leavitt
Aaron Leavitt with their son Mark Leavitt
husband Nathan Milikowsky
of Board Member Sylvia Pope
husband Jake Meyer with Laura Sinott
son of Sylvia Pope
Jacob's Pillow Board member
Gala Christopher Jones with Jacob's Pillow Board Chair Joan Hunter
Filmmaker installation
video installation
wife
former New York City Ballet Dancer Teresa Reyes
Jacob's Pillow Board Chair Joan Hunter
Claudia Perles with her son Joshua Perles
fiancée Michelle Thorpe
Dance Theatre of Harlem principal dancer Michaela DePrince
Back row: Asya Gribov
Emily Tella. Front row: Megan O'Brien
Guests screenprinting tote bags
Raffle winner Erin Bond
Raffle winner John Fewell
Guests enjoying the clay bar
Guests listen to Nelson Peltz
chief of the Scoliosis Service
Hospital for Special Surgery
surgeon in chief
Hospital for Special Surgery
Brian Williams speak throughout the evening at Hospital for Special Surgery's 30th Annual Tribute Dinner.
chief of the Scoliosis Service
Hospital for Special Surgery
NBC Nightly News anchor
Oheneba Boachie Adjei addresses guests after receiving the Lifetime Achievement Award
surgeon in chief emeritus
Hospital for Special Surgery
chief of the Scoliosis Service
Hospital for Special Surgery
Hospital for Special Surgery
surgeon in chief
Hospital for Special Surgery
HSS trustee
chief of the Scoliosis Service
Hospital for Special Surgery
surgeon in chief
Hospital for Special Surgery
HSS Board of Trustees
HSS Board of Trustees
chief of the Scoliosis Service
Hospital for Special Surgery
co chair Board of Trustees Hospital for Special Surgery
Vice Chairman BlackRock with Cynthia
surgeon in chief
Hospital for Special Surgery
David Levine with Marina Kellen French
surgeon in chief
Hospital for Special Surgery
co chair Board of Trustees Hospital for Special Surgery
HSS Board of Trustees
Hospital for Special Surgery
co chair Board of Trustees Hospital for Special Surgery
Dinner Co Chair Alan MacDonald with Patti Roberts
Shoulder Service co chief
Hospital for Special Surgery
with his wife Anne Altchek
Shoulder Service co chief
Hospital for Special Surgery
with his wife Anne Altchek
Hospital for Special Surgery
Dinner Co Chair Kathryn Chenault with Chairman Emeritus
HSS Board of Trustees
God's Love We Deliver Board member Margaret Russell
friends
andPeter Lichtenthal
Co- of WIZO USA
Founding of WIZO USA
Chair of WIZO NY
Co- of WIZO USA
Chair of WIZO NY
Co- of WIZO USA
Chiu-ti Jansen
Stephanie Loeffler at a private event at Michael Kors Madison Avenue store for members of the Couture Council of The Museum at FIT.
Public Theater Chairman of the Board Warren Spector
friend
friend
friend
husband Michael Corcoran
NYC Commissioner of the Department of Cultural Affairs Kate Levin
Eric Idle during the curtain call of The Pirates of Penzance
the company of The Pirates of Penzance
Chiu-ti Jansen
Guests congregate on the Wethersfield Estate in Millbrook
Ling Kwan serenade
friend
Crowd watching the Millbrook Hunt approaching Wethersfield
Members of the Millbrook Hunt
her daughter
Marion de Vogel moments before the show
Finale with founders
designers
Members of the Ball Committee: Kimberly Bancroft
Nassau Community College 'flappers' welcome guests Jed Morey
with Board Member Harvey Manes
Members of the Ball Committee: Judie Chessin
co-chairs of the Ball's Journal Committee
Ball Chairman Angela Susan Anton show off a congratulatory proclamation from the county
Museum supporters George Machin
Nancy DeMatteis with Arlene Levine
Museum Director Karl Willers with Susan Isaksen
Museum supporters Jacob
Esther Ambalu with Board Member Corky Paston
Jacque Reid with Hailey
two furry sisters who are in need of a loving home.
Jacque Reid with Hailey
two furry sisters who are in need of a loving home.
Jacque Reid with Hailey
two furry sisters who are in need of a loving home.
Georgina’s faithful companion
Georgina’s faithful companion
Georgina’s faithful companion
Chairman of Bideawee’s Board of Directors
Chairman of Bideawee’s Board of Directors
Chairman of Bideawee’s Board of Directors
Diana Langer holding Stanley Sweetheart
behind her Sandrina Parker
Barbara Kraisman with Sadie.
Diana Langer holding Stanley Sweetheart
behind her Sandrina Parker
Barbara Kraisman with Sadie.
Diana Langer holding Stanley Sweetheart
behind her Sandrina Parker
Barbara Kraisman with Sadie.
Todd Richter with Henry. Henry’s days were numbered in a shelter when Bideawee got hold of him. He now leads an enviably posh life
couldn’t be more loved.
Todd Richter with Henry. Henry’s days were numbered in a shelter when Bideawee got hold of him. He now leads an enviably posh life
couldn’t be more loved.
Todd Richter with Henry. Henry’s days were numbered in a shelter when Bideawee got hold of him. He now leads an enviably posh life
couldn’t be more loved.
Fashion designer Maggie Norris.
Fashion designer Maggie Norris.
Fashion designer Maggie Norris.
Larry Goldfarb with Biggie.
Larry Goldfarb with Biggie.
Larry Goldfarb with Biggie.
Maura Rose with Alfie.
Maura Rose with Alfie.
Maura Rose with Alfie.
Kim Valentini with Charlie
Kim Valentini with Charlie
Kim Valentini with Charlie
Cookie holding on to Wolfie.
Cookie holding on to Wolfie.
Cookie holding on to Wolfie.
Kristen Martinez Jones with their lovable pooch.
Kristen Martinez Jones with their lovable pooch.
Kristen Martinez Jones with their lovable pooch.
Stacy McCosky with Sadie.
Stacy McCosky with Sadie.
Stacy McCosky with Sadie.
The scene at Gotham Hall.
The scene at Gotham Hall.
The scene at Gotham Hall.
Georgina Bloomberg at the podium invoking Bideawee’s 110-year history
multiple programs
services.
Georgina Bloomberg at the podium invoking Bideawee’s 110-year history
multiple programs
services.
Georgina Bloomberg at the podium invoking Bideawee’s 110-year history
multiple programs
services.
A good time was had by all dancing to the sounds of the Alex Donner Orchestra.
A good time was had by all dancing to the sounds of the Alex Donner Orchestra.
A good time was had by all dancing to the sounds of the Alex Donner Orchestra.
Cutting loose on the dance floor.
Cutting loose on the dance floor.
Cutting loose on the dance floor.
Everyone has a place at the table.
Everyone has a place at the table.
Everyone has a place at the table.
Toby Usnik at The Municipal Art Society's annual benefit gala.
Brian del Toro
Annemarie diSalvo
Weeksville Heritage Center’s new Certified LEED Gold Sustainable Education
with Eva Longoria
Weeksville Heritage Center’s new Certified LEED Gold Sustainable Education
Executive Director Pamela Green addresses guests in Weeksville’s new Education
Guests attend the 12th Annual “Save The Memories of Self” Awards Benefit in Weeksville’s new Education
Guests attend the 12th Annual “Save The Memories of Self” Awards Benefit
National Grid for New York Ken Daly receives award from Executive Director of the Weeksville Heritage Center Pamela Green
editor-in-chief of Brides Magazine
WABC-TV Anchor Lori Stokes with daughter Alex who performed at the awards benefit
editor-in-chief of Brides Magazine
WABC-TV Anchor Lori Stokes with daughter Alex who performed at the awards benefit
National Grid for New York Ken Daly
Executive Director of the Weeksville Heritage Center Pamela Green
Associate Counsel for JetBlue Airways Brandon Nelson
Guests in front of the three remaining historic Weeksville houses
Brooklyn Borough Marty Markowitz with Executive Director of the Weeksville Heritage Center Pamela Green
The ballroom at 583 Park
East Harlem Dreamers with Nancy Restrepo Wilson
East Harlem Dreamers with Thierry Cazeau
Eugene Lang with DeHostos-Wise Dreamers
Alec Baldwin at the New York Philharmonic's Spring Gala benefit.
Table decor by Van Vliet
Cocktails in the Theodore Roosevelt Rotunda
former Citi Chairman
current Senior Advisor of Providence Equity LLC Richard Parsons
Dinner in the Milstein Hall of Ocean Life
The table centerpieces
emcee Melissa Francis
AIS Clinical Director Heather Grossman with AIS client speakers
Arthur Blank with Angie Macuga
friends
friend
Mount Sinai Greening Our Children Benefit Luncheon Men's Committee: Carl Zuckerberg
Fresh Air Fund's annual "Salute to American Heroes" at Pier Sixty
Assistant Head of School Michael Williams
Faculty member James Amodeo
Trustee Michael Stubbs with Franz Skryanz
Storefront Artist in Residence Matthias Leutrum
Storefront parent Al Gumbs
Head of School Wendy Reynoso
Storefront parent Shareen Gumbs
Director of H.S. Placement
Assistant to the Head of School Leah Lescouflair
Dean of Students Mel Chan with Storefront Faculty Joe Brenner
Honorees from the Morgan Stanley Black Employees Networking Group Bianca Smith
Honoree Magnolia Jones with Trustee Christine LaSala
Alex Nunez with friends
Barbara Tober Susan Crile listens to audio coming out of backpack
Susan Crile listens to audio coming out of backpack
Under the tent for the Wildlife Conservation Society's annual gala at the Central Park Zoo.
and Liz Tang
and Liz Tang
friend
friend
friend
Under the tent at The Conservatory Ball's "An Evening in the Italian Renaissance Garden of Padua" at the New York Botanical Garden.
guest
guest
Carlos de la Prado
Carlos de la Prado
Tony Marx addresses guests at NYPL's Spring Dinner for Education.
wife Sondra
Martin Shafiroff in one of the designer showrooms
Vincent Piazza with Co-Chairs for Kick Off to Summer Benefit Fund
Chairman of the Board of Directors of the Benefit Fund
Director of Development at Benefit Fund
Member of Junior Committee of Board of Directors of Benefit Fund
Vice Chair for Kick Off to Summer Benefit
Vice Chairs for Kick Off to Summer Benefit Michael Lawler
Member of Board of Directors of Benefit Fund
Director of Development at Benefit Fund
Member of Junior Committee of Board of Directors of Benefit Fund
Member of Junior Committee of Board of Directors of Benefit Fund
Member of Board of Directors of Benefit Fund
Vice of Special Events for Benefit Fund
Chairman of Benefit Fund
Director of Development of Benefit Fund
Treasurer of Benefit Fund
member of Executive Committee
Board of Directors of Benefit Fund
The dinner scene at New York Restoration Project's 12th Annual Spring Picnic.
The table settings
Teal Kraus with friends
Crowd during sing-along
Darcy Stacom at far right
The scene of Soane's Museum Foundation Gala
While dining
the 260 guests were treated to a pictorial projection on the stage curtain of more than 100 architectural vistas that represented the spectrum of the Soane's lifework.
friends
Foster of Thames Bank OM
The debutantes at the 72nd Annual Bal des Berceaux: Alexandra Giessen
Louise Bonnel. Front row: Emeline de Narp
Barbara Ostrom with "Webster"
Barbara Washkowitz with "Boschie"
Designer Barbara Ostrom in her room themed "Dan Rattiner's Reading Room"
Barbara Ostrom with Elizabeth Dow
Bradley Geist with "Gigot"
de Narp families
Volbrechthausen families
Countess Caroline de Ravel d'Esclapon
and Mehmet Oz
guest
friend
The Chater family
friend
The post-ceremony reception
honoree Avital Sharansky
Singer/songwriter Regina Spektor
Award winners
Jamie Niven at The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center Special Projects Committee's Annual Dinner.
Sean Rowland flies a kite with his Dad
Sean Rowland flies a kite with his Dad
Volunteers from Grace Presbyterian Church
A landscape by Stephen Hannock
There were 262 guests in attendance
with Donald Levy
of The Levy Group
Chairman of the THANC Foundation
Nyssa Kourakos at Playground Partners Annual Family Party.
Hartley duPont
August duPont
Paul duPont
August duPont
August duPont
Hospital for Special Surgery
the number one hospital for orthopedics in the nation
celebrated its 150-year legacy of excellence on Thursday
with a landmark anniversary event at The Metropolitan Museum of Art. This social event was one of a series of activities marking the 150th anniversary of the founding of the Hospital
surgeon-in-chief
Hospital for Special Surgery addresses guests
surgeon-in-chief
Hospital for Special Surgery;
surgeon-in-chief emeritus
Hospital for Special Surgery;
surgeon-in-chief
Hospital for Special Surgery
co-chair Board of Trustees Hospital for Special Surgery
Vinay Bansal with Manjula Bansal
Harlan Amstutz with Paula Root
pediatric orthopedics chief emeritus
Hospital for Special Surgery
surgeon-in-chief emeritus
Hospital for Special Surgery
with Kim Callaghan
with Antonella
Hospital for Special Surgery Trustee Susan Rose
with Elihu Rose;
Shoulder Service co-chief
Hospital for Special Surgery;
Hospital for Special Surgery
Kirby Chair of Orthopedic Biomechanics at Hospital for Special Surgery
surgeon-in-chief
Hospital for Special Surgery
his fiancé Elizabeth Morris
with Cynthia
surgeon-in-chief
Hospital for Special Surgery;
her husband Trevor Gibbons
Tanenbaum Peacemaker in Action Hind Kabawat
Tanenbaum’s managing director of programs
accepting the Philanthropic Bridge-Builder Award on behalf of FJC
Tanenbaum Peacemaker in Action Ephraim Isaac
recipient of a special Tanenbaum award
Tanenbaum Peacemaker in Action Ephraim Isaac
recipient of a special Tanenbaum award
Los Angeles series regular Barrett Foa
Tanenbaum Peacemaker in Action Yehezkel Landau
Tanenbaum Peacemaker in Action Yehezkel Landau
The Adam Solomon Award for Excellence recipient Yvonne Brathwaite
Gala attendees bidding during Tanenbaum’s Balloon Drive
guests
Komen Greater NYC's 2013-14 grantees
Betsey Johnson landed in a split after her signature cartwheel while accepting her award
Suffering from laryngitis
Betsey Johnson thanks Komen Greater NYC for her Survivor Award with the help of a handmade sign
Komen Greater NYC's Grants
Policy &amp
Education Chair Ivy Gamble Cobb presents the Grantee of the Year Award to Marissa Mais
Program Director of the YWCA White Plains &amp
Central Westchester's Encore Plus
Compassionate Care honoree Patrick I. Borgen
Survivor honoree Betsey Johnson
Former Betsey Johnson Chantal Bacon presented the Survivor Award to longtime business partner Betsey Johnson
Susan G. Komen founder Amb. Nancy G. Brinker
Komen Greater NYC Board member Sandra L. Kozlowski
Komen founder Amb. Nancy G. Brinker
presenter cancer
breast cancer survivor Theresa Lana
Compassionate Care honoree Patrick I. Borgen
guest Bo Dietl
Survivor Award honoree fashion designer Betsey Johnson
Luncheon co-chairs Nikki Tippins
former Betsey Johnson Chantal Bacon
Survivor Award honoree fashion designer Betsey Johnson
Susan G. Komen founder Amb. Nancy G. Brinker
Award presenters Theresa Lana
Eric Brinker flank Compassionate Care Award honoree Patrick I. Borgen
Survivor Award honoree fashion designer Betsey Johnson
Susan G. Komen founder Amb. Nancy G. Brinker
her daughter Alessandra wearing Betsey Johnson with Survivor Award honoree fashion designer Betsey Johnson
Komen Greater NYC Board member Amy Tsui Luke
Board Chair Laila Worrell surround Survivor Award honoree fashion designer Betsey Johnson
The dance floor at El Museo del Barrio's annual Gala.
Agatha Ruiz de la Prada
Agatha Ruiz de la Prada
Ramiro Ortíz ga
Ramiro Ortíz ga
Berry Gordy with the cast of Motown
Dancing along with the Drake Irish Dancers
Back row: Erwin Newell
Front row: Enid Silver
The scene at Doubles at its 37th anniversary celebration.
honorees Willis De La Cour
family
Descending the stairs to Doubles
guests
Members of Damayan Migrant Workers Association
New York City Schools Chancellor Dennis Walcott chats with students
Chairman of
of Xerox Corporation with Kim Standish at the NAF Benefit. Kim
her husband Mark Standish were honored at the event.
Sandy Weill with student speaker Josuel Placencia
of
Chairman of Willis Group Holdings chats with NAF Board Member
NAF board members Jim Robinson
of American Express
with students
of the National Academy Foundation
with Lowell McAdam
Chairman of
of Verizon Communications
of the KPMG Foundation chats with students
Vice-Chair of Overseers of Weill-Cornell Medical College
chats with a student
of Financial Services for Capital One
chats with a student from the A.J. Moore High School's Academy of Finance
Sharon Greenberger at the 12th Annual Women Who Care Luncheon benefitting United Cerebral Palsy of New York City.
Governor Andrew Cuomo speaking
Keynote Speaker Booker meets Madison's four Youth of the Year
Boys &amp
Girls Club of America Jim Clark
D'onte Reid
D'onte Reid
Madison Square Boys &amp
Girls Club Youth of the Year Aieyla Santaella
Madison Square Boys &amp
Girls Club Youth of the Year Adah Hill
Champion of Youth Howard Muser
D'onte Reid
Head of School Wendy Reynoso
Dean of Students Mel Chan with Storefront Faculty Candace Cardwell
friends
Co-chair Bob Rylee
Royal Bank of Canada
co-workers
The Grand Ballroom at The Plaza designed by David Monn at Orchestra of St. Luke’s annual Gift of Music gala.
Paul Appleby perform
The Grand Ballroom at The Plaza
Master of Ceremonies David Hyde Pierce
Josie Natori with Principal Conductor Pablo Heras Casado
BCNY Musicians performing
Tom Raibaldi with Living Legends' Honoree Pauli
working Guide Dog
Head of Oncology
Head of Oncology
Matt with
Michel with Magik the Cat - Living Legends' Honoree
Isabella the Dachushund - Living Legends' Honoree
guest
guest
Mariachi Flor de Toloache—New York City’s “only all-female mariachi band”
Leymah Gbowee addresses the crowd
NYU Langone Medical Center's 2013 Violet Ball honoring Lori
Carmen Marc Valvo fashion
LaShonda Reese with Mike Herman Band
Kelly King with Mike Herman Band
Bay Bryan with Mike Herman Band
Jason Liebman with Mike Herman Band
American Patrons co-chairs
Masterpiece London organizers at the New York kick-off reception for Masterpiece London.
lyssa Urban
andEllie Cullman
The tent in the Conservatory Garden of Central Park
Donny Deutsch with Elana Drell-Szyfer
James Andrew at Lighthouse International's "POSH Affair."
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
a festive celebration of the Spring Show NYC.
Head of School Wendy Reynoso
Storefront Students greeting Trustee Amanda Low
guests
emcee Kemberly Richardson
Storefront students
his wife
The Grand Ballroom of The Pierre
Her Majesty Queen Sonja entering the Grand Ballroom escorted by ASF Edward Gallagher
with H.E. Consul Sissel Breie
ASF Chairman Bente Svensen Frantz accompanying them
Her Majesty Queen Sonja entering the Grand Ballroom escorted by ASF Edward Gallagher
with H.E. Consul Sissel Breie
ASF Chairman Bente Svensen Frantz accompanying them
Arthur Zeckendorf with Anne Detwiler
MoMA Director Glenn Lowry with ASF Trustee Richard E. Oldenburg
The evening’s Master of Ceremonies
Margaret Juntwait with ASF Executive Vice Lynn Carter
Victor B. Borge with his wife
Lisa Resling Halpern with Malena Belafonte
her husband
Cocktails were served on an overlook terrace
between a pair of wooden pergolas
Her Royal Highness The Crown Princess Margarita of Romania
His Royal Highness Prince Radu of Romania
College Cadets at The Versailles/Claude Monet Giverny Foundation Black Tie Benefit Dinner.
Leucothée by Joseph Rayol
Ino &amp
Marble Group by Pierre Gravier
Her Royal Highness The Crown Princess Margarita of Romania
His Royal Highness Prince Radu of Romania
Her Serene Highness Princess Jeannette zu Fürstenberg
His Serene Highness Prince Christian zu Fürstenburg
Her Royal Highness The Crown Princess Margarita of Romania
His Royal Highness Prince Radu of Romania
His Royal Highness Prince Radu of Romania
Her Royal Highness The Crown Princess Margarita of Romania
escort
Prince Radu of Romania
Prince Radu of Romania
Carroll Petrie's granddaughter
Carroll Petrie's granddaughter
DPC with Her Royal Highness
the Crown Princess Margarita of Romania
Her Serene Highness Princess Jeannette zu Fürstenberg
Her Serene Highness Princess Jeannette zu Fürstenberg
Lorna Graev addresses the guests at Fountain House's 10th Annual Symposium
Peter Regna with Frances Shelton
Sculptures by Charles Johnson
Booth by PAGODA RED
Booth by BOB
Booth by JEFFREY HENKEL
Booth by TELESCOPES OF VERMONT
The fireworks display in Central Park was enjoyed by nearly 1
500 guests from their hosts' windows at "Central to Spring: Cocktails on the Park" to benefit the Central Park Conservancy.
Taking in the fireworks display at the Carson residence
Taking in the fireworks display at the Schafer residence
On the terrace of the Scurry residence
Sadie Sink singing for the guests
Eleni's red tulip cookies
Lunch in the Milstein Hall of Ocean Life for AMNH's 23rd Annual Spring Environmental Lecture
Panel discussion in the LeFrak IMAX Theater
Chair Claire Bernard addressing the lunch
chairs Connie Spahn
with moderator Lynn Sherr
friends
friends
Peter Lyden with chairs Connie Spahn
friend
friend
Guests with Artist JosÃ© ParlÃ¡
friends
Jaime Rojo of Brooklyn Street Art
Artist Patrick Miller of FAILE
cast fiberglass
69 x 84.5 x 36 inches
cast fiberglass
69 x 84.5 x 36 inches
The scene at The Breast Cancer Research Foundation's annual Hot Pink Party
Elizabeth Smart speaks to the guests
Krishna &amp;amp
Megan Hilty performs at Tiffany &amp
Co.'s Blue Book Ball at Rockefeller Center.
Tiffany &amp
Sha Xiao-li
Jazz man Brian Newman
gang
Dinner in the Rotunda
Dancing in the Milstein Hall of Ocean Life
Dinner in the Theodore Roosevelt Rotunda
Andrea Wortmann with a friend
Kipp deVeer
Colleen deVeer
friend
H.I.H. the Prince Napoleon
Aeyung Park-deMelo
Anne de la Gueronniere
Anne de la Gueronniere
The dinner scene at Whitney Museum of American Art's 22nd Annual American Art Award.
Elisabeth von Thurn und Taxis
Dinner on the promenade of The David H. Koch Theater
A special performance by members of the Kips Bay Boys &amp
Girls Club of "In the Heights"
P ieter van den Berg
Susie van den Berg
P ieter van den Berg
Susie van den Berg
The dance floor at the 16th Annual ASPCA Bergh Ball.
friend
William &amp
The dance floor at New Yorkers for Children's Tenth Annual Spring Dinner Dance - "A Fool's Fete."
Eva Lorenzotti from the back
Veteran newsman Harry Smith introduces the young skaters of Figure Skating in Harlem
FSH Founder Sharon Cohen introduces Gala Chairs Ellen Lowey
Rising stars of Figure Skating in Harlem at the 2013 Skating with the Stars Gala
Johnny Weir take to the ice at the 2013 Skating with the Stars Gala
Skating legends Sasha Cohen
Scott Hamilton at the 2013 Skating with the Stars Gala
Vera Wang with FSH Honoree
Skating legends Sasha Cohen
Scott Hamilton at the 2013 Skating with the Stars Gala
Vera Wang with FSH Honoree
Figure Skating in Harlem Founder Sharon Cohen
Mistress of Ceremonies Tamara Tunie with B. Michael
B. Michael with Event Chairs Kathryn
Star Jones with Gala Co-Chairs Tina Lundgren
family
Co-chair William J. Constantine
Co-chair William J. Constantine
wife Lisa G. Anderson
Pierce Bush at Hale House's 2013 Spring Gala.
Jack deLashmet
friend
Michael Alex Shuman with their children
Cocktails at the annual International Women's Health Coalition gala.
her Dixon Boardman
her Dixon Boardman
Elisabeth von Thurn und Taxis
Elisabeth von Thurn und Taxis
Ballet Hispanico performance ...
Prince Zeid Ra'ad Zeid Al-Hussein
Prince Zeid Ra'ad Zeid Al-Hussein
Guests participate in private curator-led tour
Curator Danielle Kisluk-Grosheide leads exhibition tour
FHS Board member Ann Van Ness
FHS Chairman of the Board Elizabeth Stribling
FHS Boston Chapter Co-Chairman François Bardonnet views exhibition
FHS Board member Ann Van Ness
FHS Board member Jean Shafiroff
Dinner scene from Save Venice's Black &amp
Hannah Bronfman DJ-ing
friends
his girls
Bernardo Lopes da Costa
Gary Springer pays homage to Judy Gilbert
Suzanna Bowling displays the famous Rappaport Ties
director Anna
designer Lutfi Yilmaz
Actress Nora Davis sang
Geoffrey Bradfield at Monique Van Vooren's birthday celebration
Guests at the Third Annual Fountain House Associates Spring Breakfast.
Ladies in fuchsia
pink
red at Bunky Cushing's Valentine's Tea
Guests mingle at Hospital for Special Surgery's "Your Life In Motion" VIP event at The Breakers in Palm Beach
Surgeon-in-Chief
Chief of the Spinal Surgical Service at Hospital for Special Surgery's Spine Care Institute
addresses guests
Leading experts from the #1 orthopedic hospital in the U.S.
Hospital for Special Surgery
give advice on orthopedics
physiatry in panel discussion
Guests listen to a panel of leading experts from the #1 orthopedic hospital in the U.S.
Diane Bailey with Vicki Kellogg
Laurie Warren with Virginia Pellicci
Diane Bailey with Vicki Kellogg
Laurie Warren with Virginia Pellicci
his wife Katharine with Jodi Myers
her husband John
Jr. with Mary Kay Farley
James Hauslein with Annabelle Garrett
Jr. with Mary Kay Farley
James Hauslein with Annabelle Garrett
Louis Shapiro with Susan Fazio
her husband Thomas
Surgeon-in-Chief at Hospital for Special Surgery
Darrah Gleason with Bill Ford
Darrah Gleason with Bill Ford
The MAD scene for the opening of the "After the Museum" exhibition.
Interim Director David Gordon in the Barbara Tober Grand Atrium of the Museum of Arts &amp
Curator Lowery Stokes Sims with Silas Kopf
MAD's Interim Director David Gordon
curator Jake Yuzna
MAD's Interim Director David Gordon
Chiu ti Jansen
Chiu ti Jansen
Exec VP of AS
Exec VP of AS
Ralph Lauren table/entrance
Executive Director of DIFFA Felecia Web
Patron display
Parsons The New School for Design
New York School of Interior Design
Tina Green &amp
James Magni for Profile
Interior Design Magazine-design by Ali Taylor
&amp
Eric Warner for Tracy Reese
Members of The Perlman Music Program
Musicians perform for a rapt audience
The Randall's Island Park Alliance hosted its Fielding Dreams NYC Gala at the American Museum of Natural History
Victor Cruz with a group of children
staff from the Casita Maria Center
Gala cocktail reception inside the American Museum of Natural History
friend
Dan Panitz with Guest
Auction tables
Jeannette Watson. The Glad Girls are the Park Avenue version of the Supremes goes The Chordettes;
they can rock!
Dinning room at Swifty's art opening
Patricia Attoe with artist Ana Guerra
Drew Perry at The School of American Ballet's 2013 WINTER BALL
sponsored by Van Cleef &amp
Chuck Close with the New York Observer group
Boys' Club Women's Board Sara Ayres with Luncheon Co-Chairs Alexia Hamm Ryan
Lourdes Fanjul at the Brazilian Court in Palm Beach.
A presentation of Salvatore Ferragamo's women's Spring/Summer 2013
Dining Room with Salvatore Ferragamo gift bags
SUS Donna Colonna giving remarks
Donna Colonna holding keys to 2013 Toyota Prius Plug-in
Andrew Zimmern holding hors d'oeuvres
Chef Jamie Bissonnette preparing hors d'oeuvres while Chef Marc Forgione looks on
Chef Masaharu Morimoto preparing food
Chef Johnny Iuzzini preparing dessert for guests
of SUS
with SUS Board of Directors
Donna Colonna with SUS executive staff
Grace Hightower De Niro toasting with other attendees
of SUS
Chairman of the SUS Board of Directors
pianist
SUS Donna Colonna enjoying dinner with fellow guests
Alina Cho celebrating a birthday party for all their Pisces friends.
friend
The scene at Darren Henault's
Jeremy O'shea
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
The scene at FAO Schwarz Fifth Avenue for The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center's 22nd Annual Bunny Hop with Tiffany &amp
family
family
family
Fountain Gallery Artist Gail Shamchenko with Margaret Baker
the Black Velvet Band
and Lucy Yang
Contributing artist Jason Rohlf
Elena Brower bidding on art
BIG Night Out was held on Saturday
February 23rd at Cipriani Wall Street
former site of New York Stock Exchange
BBBS of NYC's Young Professionals Committee Executive Board
Sub-Committee members
Waiters greeted guests with Bellinis
Cipriani's signature drink
Guests had the chance to bid on nearly 70 silent auction packages
Waiters greeted guests with Bellinis
Cipriani's signature drink
Guests had the chance to bid on nearly 70 silent auction packages
Karla Esleeck is joined by Skeery Jones from Elvis Duran
the Z100 Morning Show to welcome guests
promote a text to pledge campaign
Jennifer Hoppe with YPC Sub-Committee members Frank Pena
DJ Mode spun while guests danced the night away
YPC members Christie Connick
DJ Mode spun while guests danced the night away
YPC members Christie Connick
BBBS of NYC Trustee
James Rapp with YPC members Lindsey Bornstein
founder of POKERprimaDIVAS
YPC BIG Night Out event chairs
Charity casino games included craps
black jack
roulette
where guests could play to win amazing raffle prizes
Guests place their bets at one of event's blackjack tables
In addition to a Texas Hold 'Em Poker Tournament
guests could learn how to play poker at the POKERprimaDIVAS tutorial table
The Park Avenue Armory during Purim Ball 2013: Who Wears the Crown? Décor by David Stark Design
Lena Dunham performing the Purimspiel
The Breakers practice green laid out with the five hole putting contest
The ninth annual Adults in Toyland: Casino Gaming for a Cause at The Plaza Hotel.
Event Co-chairs Anne-Marie Embiricos
Amanda Low with friends
The Moore family
Head of School Wendy Reynoso
Assistant Head of School Michael Williams
daughter Eliza Kimball
friend
Co-chair Amanda Low
Lydia Fenet starts the auction with a Red Cross Backpack
Heli Blum with her winning bid for Judith Ripka necklace
Over 100 garden lovers came to look at the Jay Estate to learn how they can help at its 1st Annual Hort Lunch.
John Jay wellies!
Wellies decorated by Luncheon Co-Organizer Chris Duncan
We love our new Hort Lunch logo created by Pete Thomas
Karen Thomas talks with Mark Streiter
Shaun Duncan on the Jay veranda
Karen Thomas with her brother Jim Kelsey
Karen Thomas with her brother Jim Kelsey
landscape designer Larry Weaner
Board Member Lauren Fogarty with June Price
I Have A Voice at 48 Lounge
Michele Heary from de Grisogono
Margo dePeyster
Margo dePeyster
Margo dePeyster
Margo dePeyster
Post-concert at the Russian Team Room for Carnegie Hall's Golden Ticket event.
Le Cirque's Stella Room
Le Cirque's Central to Spring Cake
Princess Maria Pia of Savoy
Prince Michel of Bourbon-Parma
Princess Maria Pia of Savoy
Prince Michel of Bourbon-Parma
friend
The Feb 19th Opening Reception for Creativity Workshops
a new program that invites teens to engage in a creative project designed with an artist showcased 25 local students art designed at this month's premier 2 hour workshop at the Child Mind Institute.
Guests of the Child Mind Institute gathered at the Journal Gallery in Williamsburg
Brooklyn for the Feb 19th Opening Reception for Creativity Workshops
a new program that invites teens to engage in a creative project designed with an artist.
Goodie bags were provided by Marc Jacobs. LaCava collaborated with Marc Jacobs on an accessories line inspired by her book with proceeds benefiting the Child Mind Institute.
Louis B. Mayer on the MGM studio lot in 1930.
Louis B. Mayer presenting Helen Hayes her 1932 Oscar for Best Actress in The Sin of Madelon Claudet. Irving Thalberg
his wife Norma Shearer
Louis B. Mayer on the MGM lot in Culver City.
Louis B. Mayer presenting Helen Hayes her 1932 Oscar for Best Actress in The Sin of Madelon Claudet. Irving Thalberg
his wife Norma Shearer
Louis B. Mayer on the MGM lot in Culver City.
Louis B. Mayer presenting Helen Hayes her 1932 Oscar for Best Actress in The Sin of Madelon Claudet.
his wife Norma Shearer
Louis B. Mayer on the MGM lot in Culver City.
Swifty with Elizabeth Taylor at his party.
Swifty with Elizabeth Taylor at his party.
Swifty with Elizabeth Taylor at his party.
Clockwise from left: Lazar with Joan Collins
Clockwise from left: Lazar with Joan Collins
Clockwise from left: Lazar with Joan Collins
Madonna arriving.
Wolfgang Puck in his restaurant with some of the menu for the Lazar party.
Wolfgang Puck in his restaurant with some of the menu for the Lazar party.
Wolfgang Puck in his restaurant with some of the menu for the Lazar party.
Franois-Henri Pinault
Cocktails at the Museum of the City of New York's annual Winter Ball at the Pierre.
Nai-Ni Chen Dance Company Dragon Dance on Josie Robetson Plaza
Long Yu conducts the Snow Lotus Trio with the NY Philharmonic
the NY Philharmonic
New York Philharmonic leadership
philanthropists behind the Chinese New Year Gala
with their families
the Nai-Ni Chen Dance Company
Snow Lotus Trio with Sanford Prater
The candy table
Kim Coleman with Reese
Kim Coleman with Reese
Penn Museum at CommonBond's launch gala to benefit KIPP Philadelphia Schools.
FAPE Board member Agnes Gund
artist Ursula von Rydingsvard
artist Joel Shapiro
VIP lounge
VIP lounge area wtih commissioned artwork by Jesse Geller
Gathering of Queens of Hearts
Little boy
sculpture
curator Bernice Steinbaum
the Queens of Hearts
curator Bernice Steinbaum
the Queens of Hearts
KIPP Philadelphia friends
The Drama League's Board at its 2013 Musical Celebration of Broadway.
Master Sommelier Scott Carney with Jacques Torres
Alexandre Hammoudi at "Creating the Dance with Marcelo Gomes.”
The U.S. Marine Corps color guard
Rumbough family
Rumbough family
from Singapore
Neiman Marcus fashion show models
Neiman Marcus fashion show models
The Associates Committee of The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center's 5th Annual Associates Luncheon at Saks Fifth Avenue.
The luncheon guests
Deb dancing
Escort dancing
Dignitary procession led by Renate Brauner
Post-midnight dancing
Artistic Director of the Vienna City Ballet
of Belgium to the UN
Jan Grauls with Ms. Chiu Ti Jansen
EU Head of Delegation to the UN
and Melvin J. Sturman
Ludmila Komissarova with friend
Austrian Ambasador to the UN
escort
Marquelon Ingram with her escort
friends
The cocktail reception at Cipriani Wall Street
The scene at The Vault at Pfaffs
JKO student
Students from the JKO School
Two pieces by Kevin Baker
the Davis Family
Designers at
Models at
friends
Sarah Coulson greeted guests with the Philadelphia Orchestra
The Academy of Music
Representing Wells Fargo were Senior Vice-
with her husband Jack
daughter Elisa
his wife Dolores
his wife Veronica
her husband Frank Coulson III
her husband Frank Coulson III
his wife
his wife
attended with Fred Hagen
Daisy Prince with Library Anthony W. Marx
Attendees enjoyed musical performances throughout the event
A happy attendee
One of the festive performers at the event
The Library Shop was transformed into Booklandia
where children listened to stories
The Shields of the Shire craft station
The Hats in the Belfry craft station
Attendees watched puppet shows in the DeWitt Wallace Periodical Room
Samba dancing ...
Annabelle Snow at a "Passport Through American History" at the New-York Historical Society.
Will Ellis as GI Joe
Stacy Baron as Cornelia Von Varick
Tyrone Dennis as James McEwan
BAM’s Lepercq Space outfitted in décor by Fleurs Bella
playwright Lynn Nottage
Film actor Isaach De Bankolé
Film actor Isaach De Bankolé
wife Katherine Borowitz
cast member William Nadylan
Cast members Rikki Henry
Cast members Rikki Henry
The Opening Night of the 59th Annual Winter Antiques Show benefiting East Side House Settlement.
Debra del Vecchio
Claudio del Vecchio
Champagne reception
Dinner in Per Se’s private dining room
A standing ovation for PMP violinists
Auctioneer Michael Troise in action
Bill Bakula with lucky Paddle No. 1
Battling paddles during the live auction
Katie Banser of Christie’s
Katie Banser of Christie’s
Bari Goldmacher withThomas
Budapest Festival Orchestra's Great Performers series dinner on the promenade of Avery Fisher Hall.
Ivan Fischer blowing out his birthday candles
friend
Honored for her Support in Rebuilding the Museum
view from the Pavilion.
Princess Alia arrives for the reception at The Colony. During the 1970s
Princess Alia's the late King Hussein of Jordan often visited Palm Beach as a guest of Jim Kimberly. The king's eldest daughter
Princess Alia maintains the family's presence in Palm Beach.
Azzedine Downes was recently appointed of IFAW
having previously served as the organization's executive vice . Downes is credited with establishing IFAW's bureau in Dubai where he designed
implemented a Prevention of Wildlife Trade Program which has since trained more than 1
600 enforcement officers in 30 countries.
Princess Alia arrives for the reception at The Colony. During the 1970s
Princess Alia's the late King Hussein of Jordan often visited Palm Beach as a guest of Jim Kimberly. The king's eldest daughter
Princess Alia maintains the family's presence in Palm Beach.
Azzedine Downes was recently appointed of IFAW
having previously served as the organization's executive vice . Downes is credited with establishing IFAW's bureau in Dubai where he designed
implemented a Prevention of Wildlife Trade Program which has since trained more than 1
600 enforcement officers in 30 countries.
her husband Mohammed Al-Saleh. Princess Alia's half-brother is His Majesty King Abdullah II of Jordan.
IFAW vice for philanthropy
IFAW director the Emergency Relief Program
Princess Alia spoke eloquently about how important it is for the betterment of humanity to protect the world's wildlife.
Azzedine Downes formalize the agreement between Jordan
the International Fund for Animal Welfare.
The 47 women of distinction at the 58th Anniversary of the International Debutante Ball.
Mark Rodeo – It's been a long night
Mehmet Oz with his wife
his wife
Executive Director of the David Lynch Foundation
his wife
Deborah. Upon retiring from a 22-year career as a law-enforcement first-responder
Michael began suffering from post-traumatic stress disorder. He
his wife spoke movingly to the assembled crowd about how TM has helped him recover from PTSD when other therapies failed.
Liv Tyler answering questions about TM to the press.
Adrien Daller recording the evening's event for the David Lynch Foundation.
The Children of Armenia Fund's Ninth Annual Holiday Gala in The Temple of Dendur attThe Metropolitan Museum of Art.
Children who traveled to New York from the villages of Armenia where COAF works
Macy's wrote out a check for $400
000 in support of St. Francis Food Pantries
the FOX News team singing New York
a senior at Cardinal Spellman High School
Executive Director of Inner-City Scholarship Fund
Pamela Fiori signs for Kit Pannill
Tea sandwiches!
Honorees at
Performers at Third Street Music School Settlement's 118th Anniversary Luncheon.
USMC Cpl. Aaron Mankin presents bouquet to Christine Rocas
Notables Committee member Adriana Herrera
Notables Committee member James G. Brooks Jr.
Notables co-chair Jimmy Zankel gives opening remarks
friend
The after-party begins at the Empire Hotel Rooftop with music by DJ's Timo
friends
Notables dance the night away
New York City Mission Society Board of Directors
Cocktails at the Mandarin Oriental Hotel for Dubin Breast Center of The Mount Sinai Medical Center's second annual benefit.
Dean of the Mount Sinai School of Medicine
of The Mount Sinai Medical Center
Glenn Dubin presenting award to Perri Peltz
daughter of Eva
of The Breast Cancer Research Foundation
daughter of Paul Tudor Jones II
performing
Event Co chair Lyss Stern
son
Event Co chair Lyss Stern
son
Event Co chairs Sharon Coplan Hurowitz
event Co chair Jacqueline Harris Hochberg
Event Co chair Tara Mark Rosenblum
daughter
Event Co chair Tara Mark Rosenblum
daughter
Event Co chairs Sharon Coplan Hurowitz
Wendy the Pipe Cleaner
Bloomingdale's Holiday Bear
Christine Quinn amd Stephanie LaCava
The table settings at ACRIA's 17th Annual Holiday Dinner at the Stephan Weiss Studio at 711 Greenwich Streeet in the Village.
friend
Shilly were
Shamus were
Executive Director of Animal Haven
Brad Williams who has really gotten into the Boardwalk Empire spirit
Burlesque dancer
Band members from Vince Giordano's Nighthawks
the Gatsby ladies
two bandmembers from Vince Giordano's Nighthawks. I was told that Boardwalk Empire was just renewed for a fourth season
volunteering their time to help out at the event
two Gatsby-esque ladies helping out at the event
Yael Maxwell holding Shilly
Martha Kamberi holding Shamus. Yael
Martha are Animal Haven volunteers. Shilly
Shamus are brother
sister beagle puppies who are up for adoption
Vince Girodano's Nighthawks
Two dancing duos stepping to the beat of Vince Giordano's Nighthawks
Harry Belafonte at The Children’s Defense Fund-New York's annual CDF Beat the Odds® Awards Dinner at the New York Athletic Club.
Teddy bears sponsored by late night guests to be given to children involved in the Leon M. Root
Pediatric Outreach Program at HSS
Unexpected Surfer Boys perform
orthopedic surgeon at Hospital for Special Surgery
Surgeon-in-Chief at Hospital for Special Surgery
his wife Cynthia Sculco
chairperson of the Autumn Benefit with Vivian Cardia
chairperson
co-chair of the Autumn Benefit
chairperson
chair of the Late Night event
Hospital for Special Surgery at Hospital
physician-in-chief
visiting Chief Lecturer from Boston University Clinical &amp
with her husband
left
right
with Mathias Bostrom
center
Karen Su with Edwin Su
HSS trustee
HSS trustee
Christopher Altche with Perry Nagin
Liza Sama with Andrew Sama
Santa Project Committee member W. Scott Allen greets guests
Guests dancing to Latin favorites at The Queen Sofía Spanish Institute's 2012 Gala.
Princess Firyal of Jordan
Princess Firyal of Jordan
Annette de la Renta
Princess Firyal of Jordan
his band members with guests
Spanish to USA Ramón Gil Dacares
Oscar de la Renta
daughter Carmen Hassel
Annette de la Renta
daughter Carmen Hassel
Annette de la Renta
Annette de la Renta
Oscar de la Renta
Oscar de la Renta
Oscar de la Renta
Mary Stewart Hammond enjoying the music
Mary Stewart Hammond enjoying the music
Oscar de la Renta
Fortuny Exhibit assistant curator Molly Sorkin
Oscar de la Renta
Fortuny Exhibit assistant curator Molly Sorkin
Suzie Aijala's table
Jean doyen de Montaillou
Marie Marlas's table
West Side Madrigalists serenades Michael Kovner's table
Over 200 attended The 10th Annual Work Life Matters Gala honoring top companies for LGBT equality
husband Rob Sedgwick
husband Rob Sedgwick
son Jason H. Greenberg
ESPN honorees Heath Rosenthal
ESPN honorees Heath Rosenthal
Kristen Swenson at Lenox Hill Neighborhood House's Associates Committee "Celebrate the Neighborhood" annual benefit.
guests
guests
friend
friends
friend
Matthew VanBesien with NYP Musicians Joseph Alessi
Stephanie Sirota announce the winners of a raffle drawing
Guests sample food in the exhibition’s kitchen
Co chairs Lori
Our Global Kitchen co curator Mark Norell
Co chair Gaelin Rosenwaks
Steering Committee members John Rachwalski
Richard Gilder Graduate School students Bernardo Santos
Steering Committee member Michele Phillip with Rob Kresberg
Steering Committee member Aaron Hollub
Guests gather in front of the Origami Holiday Tree
friends outside the Brick Presbyterian Church to celebrate the annual lighting of the Park Avenue Trees.
2012 Visionaries awards
Joyce Romanoff with fellow Awardees Karyn Khoury
Awardee Karyn Khoury with her husband Stephen Kopach
Awardee Karyn Khoury with Nicolas Mirzayantz
Joyce Romanoff surrounded by family
studio colleagues
MAD director Holly Hotchner
her guest Franklin Silverstone
Awardee Joyce Romanoff with guests Tom Marchisotto
MAD Board chair Lewis Kruger
guest Patricia Specter
MAD board chair emerita Barbara Tober with guests Barbara Regna
MAD board chair emerita Barbara Tober
MAD board chair Lewis Kruger with guests Nancye Green
Awardee Karyn Khoury Estee Lauder) with Pascal Gaurin
both of Estee Lauder
MAD board member Carolee Friedlander
MAD director Holly Hotchner
auctioneer Jennifer Vorbach
Awardee Karyn Khoury with Sarra Dadoul
MAD board chair emerita Barbara Tober
MAD director Holly Hotchner
auctioneer Jennifer Vorbach
Ron &amp
Robyn Winnegrand with Karen &amp
MAD board member Jerry Chazen
MAD board member Angela Sun
The scene outside the Carlyle
Galerie des Cerfs at French Heritage Society's 30 Anniversary with a Gala Dinner
Ball at the Château de Fontainebleau near Paris.
Table setting at Fontainebleau Gala
Fireworks in the Garden of Diane at Fontainebleau
Guests watching fireworks
Gala guests
Comtesse Dominique de Roquefeuil et du Bousquet
Marie Sol de La Tour dAuvergne
Michele le Menestrel Ullrich
Henry Kohler with Event Co-chairs Lisa Crawford
Quest magazine's 25th Anniversary soiree at Doubles.
and Michael Rosenbluth
JH schooling DPC
The Women's Media Center 2012 Women's Media Awards at Guastavino's.
Lori Sokol of Work Life Matters magazine hits the red carpet at the VIP reception
Anne Hathaway addresses the guests
Women's Media Awards Loreen Arbus
AFIPO David A. Hirch with Danielle Hirsch
her troop leader
honoree Tracey Gray-Walker
host Jodi Applegate
with Girl Scouts
honoree Claudia Poccia
husband Robert Littlejohn
Uniting Against Lung Cancer Medical Committee receives honors at UALC's Strolling Supper with Blues
Hunt Ball co-chairs Marion de Vogel
Giorgio Armani's Jennifer French
Giorgio Armani's Jennifer French
Bulgari's Avery Martin with Joan Moore
Bulgari's Avery Martin with Joan Moore
Sarah Kennedy at "The Cosmo 100."
Cocktails at The Four Seasons Restaurant for the Associates Committee of The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center's annual Fall Party.
Dinner in the Pool Room
of The Society
guest
guests
guests
guests
guests
The Friends of Mount Sinai
Pumpkins carved in the likeness of Dennis
honorees at Citymeals-on-Wheels 26th Annual “Power Lunch for Women.
one of the honorees of this year’s Power Lunch
has been involved with Citymeals-on-Wheels for over 20 years. To the assembled crowd
she told the moving story of a homebound senior she visited – a 95-year-old former nurse who is afflicted
glaucoma loss
hearing loss
who has outlived her friends
family
whose only human contact is through the meal-delivery service. The former news anchor also pointed out that Citymeals’ beneficiaries often live only a block or two from our own comfortable apartments.
Pumpkin carved in the likeness of Paula Zahn.
restaurant critic
author
co-founded Citymeals-on-Wheels in 1981with James Beard after she read an article in The New York Times about homebound elderly in New York who had nothing to eat on holidays
weekends. The writer of that article
also received special recognition at this year’s Power Lunch. To date
Citymeals has delivered 46 million free meals to shut-in seniors.
One of Citymeals-on-Wheels beneficiaries.
Executive Director of Citymeals-on-Wheels
his daughter
restaurateur
Ed Brown. The bidding for his live-auction item of a personally-prepared 7-course dinner for 8 in the winner’s own home started at $10
000 and
in the enthusiastic bidding
quickly escalated to two $20
000-dinners for 10 with a private performance by the legendary singer
songwriter Roberta Flack
one of the luncheon’s guests.
Philanthropic husband
wife duo
honorees at this year’s Power Lunch
have provided 500
000 meals by Gael Greene’s estimate
through their long
generous support of Citymeals.
actress
Dorothy Kretchmer. Dorothy has attended every single Power Lunch – all 26 of them. The first one was held in her husband
Jerome’s restaurant
the Gotham Bar
The packed house at the Plaza for Citymeals-on-Wheels 26th Annual “Power Lunch for Women."
A special performance was given by award-winning actress
singer Audra McDonald
who sang a beautiful rendition of “Make Someone Happy.”
his son Tyler
one of the $10
000 men
Former police commissioner
one of the $10
000 men
his wife
one of the $10
000 men
one of the $10
000 men
his daughter
Tren'ness Woods-Black
one of the $10
000 men
ASPCA Dog of the Year. Fiona’s miraculous story of survival has since garnered more than 5.5 million views online
a testament to what can be accomplished when homeless animals get a second chance.
ASPCA Cat of the Year. Scooter now visits a nursing home
rehabilitation hospital every week
serves as a constant inspiration to the elderly
to patients who lack mobility due to injuries
strokes. During one of Scooter’s first hospital visits
a stroke victim who s said would never open her eyes or speak watched as the cat snuggled up close to her. It was then that Scooter had worked his first miracle: the patient opened her eyes
began chatting away like they were old friends.
ASPCA “Tommy P. Monahan” Kid of the Year
with Fiona
ASPCA ial Service Award for Media Excellence.
House of Flowers Centerpiece
Checking in the guests at The Ninth Annual CFDA/ Vogue Fashion Fund Awards.
Baronne Bernard d'Anglejan-Chatillon
Eugénie Angles
Eugénie Angles
friend
Consul of France
her incomparable women
Chiu-ti Jansen
More than 600 gathered at The Parrish Museum's new home in Watermill.
The new Parrish ...
One of seven enclosed galleries.
Clo'e Floira
The Big Cat lounge
Centrepieces of barnacles
wild coral roses
beach grass
exotic shells
Dana Humphrey with Tito
friends
daughter of far right HSS Trustee Lara Lerner
Leon Root withCynthia Sculco
her husband Joe
actor Peter Jacobson
Chief Emeritus of Pediatric Orthopedics Leon Root
actor Peter Jacobson
Phoenix House held its annual Fashion Awards Dinner at the Mandarin Oriental.
Ali Wentworth with Tiffanys auction winner
The McCarton Foundation hosted its second annual Genius of Autism event.
friends
Michele's birthday cake
Michele's wishes
Karen Oberlin with Genius of Autism Honorees
Artwork by Trent Altman
Andrew urbanski
Dancing at Lenox Hill Hospital's Annual Autumn Ball.
The crowd pre-Cyndi Lauper
Eleni’s Park Avenue Tree Lighting cookies.
Gallery Bowling at The thirteenth annual Storybook Ball at the Museum of Fine Arts
Board Member Gregory Rogers recieving the Ackerman Corporate Partner Award presented by John O'Neill
Gala Martha Fling presenting the Ackerman Distinguished Service Award to Baron Davis
Recipient of the Ackerman Corporate Partner Award Gregory Rogers
Andrew van der Vord
and Agnes Hassell
Alan Griffith. Bottom: Tom Exton and Penny Griffith
Museum of Fine Arts
Live Auction with Lenny Clarke
MGHfC patient Tommy McGraw
MGHfC patient Tommy McGraw
Tom Hamilton with wife Terry
Lenny Clarke with Lori
of MGH
Tricia Hazelwood Moffitt at NewYork-Presbyterian/Weill Cornell Medical Center's 23rd annual Light Up a Life benefit.
family
Kanye West at the annual Angel Ball to support Gabrielle's Angel Foundation.
guest
guest
Jacob the Jeweler
Jacob the Jeweler
Geoffrey Bradfield in Geoffrey's designer room at Holiday House.
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Walk in the Park participants
Terri Coppersmith of The Central Park Conservancy
Madison Avenue BID Matthew Bauer with Fogal girls
Madison Avenue BID Matthew Bauer with Fogal girls
Walk in the Park participants with Amy Freeze of ABC News
Editor in Chief of Martha Stewart Living Omnimedia gives opening remarks at Martha Stewart's American Made
of New York City
speaks about the importance of small businesses
Martha Stewart with Award Winners
Administrator of the U.S. Small Business Administratin
friends
Francesca del Balzo
Lauren McGrath at The Boys' Club of New York's 64th Fall Dance.
The Duchess of Devonshire
The Duke of Devonshire
The Duchess of Devonshire
The Duke of Devonshire
The Duke of Devonshire
The Duchess of Devonshire
Francesca del Balzo
Linda Giammona with New York's Bravest
Linda Giammona with U.S. Military Volunteers
NYU Cancer Institute Gala 2012 at the Plaza Hotel
2012 Family Party Chairmen. Bottom row : Jessica Murphy
Kim Lippmann. Top row: Shaiza Rizavi
Bongor Biz stilt walker greets partygoers
Another Bongor Biz stilt walker amuses children
children
Melissa Hawks with children
Chairman Allison Mignone with husband Roberto
children
Vice Chair Zibby Right with husband Andrew
children
children
Tiffany &amp
Co. Gem dig
A ferocious Cozy's Cuts dinosaur do
Is this tail real?
Children meet Buddy from Jim Henson Company's Dinosaur Train
Children color &amp
Bongar Biz hula-hoops it up with kids in the Glow Zone
Children enjoy glowing tattoos
More fun in the Glow Zone
and Joel Miller
Medalists with
Presenters with
Elizabeth Von Thurn und Taxis
Elizabeth Von Thurn und Taxis
Opening Night soloists Nathan Gunn
Orpheus bassist Jordan Frazier with Orpheus Board Chairman Marc Mayer
Connie Steensma with composer Augusta Read Thomas
and Pam Deane
Gala Co-chairs Nancy Carr
Jacqueline Weld Drake addresses the crowd at Casita Maria's annual “Fiesta 2012.”
Annette Rickel ands Daisy Soros
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Jeanie Burn wearing Piaget
Friederike biggs
friends
The Piaget table
SSMAC's Junior Committee
Moises de la Renta
Moises de la Renta
Moises de la Renta
Moises de la Renta
Honoree Henry Arnhold speaks in the long West Gallery at the Frick Collection's Autumn Dinner.
Honoree Henry Arnhold receives commemorative Tiffany tray from Director Ian Wardropper
Hester Diamond with a guest
Associate Curator of Decorative Arts Charlotte Vignon
Elizabeth Eveillard with Andrew Gundlach
Antonio Weiss with Frick Deputy Director
Dudley Johnson with Benefit Chairman Elizabeth Eveillard
Susan Johnson with Michael Kellen
Emily Young performing
Brian d'Arcy James
Lapham's Quarterly Editor Lewis Lapham
Pratt Institute’s 125th Anniversary celebration at the Waldorf=Astoria.
Herb Alpert's award presentation
Harlem School of the Arts Advance Jazz Combo
friend
friends
Henry Jarecki with Melvin Van Peebles
friend
John Jay Medal honorees Barbaralee Diamonstein-Spielvogel
Kitty Aresty with Congresswoman Nita Lowey
Chairman of the Westchester County Board of Legislators
John Jay Medal awardee
Catherine "Kitty" Aresty with her husband Joe
daughter-in-law Rosanne
son Peter
Rye City Councilwoman Catherine Parker with her husband David Walker
Felix Swing Band set the mood!
Allison Rockefeller marvels at the 1838 Mansion door which has been restored to its original dimensions
awaits a final coat of paint
installation in the Jay mansion
The evening drew over 170 guests to see what's new at the 1838 Jay Mansion
Erin Sinnott in flapper fringe
party paillettes
of the Battery Conservancy
The United Hospital Fund's 134th fund-raising campaign at the Waldorf.
the
recipient of the Health Care Leadership Award
NYS Commissioner of Health Nirav R. Shah
recipient of the Special Tribute
with his wife
son
Catherine Cazes-wiley
friend
Hayrides for the children
Dady family
Dady family
friend
Peyrelongue Guerra family
friend
Peyrelongue Guerra family
Marion deVogel
Willem deVogel
Marion deVogel
Willem deVogel
Music Director Jacques Lacombe with the NJSO
pianist Jean-Yves Thibaudet
Executive Director of the Drumthwacket Foundation
Ingrid Novak of the NJSO with David Huber
CFO of Horizon Blue Cross Blue Shield of NJ
his wife
NJSO Trustee Scott Kobler of McCarter English
Paula Stark with composers Sarah Kirkland Sinder
Steven Mackey of Princeton University
Robert L. Aldridge of Rutgers University's Mason Gross School of the Arts
his wife
Roberta Renard of Renard Communications with pianist Jean-Yves Thibaudet
Co-CEO of Chadick Ellig
with Michael Lipper
Pianist Jean-Yves Thibudet takes a bow after a private performance of Gershwin's "Embraceable You" for dinner guests
Pianist Jean-Yves Thibaudet with guests Philip Crowley
Pianist Jean-Yves Thibaudet with NJSO Chairman Emeritus Victor Parsonnet
his wife
Interim NJSO &amp
Susan Stucker with Trustees Linda Bowden
Regional of PNC Bank
Director of US Private Banking
National Sales at TD Bank
with her husband
Senior VP at BD
with John Schreiber
&amp
of NJPAC
Janet Lacombe with NJSO Principal Percussion David Fein
Linwood Oglesby of the Newark Arts Council
with Sharron Little of Prudential
guest
NJSO Interm &amp
Susan Stucker with Mary Jo Sichak
NJSO Board Co-chairs Stephen Sichak Jr.
Ruth C. Lipper with Music Director Jacques Lacombe
pianist Jean-Yves Thibaudet
Museum of the City of New York's "New York After Dark."
Sabah T Dweh-chenneh
The Herbert living room
Lee Glantz performs
Walking the dog 1991
Gia in the Cathederal 1979
Chosan Nguyen in front of Hollywood 1982
Chosan Nguyen in front of Hollywood 1982
Valorie on the couch image with Erika Kapin
Jill McCaffrey with Rose Billings
Joel Grey at Studio in a School's 35th Anniversary Gala.
East Hampton's gilded orphan twins Alexa Ammon
her brother Greg Ammon attended Friday night's opening of 59 Middle Lane
a documentary film produced
directed by Greg Ammon. The film follows the scandalous aftermath of the 2001 murder of their adopted investment banker Ted Ammon
reportedly the first Hamptons homicide in two decades
the death of their adopted Generosa Ammon
the murder conviction of their stepfather Danny Pelosi
the parentless waifs' journey back to the Ukraine where they discover their biological parents.
The flash mob.
2012 HIFF Honorary Chairman actor Alec Baldwin
yoga aficionado Hilaria Baldwin. Baldwin is also the vice-chairman of the Film Festival's board of directors. Many press members were discussing Baldwin's invigorating look.
East Hampton. Press headquarters.
HIFF sponsors.
The red carpet at Guild Hall. With such notable sponsors
I was expecting a bit more for production values. The festival successfully stressed East Hampton's local small-town approach.
the director of Love
the festival's opening film
shares thoughts with local personality Cognac Wellerlane.
Co-founder
chairman of the Hamptons International Film Festival Stuart Suna
an HIFF board member.
a junior publicist with the Frank Public Relations office who could not have been more professional
courteous.
on-camera reporter with Fox Five television.
East Hampton Star staff reporter.
Vered. As I was arriving
Janet were
Vered were just leaving a showing of a Holocaust film.
director of Citizen Hearst. I hoped for a more historical account of WR Hearst rather than a corporate-boasting film best shown at a shareholders annual meeting.
director of Citizen Hearst. I hoped for a more historical account of WR Hearst rather than a corporate-boasting film best shown at a shareholders annual meeting.
The guacamole
shrimp tacos were as wonderful as ever.
Elie Tahari's extraordinary shop on Main Street is a sublime architectural marvel.
store manager of the Elie Tahari boutique in East Hampton.
"These are my clouds
" said Mary Jane Brock about her sculptural topiary at the front entrance to her East Hampton home where we joined her for the spectacular afternoon sunset.
The fall golden light during Friday afternoon's sunset created a striking aura.
On the veranda
executive director of the New York State Governor's Office for Motion Pictures
Television of
secretary of the HIFF board
Greg Ammon. A decade after the devastating deaths of their adopted parents
with much of their father's more than $75 million fortune gone
the Ukrainian-born twins clearly have relied on each other to survive. Adopted in 1992
their filed for divorce in 2000. The following year
Generosa Ammon moved into The Stanhope Hotel with her boyfriend electrician Danny Pelosi
triggering a series of events that led to the murder of Ted Ammon.
Gregg Ammon appeared to be closely monitored by his agent Morgan Ressa
a Los Angeles account executive with pmk+bnc.
Founder of
of
Founder of
of
not quite the Beverly Hills Hotel
on one of October's most beautiful days.
lobby.
Star Watch on-camera reporter.
HBO media relations.
award-winning director
co-producer of Mondays at Racine
a fascinating HBO documentary about an Islip hair salon that opens the third Monday of every month to take care of the hair needs for che apy patients.
award-winning director
co-producer of Mondays at Racine
a fascinating HBO documentary about an Islip hair salon that opens the third Monday of every month to take care of the hair needs for che apy patients.
sisters who are the stars of Mondays at Racine. Bravo!
In The Maidstone's garden.
director of the film Starlet.
Bruce Weber arrives.
The arrival of two black SUVs must mean Variety's Top Ten has arrived.
Legendary costume designer Ann Roth arrives at Guild Hall to receive her award.
Legendary costume designer Ann Roth arrives at Guild Hall to receive her award.
Ann Roth shows her handbag memorializing her many award-winning costume creations to actor Nathan Lane.
Ann Roth have a moment with Oscar.
of the Academy of Motion Pictures Arts
HIFF's honorary chairman Alec Baldwin. He is also the vice-chairman of the HIFF Board of Directors.
Festival chairman Stuart Suna
co-owner of Silvercup Studios.
Mike Nichols enjoys a lite moment.
sister of Arthur Miller
Marilyn Monroe's sister-in-law
has a moment at the Ann Roth tribute.
Suna residence
Buckskill Road. Once again
I was quarantined in the press tent
not invited/permitted to actually attend the party. A bit of a crush in the press tent without circulating air
water for nearly two hours
as burly security guards in tight-fitting suits took their tasks quite seriously while small herds of industrious PR flacks kept a hectic pace. Another really lovely unforgettable first-class experience being handled by professionals.
The Baldwins chatting with publicist Tiffany Malloy.
Hilaria Baldwin slips into more comfortable shoes.
A few moments with the Baldwins in front of the cameras.
Our hosts
his wife Vicki Match Suna
with the family.
Clockwise from top left: Richard Meier
James Lipton. "You have to stay in the tent ... get back in the tent
" said one the security crew when I took one step outside of it to snap Lipton as he trudged up the rocky drive
English actress Sienna Miller arrives.
Clockwise from top left: Rosanna Scotto
Richard Gere. "I never get used to this
being blinded by all these lights
" said Gere
as several hundred flash bulbs strobed for several minutes.
Alec Baldwin arrives. "He's changed
" said one of the press members
commenting on Alec Baldwin's revitalized appearance. "Yoga
or maybe the haircut
" I speculated. Hilaria Baldwin wonders
too.
Alec Baldwin arrives. "He's changed
" said one of the press members
commenting on Alec Baldwin's revitalized appearance. "Yoga
or maybe the haircut
" I speculated. Hilaria Baldwin wonders
too.
The Dreamy iced coffee at Sylvester &amp
Co. on Main Street in Sag Harbor.
Intuition II is among the few yachts left in the harbor.
Jennifer Bartlett's paintings on handmade mulberry paper
At Vered on Park Place in East Hampton
the current exhibition is "Needful Things."
artist. Oil on canvas. 71" x 60". $35
Sag Harbor. The gallery is featuring the recent paintings of Richard Fenske.
Work in progress
Parrish Art Museum. Herzog &amp
architect.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Carnegie Hall's 2012–2013 season opening night gala dinner in the Grand Ballroom at The Waldorf-Astoria.
the Chicago Symphony Orchestra
Baritone Audun Iversen sings Carmina Burana with Maestro Riccardo Muti
the Chicago Symphony Orchestra
Trustee Oscar de la Renta
Carnegie Hall Chairman Sanford I. Weill unveil Breguet's new lobby clock
Leni May with Bill Cunningham
guests
Chris Lanning with TEAK Fellows
Liz Hilpman with TEAK Alumna Cheryl Morris
Liz Hilpman with TEAK Alumna Cheryl Morris
friends
inside Haunch of Venison for The Drawing Center's Annual Auction 2012.
Outside Haunch of Venison
Alexander Gilkes leads the auction
Junior Council members enjoy cocktails in the Hall of Mexico
Co-chairs Zachary
friend
Steering Committee member Joseph Cavanaugh
Kate Deming with Steering Committee member W. Jameson McFadden
Sting sings at Cinema For Peace New York
From left to right
H.E. the first of the Maldives Ma Ilham Hussain
Her Excellency the wife of the Vice of Nigeria Amina Namadi Sambo
H.E. the wife of the minister of foreign affairs of Turkey Sare Davutoglu
H.E. the first of Panama Marta Linares de Martinelli
H.E.the spouse of the foreign minister of Serbia Natasa Jeremic
H.E Ban Soon-taek
H.E. the prime minister of Bangladesh Sheikh Hasina
Her Excellency the first of Guyana Deolatchmee Ramotar
Her Excellency the spouse of the prime minister of St. Vincent
the Grenadines Eloise Gonsalves
H.E. Liri Berisha spouse of prime minister of Albania
Her Excellency the first of Namibia Penehupifo Pohamba
HE the first of Albania Odeta Mishani
HE the spouse of the prime minister of Croatia Sanja Music
spouse of the vice of Nigeria
with Suzanne Wright
co-founder of Autism Speaks
Member of Canadian Parliament
son Jaden Lake
who has autism
prime minister of Bangladesh
Saima Wazed Hossain with H.E. Ma Ilham Hussein
first of the Maldives
H.E. Irene deThalassinós
H.E. Ban Soon-taek
and H.E. Eloise Gonsalves
Cocktails at the Metropolitan Club for the Alzheimer’s Drug Discovery Foundation's 3rd annual Luncheon &amp
friend
Jackie Weld Drake perusing
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Ana Maria de la Ossa
Ana Maria de la Ossa
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Gala dinner at Skylight One Hanson
décor courtesy Fleurs Bella
her brother Michael
his dancers
composer Philip Glass
First of Mali
Ma Ban Soon-taek
Don Felder performs
Cocktails on the mezzanine of the Metropolitan Opera House.
Amar'e Stoudemire
Placido Domingo with family
S.a. Ibrahim
Buffet table with orange sunfowers
Fanciful Frog King lamp was among the auction items
Veanne Cox in 40 Maked Women
a Monkey
Bobbi &amp
Vin Godleski admire the flowers
Donna &amp
director Michael Bush
Development Wing's Cherie King
Sgt. 1st Class Charles Shuck with Hero dog Gabe
Roberta reardon
Hero dog Stella
Hero dog Soot
Hero dog Gabe
Hero dog Soot
Hero dog Gabe
Hero dog Holly
Jake T. Austin with Stella
Jean Shafiroff with Stella
Jake T. Austin with Stella
Jean Shafiroff with Stella
Hero dog Stella
Trupanion table
Mary Anne schwenk
friend
Alfred Discipio with their family
Randy Polumbo at the opening of Randy Polumbo’s “Love Stream at at the Steven Kasher Gallery.
Joan grandchildren
her grandchildren
The newly restored Sala dell'Albergo
The Ballroom at Palazzo Barbaro
Guests were ferried to a concert at The Church of San Sebastiano
the site of one of Save Venice’s most important ongoing restorations.
The newly restored Sala dell'Albergo
The Ballroom at Palazzo Barbaro
Guests were ferried to a concert at The Church of San Sebastiano
the site of one of Save Venice’s most important ongoing restorations.
The newly restored Sala dell'Albergo
The Ballroom at Palazzo Barbaro
Dinner at the premiere for Showtime's "Homeland" aboard the Intrepid Sea
"Homeland" themed Cupcakes by Melissa
US Navy service members
Cocktails d
hors d
Oil on wood by Eileen Dawn Skretch
Oldest one room schoolhouse in Southampton
Author historian
architectural historian
artist Eileen Dawn Skretch
The scene in the Margo Feiden Galleries historic Stanford White townhouse
Spanish painter
Barbara Cates with Jim Mitchell
Bailey's Beach
Ruth Buchanan's house on Bellevue Avenue
Dinner scene at the 9th Annual Style Awards.
Liz Peek in their Oscar's
with the man himself.
Oscar de la Renta
Annette de la Renta
Oscar de la Renta
Niki M'nray
Crowds in the grandstand on the closing day of the 37th Annual Hampton Classic.
winner of the 37th. Annual Hampton Classic
Young equestrian Frankie Lane
daughter Sailor Cook
daughter Sailor Cook
sister Kathy Hilton
sister Kathy Hilton
Sotheby's International Realty
The Match begins
Duke of Argylll
Nacho Figueras greets his fans
Christina Geyer at the second annual ROCKNRUNWAY fashion event hosted by Stanley Korshak in Dallas.
The RocknRunway scene
his dog Sinatra
Kyle Zeigler "stands in water for a living"
Getting fitted for boots
Valerie Angeli of the ASPCA
A little down time at the opening day of the 37th annual Hampton Classic.
Hostess Joyce Mullins Jackson welcomes Reginald Van Lee
Renowned sculptor Hans Van de Bovenkamp
Renowned sculptor Hans Van de Bovenkamp
Former First of D.C. Cora Masters Barry
Tony award
Peabody award winner Murray Horwitz
Former First of D.C. Cora Masters Barry
Tony award
Peabody award
Evidence Dance Company associate artistic director Arcell Cabuag
Famed painter Frank Wimberley
sculptor Hans Van De Bovenkamp
Evidence Dance Company associate artistic director Arcell Cabuag
Famed painter Frank Wimberley
sculptor Hans Van De Bovenkamp
Fashion designer Edward Wilkerson
Showering before showtime
Manicure before showtime
Ready to go
Up next ...
The competition begins
Getting a rubdown after competition
Set for lunch ...
Lunching in the VIP tent
The bubbly is ready!
Hat ladies ...
a 14-year-old rider who sang the National Anthem
Wolffer Estate Vineyard Ladies ready to serve....
Wolffer Estate Vineyards Lounge in the VIP tent
Saddles for sale
Saddle scene
What's all the fuss with the horses? Look at me!
Alex Hitz hosted a dinner for a hundred guests high above Sunset Plaza in Los Angeles.
Guests on the porch
Ava with Staff Joanie McDonell
Ava with Staff
Liliana Cavendish in J.McLaughlin
The view
The staff: Abraham Setbom
Laurie MacCaskill and Becca Thrash
Zach Udell at the Animal Rescue Fund of The Hamptons' Jewels of Summer.
Martin the Dog
Donald the Dog
Donald the Dog
and Brian Brown
John Ike at the 12th annual Millbrook Horse Trials.
Cutting the ribbon
The scene of the Millbrook Horse Trials
Enjoying the horse trials
Colman children
Peggy Kauffman bronze auction item
Rob Carmichael with Kalala the Owl
Martino the Owl
friend
friend
wife Alex Witchel
Authors waiting to sign
sell their books
Co-chair
Hilary Knight signing his book
Children's book author
Ruth signing her books
Lori Schultz showing their new purchase
Michael Paraskevas signing
friend
Oliver Barker with Tom Friedman’s Which
Tom Sachs' Poche Vide was among the highlights of the live auction. It sold for $155K – well over its $120K estimated value.
Michelle Cooper anmd Francis Gasparik
Cover from her new children's book
friends masks
Liana masks
Steven Stolman takes the lead at Southampton Hospital's 54th annual Summer Benefit.
Lowline supporters
PMP chorus
Maestro Perlman conducting the orchestra
Thank You presentation to the Starks
Christine Browns with Paul Ferrillo
David deforest
Christina deforest
Christina deforest Keys
Gallery view
Clockwise from top left: Beetle boats
Lavender skies
Clockwise from top left: Peter Cary Peterson
Clockwise from top left: Doug Steinbrech
Jeff Sharp with their extended family
Clockwise from top left: Michael Carlisle
John Franco at the annual "Heat" benefit for the Ellen Hermanson Foundation.
Author &amp
filmmaker Adriana Trigiani with husband
lighting producer
at their Greenwich Village townhouse.
James Miller with their daughter
Rafella De Angelis with best-selling author Susan Fales-Hill
friend
Adriana Trigiani with Ann J. Parks
Shaikha Paula al-Sabah
Cocktails d
hor d
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
The dinner scene at the 13th annual Art For Life.
Burmese artwork
Decorative Burmese objects were for sale
guests
cocktails
Traditional Burmese refreshments were offered
Traditional Burmese dancer
George Hornig greeted guests
Pres. of Cetana
with Cynthia Scott
Southampton Animal Shelter Foundation's 3rd annual Unconditional Love Benefit at the home of Sandra McConnell raised over $375
Stacy London's shoes
Guests sit by the bonfire
Marquesa de la Varela
Diane de la Begassiere
Jeffrey Siegel playing for guests
Weekend finale at Fitch's Corner.
Wendy Svarre with New York Irish Dance Company
Mario Rinaldo of Champagne Paul Goerg
ridden by Paige Garson
Diana Niles King fits a hat for Sang Milea
with Christine Gaffney
Shopping at Fitch's Market ...
Dessert from Slammin' Salmon
courtesy of Ferrari
Retiring the horses
Guests enjoy the 70th Street Garden at The Frick Collection's annual Garden Party.
the Frick’s Deputy Director
Chairman of the Frick’s Board of Trustees Margot Bogert with Associate Director of Development Maureen Nash
Frick Board member Franklin W. Hobbs
Wes Gordon in the new Portico Gallery
Wes Gordon in the new Portico Gallery
Fashion writer Patrick Michael Hughes in Lilly Pulizer pants
Fashion writer Patrick Michael Hughes in Lilly Pulizer pants
a guest
Young Fellows Steering Committee member Maggy Frances Schultz
Young Fellows Steering Committee member Maggy Frances Schultz
Frick Associate Curator of Decorative Arts Charlotte Vignon
the Frick’s Deputy Director
the Frick’s Deputy Director
Gala tent set among Caramoor's gardens
Whimsical décor provided by Ned Kelly
400 guests celebrated the opening of Caramoor's 67th season
helped raise over $450
Chairman Emerita honored Michael Barrett for his decade long leadership to Caramoor
Jim Attwood welcomed the guests
spoke of supporting Caramoor's Arts-in-Education programs
which features Jen Pena
her Eurasain Eagle owl named Boo
Forested sprites completed the Midsummer Night's Dream theme
14 year-old Eurasian Eagle owl was the highlight of the event
Caramoor's Director of Opera
with Anne Lichtblau
14 year-old Eurasian Eagle owl was the highlight of the event
Caramoor's Director of Opera
with Anne Lichtblau
Caramoor's master falconer
with Boo
Linda Abbey of Great Performances
Anka Palitz admiring Boo
the Eurasian Eagle owl
handled by Jen Pena
Caramoor trustees Sue Groner
with Caramoor trustee Nancy Offit
Gala guests danced the night away to Vince Giordiano's Nighthawks
Parrish Art Museum Midsummer Party in Southampton
Raphael diTommaso
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
A ’s Committee Reception in anticipation of the Southampton Hospital’s 54th annual Summer Party.
Inga Rennert with Reynold Levy
The Cast of "One Man
Cheech Marin in front of a Margaret Garcia
Amazing by Mel Bochner
Silence by Mel Bochner
Amazing by Mel Bochner
Silence by Mel Bochner
Coffee reception at the fourth annual “Early Birds &amp
” to benefit the Jane Addams Senior Caucus in Chicago.
USA 2012 Olivia Culpo with of Henri Bendel Chris Fiore
USA 2012 Olivia Culpo with of Henri Bendel Chris Fiore
Board chair Susan Allen with honorees Chuck
Musicians with Nabeel Abboud Ashkar
James Lipton with Polyphony Youth Orchestra
Everybody helped bring the seating into the barn for the concert
The performance was held in the intimate setting of the Hornigs restored barn
Director of Polyphony
Some of the young musicians
Chef Louis Bavaro with some of his creations
Julia Hornig with Libby
Guests enjoy dinner in a private home on Friday evening
Gala guests were treated to a backstage tour
lunch
On Saturday evening
guests enjoyed a pre-performance dinner at Gaddes Hall
guests enjoyed brunch in the gardens of the Nedra Matteucci Galleries in downtown Santa Fe
Brian Jagde as Cavaradossi
Director Charles MacKay speaking with former Director Richard Gaddes
the auction’s highest bidder
received a Magnum of Dom Pérignon Champagne Vintage 2002 courtesy of Moët Hennessy USA
Cornelia's cousin Alexander Cochrane
Cornelia's cousin Alexander Cochrane
Susan Henshaw Jones at Museum of the City of New York's annual Spring Lecture Symposium
Christina deForest Keys
New York Philharmonic violinist Duoming Ba
bassist Satoshi Okamoto
friend
Marina Oeda of Breguet
friends
Maharaj Narendra Singh of Jaipur
Saqib Mawa-zkha
Carlo Baccheschi Berti of Castello de Vicerello with Nick Beinstock
The Winning team – Team Carlyle Frederic Levy
Royal Jaipur team with Vikram Chatwal
Parker Thorne is awarded The Best Pony by Heather Croner of Sotheby's Real Estate Millbrook
together with Col. Navjeet Singh Sandhu
daughter
Catherine Malandrino with Teressa Colley
Princess Diya of Jaipur
Princess Diya of Jaipur
Princesss Diya of Jaipur
Maharani of Jaipur
Co-chair Elizabeth Ryan
Sophie Bross with her Dolly Geary
Joffrey Women’s Board Melissa Babcock with Lunch Chairs Elizabeth Ryan
Joffrey staff in Joffrey Scarves
The entrance to the Central Park Zoo
Sarajane Brittis with TFH's Chief Financial Officer Stiles Nyerere
Diane Sawyer were among the guests at The Public Theater’s 50th Anniversary of the Delacorte Theater.
Meryl Streep as Juliet
Kevin Kline as Romeo
the company in the reading of Romeo
Public Theater Chairman of the Board Warren Spector
Gala co-chairs Alexandra Shiva
NYC Department of Cultural Affairs Commissioner Kate D. Levin
guests
guests
Public Theater Chairman of the Board Warren Spector
The MHA NYC Bridges to Mental Health: A Celebration of Hope Gala at Cipriani 42nd Street
Mark Barvaro autographs a football
Mark Barvaro autographs a football
Mark Bavaro throws footballs into the audience at Cipriani with Ottis Anderson
Giselle Stolper with Commissioners Gonzalez Sanchez
Hogan present an award to James Introne
Sarah Rainey with her parents Scott
Nature Conservancy staff at The Nature Conservancy's Global Gala.
Frederique Van der wal
Guests watching Shakespeare performance of Timon of Athens at Natalie
Malcolm Pray's greenwich home for their Queen's Diamond Jubilee Garden Party.
wife Joyce Dinkins
The crowd waiting for the concert to begin
guests speaking with Natalie Dessay after the concert
Malcolm Pray’s Rolls Royces
Stephen deAngelis
Newsies take flight choreographed by nominee Christopher Gattelli
Steppin' Out Dancers perform New York City Rhythm with vocalist Richard H. Blake
The Original cast of Fosse in a special tribute to Bob Fosse
famed filmmaker Albert Maysles
famed filmmaker Albert Maysles
Choreographer Rob Ashford present Shannen O'Neill with Adele Astaire Scholarship
Steppi' Out Dance Troupe form Missouri
The original cast of Fosse reunited
Astaire Award winners Ronald K. Brown
Lisa Nicole Wilkerson w/ Arcell Cabuag
Astaire Award winners Ronald K. Brown
Lisa Nicole Wilkerson w/ Arcell Cabuag
Smash choreographer Josh Bergasse
Smash choreographer Josh Bergasse
Tap whiz Luke Spring with director Joe Lanteri
Tap whiz Luke Spring with director Joe Lanteri
Law star
Order star
Law star
Order star
5-time Astaire Award winner Susan Stroman
Cast of
producers of
scholarship winner Shannen O'Neill
winners Lisa Nicole Wilkerson
Ava Astaire McKenzie with a friend
her give hugs to Tony Danza
Old pals Tony Danza
friends at the 12th annual Midsummer Night Drinks to benefit God’s Love We Deliver.
friends
friend
American Institute for Stuttering Board of Directors
Guests of Honor Sam Waterston
AIS Client speakers Tim McCarren
Riki Sheehan with Gov. Thomas Kean
Harold Evans with a friend
friend
daughters
Sam Waterston with Harold Evans
young AIS client speak Julia Mazovilla
friend
friend
K. Cooper Ray signing away
who performs magic with his floral designs
decorated the reception area as well as the three dining sections set up in the Zoo’s pavilions.
Erin Donahue with friends
Candace diConza
Bill Cunningham arrives at the book party for Cornelia Guest’s Simple Pleasures: Healthy Seasonal Cooking
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Eugene Lang with Dreamers
Veronica De la Cruz
Fran Terwilliger wth Chris
Or-lee Fromm
Hartley duPont
Hartley duPont
Members of the Delta Sigma Theta Sorority
Voza Rivers of Harlem Arts Alliance
Storefront Parent Carrie Morris presenting Brick Presbyterian Church's Reverend Doug King an award
Storefront Assistant Head of School
Storefront Head of School
Carol Ann Mercer of Brick Presbyterian Church
Reverend Michael Lindvall of Brick Presbyterian Church
Brick Presbyterian Church parishioners
guests
Cocktails in the Battery Bosque Gardens for the 17th Battery Conservancy Gala: Born Green.
Megan del Valle
Cisco del Valle
Lisa Cali with Jasper
Honoree Liz Atwood with grandson Thomas Robinson
David van der Leer
World-renowned French Chevalier des Arts
Francis Kurkdjian from Paris attended the event
developed a personalized scent for the auction souks
ballroom fountain. The auction souks were created by draping colorful fabric across tent-like fixtures
the floors were covered in beautiful Moroccan rugs. Moroccan performers – a henna artist
belly dancer
juggler– entertained guests as they sipped specialty orange-blossom cocktails
champagne.
Moroccan slippers in the Auction Souk area
Kim Merlin of KKM Designs transformed the Four Seasons Hotel Grand Ballroom into a magical Moroccan garden inspired by Yves Saint Laurent's
Pierre Bergé's Jardin Majorelle in Marrakesh.
The table décor featured Moroccan tea glasses filled
hydrangeas roses
colorful roses. Pink henna patterns were illuminated on the side walls
giving the ballroom an exotic glow.
of the Kingdom of Morocco to the United States
Women’s Board Member Betsey Pinkert
Woman’s Board Members Kristina Schneider
Patty Simpson with John Fornengo
Isabelle de la Vauvre
His Excellency of France to the United States
of the Kingdom of Morocco to the United States
Hervé de la Vauvre
of the Alliance Française of Chicago
Woman’s Board Member Lili Gaubin
Alliance former chair Tom Sheffield
Woman’s Board Member Gloria Groom
Woman’s Board Member Danielle
Woman’s Board Member Nena Ivon
Woman’s Board Member Martha Wolfe
Woman’s Board Member Martha Wolfe
French Chevalier des Arts
Woman’s Board Members: Lauren Ziol
Gala co-chair Margaret Unetich
Gala co-chair Suzette Bulley
Lori Sudor with Consul Paul Graham
Woman’s Board Members: Lauren Ziol
Gala co-chair Margaret Unetich
Gala co-chair Suzette Bulley
Auctioneer Leslie Hindman with Masters of Ceremony Bill Kurtis
Gala co-chairs Suzette Bulley
Gala co-chairs Suzette Bulley
Co-chairs: Jonathan
co-chairs members
committee members at The Conservatory Ball Benefit for the New York Botanical Garden
hosted by Chanel.
l Davidson
Kirsten Cole at ARTrageous 2012 Gala Dinner
Gregorio dal Pozzo
and Aubrey Featherstone
O.J.'s Manager Gene
Cloisters Lawn at Fort Tyron Park.
Outside the
under the
Camp Temple Bet Midler t-shirts.
Pre-dinner quartet Vince Giordano.
New Leaf Restaurant &amp
The dinner scene at 583 Park Avenue for generationOn’s Annual Benefit.
and Lindsey Spielfogel
Lynn Lewis from Picture the Homeless
Katrina vanden Heuvel
Morgan Bale at The Citizens Summer Cocktail.
Jessica Stark an dClaudia Lebenthal
Three generations passionate about fashion
preservation
and Meg Chmiel
John Hannan of Greenwich Audubon
New York State Assembly candidate Steve Otis
Over 150 guests attended the Jay Heritage Center Luncheon at American Yacht Club
Broadway Inspirational Voices with Alex Pinto at Ronald McDonald House New York's 20th annual gala.
Consul from France
Ronald McDonald with RMH NY Children
William T. Sullivan with Ronald McDonald Linda Dunham
James Flanagan with William T. Sullivan
James Flanagan with William T. Sullivan
Seb Gillem childhood cancer survivor
Seb Gillem childhood cancer survivor
Honoree Gregory Fleming with the Suthers
RMH NY Resident Jessica Fanini Lemoine with Barbara Walters
Barbara Walters Presented with RMH NY Thank You
Honoree Neil Cole with Brother Kenneth Cole
NMSDC Joset B. Wright joined Mariano Legaz
vice of supply chain services at Verizon Communications
the supplier diversity team from Verizon
members of the AdAsia Communications team at the 2012 NMSDC Minority Business Leadership Awards Dinner Dance to celebrate their 14-year supplier partnership.
fellow Auxilian Michele Jefferey
fellow Auxilian Michele Jefferey
Chiu-Ti Jansen at El Museo del Barrio's 19th annual gala.
Tables set-up outside the restored barn
On the patio
Guests mingling
Selection of refreshments
Some of the many designer auction items
Anne Faifax at the first HYLAND Awards.
Paige Rense's HYLAND Lifetime Achievement Award.
John Paulson with CNBC producer Maneet Ahuja.
CNBC &amp
Norman Sunshine sign copies of their book
one for Washington Blade features editor Joey Di Guglielmo
who wrote a recent story about the long time partners.
Seventh annual New-York Historical Society's Weekend With History.
A jazz quartet in the Reception Hall greets guests
Dancers drift over to the The Music Room for George Gee
band
George van der Ploeg
Carlos Falchi with Award
Nanette Lepore with Award
Silent auction items
ena Costantino
friends
friends
of the National Academy Bruce Fowle
Director of the National Academy Carmine Branagan
his wife Thelma Driskell
Chair of the National Academy Board David Kapp
Award presenter Martin E. Segal
Award presenter Camille Cosby
Back row: Willard Boepple
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
conductor Luigi Piovano with Ensemble díArchi Fenaroli at Carnegie Hall Notables' Eighth Annual Notable Occasion
Anne de la Guéronnière
Anne de la Guéronnière
Raphael Paul diTommaso
Raphael Paul diTommaso
Violinist Grazia Raimondi with Ensemble díArchi Fenaroli in a private performance for the Notables
friend
friend
Carnegie Hall Director of Development Susan Brady with Colin Touhey
Michael Bretholz at Remi
Genghis Barbie serenades guests at Remi
Guests in the atrium garden at Remi
friends
Guests enjoying the reception at Remi
Cookie River at Remi
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Cynthia McFadden at the 11th Annual Women Who Care Luncheon benefitting United Cerebral Palsy of New York City.
AMC's 2012 Living Legend Blueberry the Chihuaha
AMC's 2012 Living Legend Ruby the Cat
event Marilyn Sorenson
Bluberry seeing his favorite vet
Chad West with event Co-Chair- Barbara Hoffman
11th Annual Women Who Care Luncheon Benefitting UCP of NYC
The event included a performance by the Storefront Gospel Choir
Lapham's Quarterly Director of Development Laurie Eustis
Editor of
Publisher of Lapham's Quarterly Lewis Lapham.
wife Jane.
performer Maude Maggart.
guests.
guests.
guest.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The debs dancing with their fathers
the escorts dancing with the debs' s at the 71st Annual Bal des Berceaux .
The escorts arrive
friends
Jean-and Hughes Monier
Nick Lowry auctions a dollar bill to start the proceedings
Nick Lowry auctions a dollar bill to start the proceedings
Jean-Jacques de Saint-Andrieu and Danielle Bellanger
Jean-Jacques de Saint-Andrieu and Danielle Bellanger
her daughter Isabelle James
friend
her daughter Isabelle James
friend
Countess Caroline de Ravel d'Esclapon
A young friend
A young friend
his daughter Isabel Quintero
his daughter Isabel Quintero
décor by Gala Honoree
Orchestra of St. Luke's led by OSL Principal Conductor Pablo Heras-Casado in an All-Mozart Program
Orchestra of St. Luke's with Bass-Baritone Eric Owens
David Monn receiving the Gift of Music Award
Gala Honoree Ronald Frasch receiving the Gift of Music Award from Gala Host
Virginia Budney with Pippin.
Neill MacCallum with Zoe.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Doubles celebrated its 36th Anniversary.
Maestro Itzhak Perlman conducting a Vivaldi Concerto
featuring 15 of PMP's fine young artists
Guests at Daniel
musicians
Natalia Makarova with young dancers
Newsies nominees E. Sykes
Astaire Awards Honorary Co Chair producer Wendy Federman
nominee Thomas Hartwell
actor Lee Roy Reams
blogger Tia Walker
nominee Krystal Joy Brown
National Museum of Dance Hall of Fame inductee Marge Champion
singer actress Sue Mathys
New York Post Theater critic Michael Riedel
Newsies cast
friends
Dance Hall of Fame inductee Marge Champion
nominee Ashley Amber
Astaire Awards producer Patricia Watt
nominee Krystal Joy Brown
nominee Krystal Joy Brown
nominee Ashley Amber
nominees dancer Bahiyah Hibah
choreographer Ronald K. Brown
director Albert Maysles
Gala co chair Alix Michel
producer Dan Whitten
nominee Lisa Nicole Wilkerson
Dance Hall of Fame inductee Marge Champion
Honorary Co chair producer Wendy Federman
Honorary Co chair producer Wendy Federman
National Museum of Dance Hall of Fame inductee Marge Champion
nominee Thomas Hartwell
Manager at New York City Dance Alliance Travis Fritsche
Gala co chair Alix Michel
actress Sarah Bierstock
blogger Tia Walker
nominee Patty Murin
Leap of Faith Nominees Krystal Joy Brown
Volunteers with rescue dogs
Kevin de l'Aigle
Kevin de l'Aigle
The silent auction
Volunteer with rescue dog
Piano man Jeremy Siskind
Richard Gentles ACandC Director of Development
ACandC Secretary Jay Kuhlman addresses crowd
ACandC Executive Director Julie Bank addresses crowd
Carlene Mahanna with Mei Mei
Anti-gravity
Enriquillo del Rosario
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Gilles Mendel with NYCB Dancers Ashly Isaacs
Taylor Stanley in Peter Martins' Mes Oiseaux
with costumes by Gilles Mendel of J. Mendel
Jonathan Stafford in George Balanchine's Symphony in C
with costumes redesigned by Marc Happel in collaboration with Swarovski
Tiler Peck in Benjamin Millepied's Two Hearts
with costumes by Kate
Laura Mulleavy of Rodarte
NYCB Ballet Master in Chief Peter Martins
former NYCB Principal Dancer Darci Kistler
NYCB Ballet Master in Chief Peter Martins
Dinner on the Promenade of the David H. Koch Theater
Marie Nugent-Head with NYCB Executive Director Kathy Brown
her daughter Dylan
Ai-jen Poo
Ai-jen Poo
Grantee partners
William vanden Heuvel
Tent in Conservatory Gardens
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The New York Pops celebrated its 29th birthday with a grand gala evening titled 'Journey On.'
The New York Pops Kids Band with Sherrie Maricle
Michele Wiles of BalletNext
Auctioneer Lydia Wickliffe Fenet of Christie's
Artistic Director of Pacific Northwest Ballet
Executive Director of The Joyce Theater
Joyce Trustee Gerald Appelstein with Emma Dipadova
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Guests at Cipriani on 42nd Street for NYU Langone Medical Center's annual Violet Ball.
of NYU
dean NYU
dean NYU
of NYU
dean NYU
Floral Center Pieces in Waldorf Astoria Ballroom Designed by Preston Bailey
Dinner at The Plaza Hotel
friend
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Guests at The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center's 5th Annual Spring Ball.
Princess Alexandra of Greece
Princess Alexandra of Greece
friends
L'Antiquaire &amp
Bidding on golf with Curt Schilling
William Austen with Lenny Clarke
wife Martha
Tom Hamilton playing with the Felix Peikli Trio
Lenny Clarke singing
The raffle table
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The cast of The Sound of Music: Mary Michael Patterson
Brooke Shields with Wilhelm Klinger
Laura Osnes teaches the Von Trapp children to sing with "Do-Re-Mi."
Brooke Shields wonder "How Can Love Survive?"
The curtain call for Carnegie Hall's The Sound of Music
Conductor Rob Fisher with members of the Mansfield University Concert Choir
Consul of the Republic of Austria
Co-stars Laura Osnes
Patrick Page with co-star Brooke Shields
wife Paige Davis
NES Caroline A. Camougis welcomes guests to the luncheon
Winning author Erin Byers-Murray accepts her award for Shucked in the Contemporary Nonfiction category
with NES Caroline A. Camougis
Winning author Chris Bohjalian signs a copy of his novel The Night Strangers for a luncheon guest
Shucked editor Daniela Rapp
Shucked author Erin-Byers Murray
Litchfield Style editor Sandy Gilbert
author Annie Kelly
Death of an Empire author Robert Booth
Shucked author Erin Byers-Murray
The Night Strangers author Chris Bohjalian
Death of an Empire author Robert Booth
Dancing at Dawnridge
Dawnridge singers
The dancefloor at Dawnridge
Johnny Holiday with the ladies
Cat Jagger Pollon with the Paparazzi
Valentina Fleer as Maria Callas
Tara Kuhnert with the Paparazzi
Darren Wolfberg an dMichele Wolfberg
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Aaron Mickelson showing Mike Pratt
Concetta Stewart his packaging design
which was on display at The Art of Packaging Award Gala
Packaging design by Scholarship Recipient Renato Martins Cerqueira
Packaging design by Scholarship Recipient Wei-Hsin Lin
Packaging design by Scholarship Recipient Aaron Mickelson
Packaging design by Scholarship Recipient Maija Rozenfelde
student scholarship winners Maija Rozenfelde
guests
Katsuhiko Shibuya with guests
Scholarship student Tess Gannaway
The gala dinner ..
Janice Cheon violin
Jacques Lacombe conducts
City University of New York Chancellor Matthew Goldstein
of the Baruch College Fund Joel Cohen presents the Distinguished Alumni Award to Francis Greenburger '74
Joe Schenker presents the Distinguished Alumni Award to Joseph Macnow '67
Baruch Mitchel B. Wallerstein presents the 's Medal to 2012 Honoree William M. Newman '47
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Cocktail reception
dinner at the Waldorf=Astoria
A cutout of Bill Cunningham
The real Bill
Christine &amp
Bill Cunningham greets Mercedes Bass
Oscar de la Renta
Annette de la Renta
Dinner viewing of a clip from Bill Cunningham New York
Sanford I. Weill presents the Medal of Excllence to Bill Cunningham
his Medal of Excellence
Vittorio Grigolo performs
Oscar de la Renta
Terry Lundgren: all Medal of Excellence recipients
Bill Cunningham with Chiu-Ti Jansen
Lucia Hwong Gordon at the after-BCNY
Guests dancing to music by DJ Cassidy in the Vanderbilt Room
Cocktails in the Great Hall
Costume design for Aida by Bibhu Mohapatra
Bibhu Mohapatra costume design for Aida
Costume design for Aida by Bibhu Mohapatra
Bibhu Mohapatra costume design for Aida
Guests in the West Lounge for the performance
Sean Panikkar perform a duet
Ginger Costa Jackson sings Weill's Pirate Jenny
Metropolitan Opera bass baritone Eric Owens
designer Bibhu Mohapatra
Met Opera's Steven White
Met Opera's Steven White
ABT's Rachel Moore
ABT's Rachel Moore
Kristin Cook in Bibhu Mohapatra
Kristin Cook in Bibhu Mohapatra
Jim Barton on the dnace floor
friend
aura Lamont
Getting ready to board the ferry for Ellis Island are Foundation Board member Emilio Estefan
honoree Tony La Russa
event host Meredith Vieira
honoree Richard Meier
Board members Tommy Lasorda
Board member Gene Bay.
Stopping in front of Castle Clinton are Foundation Board Chair Paul Weaver
honoree Tony La Russa
Board member Tommy Lasorda
event host Meredith Vieira
Board member Emilio Estefan
Foundation &amp
The 11th annual Ellis Island Family Heritage Awards were held April 19 in the Great Hall in the Ellis Island Immigration Museum.
his brother
ride the ferry to Ellis Island
where their grandfather entered the country in 1896.
recipient of the B.C. Forbes Peopling of America® Award for Entertainment
speaks about her 72-year journey since emigrating from Britain in 1940 with her brothers
Angela Lansbury receives the B.C. Forbes Peopling of America® Award for Entertainment from Moira Forbes
great-granddaughter of the award's namesake "Bertie" Forbes. Joining them onstage are host Meredith Vieira
Gathered onstage are The Arts/Architecture honoree Richard Meier
host Meredith Viera
Peopling honoree Angela Lansbury
Sports honoree Tony La Russa.
recipient of the Ellis Island Family Heritage Award for Sports
sits beside his friend Tommy Lasorda
Foundation Board member
former Heritage Award recipient.
his daughter Ana Meier Creighton listen to the story of his German grandfather's arrival in America.
Catherine Forbes. The Forbes family sponsored the B.C. Forbes Peopling of America® Award in honor of Forbes magazine founder
Scottish immigrant "Bertie" Forbes.
Angela Lansbury catches up with Linda Hope
whose Bob Hope was an Ellis Island immigrant
former Heritage Award recipient.
Angela Lansbury at the Ellis Island Family Heritage Award
The Awards opened with a musical tribute to the RMS Titanic
which had been headed to the Port of New York
performed by Brian Charles Rooney. April 15
2012 marked the centennial of the maritime tragedy.
Superintendent of the Statue of Liberty National Monument
welcomes everyone to the 11th annual Ellis Island Family Heritage Awards
Paul Levine addresses the guests
L. to r.: Dawn Marie Grannum
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Danny Strong at New York Public Library's Spring Luncheon.
Guests from the Spring Luncheon
Princess Firyal of Jordan
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The crowd at the Park Avenue on opening night of SOFA NEW YORK.
Mindy solomon Gallery
Jack Lenor Larsen's Dining Room at LongHouse
artist
Access to the Arts Award Honoree Houghton Mifflin Harcourt: Lori Glazer
Access to the Arts Honoree Morley Safer
Jacky Terrasson performs
Nadia Salerno-Sonnenberg presents the Access to the Arts Awards to Morley Safer
CK Swett of Phillips de Pury leads the auction
Morley Safer accepts the Access to the Arts Award
Access to the Arts Honoree Alain Coblence
Brooklyn Borough Marty Markowitz reads his proclamation to the gala audience
Hall of Famer John makes his way to the stage via a Mardi Gras "second line" down the aisle of the Opera House
guests
friend at the entrance to the gala
guest.
designer of the latest edition to the campus
the BAM Fisher Building
set to open this summer
The gala tent
guest
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Table Environments by Natalie Frank
of
of Earthwatch
member of Earthwatch International
US Board of Directors
friends.
a director of NYC's Pace Gallery
with Jim Dine.
art collectors who are long-time supporters of the museum.
Esther Mayer. Bob Mayer is co-chair of the museum's Corporate Committee.
Jill Kremer. Jill Kremer is co-chair of the Journal Committee for the upcoming 2012 Ball
the museum's major annual fundraising event.
Carol Wolowitz co-chair the museum's Contemporary Collectors Circle.
Jim Dine visits with museum guests.
Kneisel Hall Young artists perform.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The entire cast of Jim Henson’s Musical World as part of the Weill Music Institute’s Family Concert.
host John Tartaglia
guests
Artistic Director Clive Gillinson with Notables Family Party Co-chairs Mary Wible Vertin
Faces by Derrick
Muppet cookie-decorating
Guests enjoy Twisted Balloons
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Guests at The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center's Health Education Seminar
Young People's Chorus
Jack Goodwin with Young People's Concert t-shirt
Jack Goodwin with Young People's Concert t-shirt
Jack Goodwin family
Kir Rodriguez with cake
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
East Side House Settlement's 13th Annual Gala Preview of the 2012 New York International Auto Show.
Fiat 500 Abarth being driven into the dinner tent by Pat Dougherty
FIAT's Director of Sales
Fe Fendi inside Fiat 500 Abarth
John LaSorsa of the Greater New York Automobile Dealers Association
with Sue LaSorsa
of the Greater New York Automobile Dealers Association
Lydia Fenet with John Sanchez
Executive Director of East Side House Settlement
friend
with friend
with friend
with friend
student at East Side House Settlement
friend
Ken Leach at Gallery 47
Serina Tufo at Katy Kane booth
Ernest de la Torre
NYFC Board members
The bar scene
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
friends at his 21st birthday party at ‘21’ Club.
The cake
Randy friends
more friends
Hartley duPont
Paul duPont
guests
F. E. Smurlo Jr. wearing J.McLaughlin
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Annual Peter CottonTail Easter Egg Hunt at Doubles.
Princeton Trinity Choir of Girls
Anne-Rose van den Bossche
and Guy Clark
Helena Martinez with Julien Brunie
Director of Private Sales for Christie's
Tim Ryan presents the Student Volunteers
Jasper White with his son
his wife
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Gillian andS ylvester Miniter
Rose Dergan andWill Cotton
andTed Gushue
Christine andSteve Schwarzman
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The cast of the NY Philharmonic Spring Gala concert
conducted by Ted Sperling.
Ingeborg Rennert with Albert
Cosby George with Philharmonic
Spring Gala centerpiece
friend
Meera Gandhi with her Ellen Mary McCarthy Agarwal
cousin Mary Mc Kane
FoodToEat.com Team
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Bronx Museum of the Arts Spring Gala
Auction at Three Sixty.
the Henson family
New York University table
Fashion Institute of Technology table
Artistic Tile table
Ralph Lauren table
Marie Mekko Studios table
Pratt Institute table
Mark Cunningham table
Jonathan Adler for Kravet Collections
Joseph Stabalito Interior Design table
Nile Johnson for Philosphy Design Studio
La Crema table
Tilton Fenwick LLC table
Do Moore Designs table
Herman Miller table
Libby Langdon table
Slade Architecture table
Shawn Henderson Interior Design table
New York School of Interior Design
Design Within Reach table
Guess Who's Coming to Dinner table styled by Alexa Stevenson
Guess Who's Coming to Dinner table styled by Alexa Stevenson
Associate curator at Asia Society Museum
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Cator Sparks arriving The Frick Collection's annual Young Fellows Ball by horse-drawn carriage.
Chairmen in Donna Karan Claiborne Swanson Frank
Steering Committee members Caitlin Davis
Guests in the Oval Room
among them Chairman Clare E. McKeon
Elisabeth Saint-Amand enjoy talking among the Renoirs in the East Gallery
Guests enjoy the West Gallery
Cator Sparks in mourning
Steering Committee members Sarah Irwin
Caitlin Davis with Chairman Lydia Fenet
Timothy James in the Fragonard Room
Guests enjoy the Garden Court
Olivia Chantecaille with Vogue's Chloe Malle
Chairman Olivia Chantecaille re-enact Renoir's dancing couple for Bill Cunningham
Mauricio Ardila re-enact Renoir's dancing couple
Annika Connor enjoy desserts by caterer Olivier Cheng
Peter Speliopoulos on the dance floor in the Music Room
The crowded dancefloor during the Young Fellows Ball
violin Root
piano
violin
piano Carr
viola
violin Root
piano
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
founding Director of Reproductive Psychiatry at NYU Medical Center
NYU School of Medicine
Director of Communications for Fountain House
friend
Angela Saralegui with Mariana Peterman
Paula del Rio
friend
Eloise Corcoran with a friend
friend
Mark Sanchez with the children from the Casita Maria Center for Arts &amp
Education at the Youth All-Star Award Program
Table Setting at the RISF Fielding Dreams Gala
Stefanie Ruch addresses the guests
Sarah Defeo shooting Lindsey Weeks
guests
artists
Mariam Azarm with a friend
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Susan Sarandon at Brooklyn Museum's opening of Keith Haring: 1978 - 1982.
Princess Elisabeth von Thurn und Taxis
Patterns of dappled light by Izhar Patkin
Patterns of dappled light by Izhar Patkin
Installation View of Box Gallery
1964. Printed metal
brads
wood
37 ½ x 19 x 19 inches. Collection Beth Rudin DeWoody
1981. Concrete block
Fresnel lens system
wood
leather
transistor radio
12 ½ x 8 ½ x 12 ¼ inches. Collection Beth Rudin DeWoody
1967. Oil on canvas
42 x 59 inches. Collection Beth Rudin DeWoody
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Lincoln Center Institute's Annual Benefit Gala at Frederick P. Rose Hall at Jazz at Lincoln Center.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
andBarry Frediani
Fran Le'sperance
Hartley duPont
Princess Alexandra of Greece
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Associates Committee of The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center's 21st Annual Bunny Hop at FAO Schwarz Fifth Avenue.
children
son
daughter
daughter
friends
children
daughter
children
daughter
son
son
son
son
daughter
daughter
daughter
daughter
Bunny &amp
Tiffany’s Egg
Bunny &amp
Tiffany’s Egg
Guests enjoying balloon station
children
children
Snake time
Snake time
Live Animal station
Hard at work
Face paintings
son
son
friend
Public Theater Chairman of the Board
director Alex Timbers
Samuel Peabody with his friend Solange
daughter
writer for The Daily Show
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The New York Junior League's 2012 Winter Ball
Moonlight in Marrakesh.
friends
friends
friends
friends
Cindy Guyer with Rosie
Julie Hayek with Wilbur
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dance Theatre of Harlem performs at its “Vision Gala” fund-raiser
Inc. attracted 600 guests to the New York Hilton Grand Ballroom
Members of One Hundred Black Men
Inc. of New York
Lewis Scholarship presentation to Ramel McIntosh
Senator Malcolm Smith with Eagle Academy students
Mentor of the Year
Chancellor of NY Department of Education
with Loida Lewis
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
ABT dancers Lauren Post
ABT dancer Nicola Curry
Sheila White of GEMS accepts the "Good Heart" award on behalf of Rachel Lloyd
Ellen Lowey &amp
Ronnette Riley with vendor from Striped Giraffe
event co-founder Jacalyn Weinstein
friend
East End Hospice staff Debbie Doyle
group with Story Pirates
chef Lulzim Rexhepi
Alison Cronin with friends
chef Daniel Cooper
friend
Panasera models
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Face-painted little girl
The Cocktail reception
Executive Director of The Film Foundation Margaret Bodde
friend
Dominic d'Alleva
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Giorgio Armani celebrated the upcoming Museum of the City of New York's Winter Ball at its newly reopened boutique on Madison Avenue.
of The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center Annette Rickel
of The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center Annette Rickel
friend
friend
friend
friend
friend
Dave Matthews performing
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Associates Committee of The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center's 4th Annual Associates Luncheon.
Associates Luncheon Chairmen dressed in Salvatore Ferragamo: Nina Garcia Conrod
The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center Annette Rickel
Chairmen of the Department of Pediatrics
friend
friends
and Eleanora Kennedy
Melanie Hamrick toast Natalia Makarova
Luncheon guests
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at The Women's Committee of the Central Park Conservancy's Annual Skating Party.
and-Kids
and-Kids
co-chair
with Cathy Retsiger
Michael Goudket - Continental Army musician
fife from George Washington's Army
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Midnight Quadrille at the 57th annual Viennese Opera Ball.
tenor
bass baritone
perform in "The Impressario"
Dancing stars Tony Dovolani
Maksim Chmerkovskiy break the red carpet routine with reigning Universe Leila Lopes
daughter of Stork Club creator Sherman Billingsley
Austrian to the U.S. Hans Peter Manz
daughter of Stork Club creator Sherman Billingsley
Austrian to the U.S. Hans Peter Manz
Katharina Manz with her father
Austria's the U.S. Hans Peter Manz
Katharina Manz with her father
Austria's the U.S. Hans Peter Manz
parents of VOB Debutante Leila Samii
with their daughter Safiyeh
of the Artists Rights Group
parents of Viennese Opera Ball Debutante Katarina Feder
of the Artists Rights Group
parents of Viennese Opera Ball Debutante Katarina Feder
U.N. to Colombia
U.N. Under-Secretary for Management
Head of the European Union Delegation to the UN
reigning Teen USA Danielle Doty
reigning Universe Leila Lopes
FEED Foundation founder Lauren Bush Lauren
FEED Foundation founder Lauren Bush Lauren
Austrian to the U.S. Hans Peter Manz
friends
friends
14-year-old violinist Yamen Saadi acknowledges the audience's enthusiastic ovation
Majd Machour of Nazareth
Uri Tibon of Tel Aviv play Mozart
HRH Princess Firyal of Jordan
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Drama League's 28th Annual Musical Celebration of Broadway
honoring Kristin Chenoweth.
The Metropolitan Club at noon
BCNY Luncheon on Fifth Avenue
The Metropolitan Club at noon
BCNY Luncheon on Fifth Avenue
Karen Klopp welcome the guests
Andrew Ferguson entertains the guests
Women's Board Sara Ayres
Joel Grey with performers
Elmo on the piano
Associate at Debevoise &amp
Plimpton LLP Brandon C. Gruner welcomes guests to the Gala
Mary Buckley Teatum presenting the 2012 Making Books Sing Harmony award to Javier Sanchez
Edward Smaldone performed "Struttin with some BBQ" at the Gala as a sneak peek to Making Books Sing's upcoming musical about the young Louie Armstrong. Mossman
Smaldone are faculty member of the Aaron Copeland School of Music at Queens College
Acclaimed playwright Nilaja Sun performed a sneak peek from Making Books Sing's upcoming musical about the life of young Louie Armstrong – in character – as Louie
Barbara Zinn Krieger with family
friends
Partners of Sterling National Bank
honoree Javier Sanchez with family
friends
Making Books Sing Board member Jennifer Robinson
Making Books Sing Board member Jennifer Robinson
Marie d'Origny.
friend.
Somers Farkas with Annie.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
French Heritage Society kicked off its 2012 Cultural Season with a private viewing of Le Cabinet de Curiosités.
Thierry W. Despont addresses the guests
Scenes from Le Cabinet de Curiosités
Peninsula Regional Chair Stacey Dobos admiring an early Impressionist painting
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Bergdorf Goodman hosts 20th Anniversary celebration of Christian Louboutin.
model
model
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Geoffrey Bradfield at a reception in Honor of Muna Rihani Al-Nasser &amp
UN Women for Peace.
George proposes to Hilly
Hilly accepts!
The crowd cheers George on
Brian D'arcy James
friend
Jack deLashmet
Jack deLashmet
Jack deLashmet
Jack deLashmet
Jack deLashmet
Jack deLashmet
Jack deLashmet
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Winterfest Family Fun Day at Wollman Rink in Central Park
benefitting K.I.D.S.
Rockin Railroad entertains the chidren
children
nicole Friedman
son Oliver
daughter Reese
friend Jack Fallon
Kids with the balloon artists
John Veihmeyer with wife Irene
Douglas Rediker with Heidi Crebo-Rediker
guests
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
David Komansky Center for Children's Health "Plates for Pediatrics" Benefit Dinner.
The Veteran Corps of Artillery.
Lois Thatcher with Wilhelmena Kelly
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Traditional Dragon Dance on the Josie Robertson Plaza at the New York Philharmonic's first-ever Chinese New Year Gala concert.
Executive Director Zarin Mehta watches as Lang Lang feeds the Chinese dragon on the Josie Robetson Plaza
Lang Lang performs an encore with Quintessenso Mongolian Children's Choir
led by Long Yu
Board Member Sung E. Han-Andersen with Board Member Charles F. Niemeth
&amp
with Honorary Gala Co-Chairman Corrine Greenberg
Philharmonic board member Joel
Philharmonic board member Joel
with Gala Co-Chairmen Annso Wang
friend
The middle bridge to Palm Beach was turned pink to commemorate the 30th anniversary of Susan G. Komen South Florida Race for the Cure
The cocktail hour
Trump water
founder
Susan G. Komen Race for the Cure
addresses the guests
Gov Rick Scott's boots
Gov Rick Scott's boots
Michael Yo with mom Kum Simmons
and Amy Wiborg
Michael Yo with mom Kum Simmons
and Amy Wiborg
The Langone table
Pink cosmos
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dancers snuck out for a break at the Pinkberry Yogurt shop during the NYC Dance Alliance Foundation's first anniversary at The Joyce Theater.
Destiny Rising Curtain Call with NYCDAF's Joe Lanteri
Lauren Adams "In the Beginning."
Plumb PAC in Thang Dao's "Waiting Women."
Catherine Hurlin in Vainonen's "Flames of Paris."
Houston Ballet's Melissa Hough &amp
Garrett Smith in Smith's ”Unseen."
Catherine Hurlin in Vainonen's "Flames of Paris."
Houston Ballet's Melissa Hough &amp
Garrett Smith in Smith's ”Unseen."
Addison Reese in Jason Parsons's "Without Sinking."
STEPS Repertory Ensemble performing “Knead.”
Marymount Manhattan Dance Company in Abdur-Rahin Jackson's" Short Cuts Take Longer."
Camille Brown in her own piece
“The Evolution of a Secured Feminine.”
Former American Ballet star Susan Jaffe.
Talk Back with the NYCDA choreographers
guest artists.
1st Astaire Scholarship Recipient Julliard student
Garrett Smith is congratulated by friends
1st Astaire Scholarship Recipient Julliard student
Garrett Smith is congratulated by friends
choreographer Abdur-Rahin Jackson
choreographer Abdur-Rahin Jackson
Young dancers Amanda Ulibarri
The after party at Nisos
Jane del Missier
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Richard III Opening Night Benefit at BAM in The Lepercq Space.
Sam Ostroff creator
Marilyn white
Patrick Bell's purchase
Patrick Bell's purchase
Table décor by Fleurs Bella for Richard III Opening Night Benefit at BAM
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Guests gathered at Jazzed in January
a benefit for the Preservation Resource Center.
gang
friend
The cast takes their bows
friend
friend
Cast of Red Tails
family
2011 Oil on linen 57 x 81 in / 145 x 205 cm
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
On the dance floor at the 89th Annual Comus Club Inc. Christmas Ball.
and Luther
and Luther
and Carl and
and Carl and
his daughter
his daughter
and Cyrus
and Cyrus
and Joseph
and Joseph
Princess Firyal of Jordan
friends
Meera Gandhi's Giving Back is available at TheGivingBackFoundation.net
on Amazon.
of Ireland to India Kenneth Thompson with his wife Sole Aizpurua
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Lenox Hill Hospital Autumn Ball in the Grand Ballroom of the Waldorf=Astoria
Walking up the snowy staircase
Walking up the snowy staircase
Cornelia greeting the guests
Cornelia greeting the guests
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Greg der Calousdian
Adriana der Calousdian
and Danielle Kosann
Event Co-chairs Tara Mark Rosenblum
Kenneth Rosenblum with their daughters Jane
Event Co-chairs Jacqueline Harris Hochberg
Robert J. Hochberg with their sons Alexander Harris Hochberg
William Mack with Tucker Mack
Event Co-chairs Jacqueline Harris Hochberg
Robert J. Hochberg with their sons Alexander Harris Hochberg
Event Co-chairs Sharon Coplan Hurowitz
Bill Bruder with New York Baroque Dance Company dancers
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Project Sunshine's 2nd Annual Young Leadership Naughty
Nice holiday party at The Bowery Hotel.
friend
Holiday wreathes were created by top designers such as Mario Buatta
Power Lunch table arrangement
Kun Opera mezzo-soprano Qian Yi
Board Chairman Pulitzer-Prize winner writer Michael Chabon
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Strolling carolers at the Doubles Christmas luncheon
The dessert Table
son
and Ric Pipino
children
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
ACRIA's 16th Annual Holiday dinner at the Urban Zen Center at the Stephan Weiss Studio.
friend
friend
Scott Van der Voort
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Deborah Eisenberg at the Jane Hotel.
Frederic Tuten Puppet by Pedro Reyes.
Monica de la Torre.
Orli Shaham with children at the "Compose It!" station.
Co-chairmen Abbe Serphos
Tricia Pantzer with pianist Orli Shaham
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
First Responders at the Women's Media Center Women's Media Awards.
Todd Kwao-vovo
Florence Kwao-vovo.
novelist Amy Waldman
Howard Borowick his family.
Miracle on Madison at Douglas Elliman.
of Madison Avenue Business Improvement District
Chairman of the Board of Trustees of the Children's Aid Society
of
of Children's Aid Society
Director of Silver Promotion Service.
Amy Rosi at Georg Jensen.
Miracle on Madison Tree with Silver Trimmings at OC Concept Store Kid's reception.
Auction items.
The dinner scene.
Jose Pincay with Senor.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Mount Sinai hosted its inaugural Women's Health Fashion Show &amp
From the runway ...
On the Road
olympicathletes 1
olympicathletes 1
Last supper 2
Watson Being Rescued From the Shark
Chairman of the Board of Trustees Robert Liberman
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Limbo at the New York Botanical Garden's Winter Wonderland Ball.
Enid A. Haupt Conservatory model
New York City skyline model
LBi Syrup unveils their documentary featuring the children of Rwanda who were born from the 1994 genocide
their hopes
dreams for the future
Children's artwork at Color Rwanda
The Color Rwanda coloring book made by the children of Rwanda
Abena Koomson perform
Barricade Books publisher Carole Stuart
Broadway's Lee Roy Reams with Ilie Wacs
DC Holocaust Museum's Sheila Johnson Robbins
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Le Baron Roland de L'espee
Princess Beatrice de Bourbon des deux Siciles
Herve de la Vauvre
The Gift Bazaar at the Parrish Presents Cocktail Preview
The Gift Bazaar in the Main Hall
The Hampton Cloud Pillow designed by artist Barbara Marino
Glittering evening bags from Nula Antique Handbags
Silver for
crystal for
Dazzling necklaces
Gleaming silver was a big hit at the Gift Bazaar
Burled wood desk from English Country Antiques
Event chair John Bjornen
Auction Co chair Blossom Gluck
Event chair John Bjornen
Auction Co chair Blossom Gluck
Lynch's Garden Center offered holiday trimmings
author Maria Cooper Janis
author Maria Cooper Janis
portraitist Zita Davisson
portraitist Zita Davisson
Landscape architect Zach Crawford
Fashion legend Stan Herman
Landscape architect Zach Crawford
Fashion legend Stan Herman
David Mendoza offered products from Bali
Event chair John Bjornen
David Mendoza offered products from Bali
Event chair John Bjornen
Steering Committee members Sloan
Sam Saegh with Co-Chairs Jessica
Steering Committee members Ian
friend
Steering Committee member Allison Ecung
friends
Steering Committee member Stephanie Stehman
Steering Committee member Jameson McFadden
friend
8868-panel table
friend
friends
Anniewatt.com.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
New York City Opera's Fall Gala at The Waldorf Astoria.
HRH Alexandra of Greece
HRH Alexandra of Greece
with Lynne Wheat
Patricia Kennedy surrounded by the military families
Snoopy always a favorite
Sending a message to Santa
Sponge Bob drew cheers from the kids
There were over 1
500 cheerleaders marching
Kermit the Frog
View from the brunch
Marching in perfect formation
Watching the parade for the first time
Writing a message to Santa
Preparing for the balloon toss
Patricia Kennedy with Mstr Sgt Jason Leach
wife Kimberly
children
Karen Karmazin with her husband Col. Robert Karmazin
wife Shelby
children
Stephanie Mahaney wearing Peace One Earth Medallion with Patricia Kennedy
Third Street Anniversary Luncheon benefit leadership
honorees
performers
Performing Third Street children
friends
PatrickMcMullan.com
Anniewatt.com
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Veterans Corps of Artillery
Cocktail reception
Dinner toasts
Veterans Corps of Artillery
dinner.
The Schenkein family
Volunteers with gift bags
Eric vin Kuersteiner
PatrickMcMullan.com
Anniewatt.com
Rob Rich/Societyallure.com.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
with director Mark Lamos
Alec Baldwin performing Love Letters
Notables Executive Committee member Mary Wible Vertin giving remarks
Guests enjoying music by DJ Spooky at Providences
guest
Soraya Darabi with guests
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Ballet Next is planning a multi-city
international tour in 2012
Emily agress
Celia de la LLama
friend
friend
friend
friend
friend
PatrickMcMullan.com
Anniewatt.com
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Edgar Batista at opening of "El Mercado" by Colombian artist
Marta Luz Gutiérrez in front of "El Mercado" installation
The crowd
The Colombian band
and Marta Luz Gutiérrez
and Marta Luz Gutiérrez
Director of Havana Biennial
NBC's Brian Williams
Debra del Vecchio
Claudio del Vecchio
Debra del Vecchio
Claudio del Vecchio
Rick Froio with Fountain Gallery Director Jason Bowman
JuneAnn Patrick with Honorees John Ambrosini
Fountain Gallery artists Martin Cohen
John Ambrosini with Co-Chairs
Fountain Gallery artist Martin Cohen
Fountain Gallery artist Anthony Newton
Fountain Gallery artist Robin Taylor
Fountain Gallery artist LB with Agnes Gund
PatrickMcMullan.com Gregory Partanio.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center's Associates Committee
Gem Palace annual Fall Party at the Four Seasons Restaurant.
Siddharth Kasliwal of Gem Palace
Enjoying cardboard jewelry cutouts
Stephanie Coleman interacting with the cotton candy
Siddharth Kasliwal of Gem Palace
Angie Harmon on the dance floor
PatrickMcMullan.com &amp
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Edward Yedid at Holiday House.
architect
theorist
who invented the term "Postmodernism."
Boston critic Robert Campbell
lecturer
Department of Architecture
Sam Jacob of London's FAT
L.A. designer Andrew Tullis
RAMSA architect Gary Brewer
who conceived the event
Robert Adam of Adam Architecture
of
of
Benefit co-chair
member of the Board of Directors David Lubars
honoree Ross Greenburg
Marian Javits with nephew Eric Javitz Jr.
of
of the ALS Association Greater New York Chapter Dorine Gordon
family with David Cone
Board member Kevin Glassman
his wife
her
her
Linda Heister and Cookie Cohen
Linda Heister and Cookie Cohen
PatrickMcMullan.com
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Hope for Depression Research Foundation New York "HOPE" Luncheon Seminar.
and Liz Watson
Sandy Tytel with Kareem
ark Veeder
PatrickMcMullan.com
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dinner under the tent at the Central Park Conservancy's Autumn in the Park.
Prince Dimitri of Yugolasvia
Student s.
The scene at the Guggenheim
Dinner on the museum ramps
Maurizio Cattelan with MGMT
Director of the Guggenheim Foundation
PatrickMcMullan.com
Roger Kisby &amp
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dinner in the Milstein Hall of Ocean Life for American Museum of Natural History's annual benefit.
Coldplay performs
Table centerpieces
guest
Museum’s Chairman of the Board of Trustees Lewis W. Bernard
Tom Freston with Sherri Creighton
T.S.H. Prince Albert II of Monaco
Shenyang performs
Princess of Monaco
Prince of Monaco
Princess Charlene of Monaco
T.S.H. Prince Albert II and
Princess of Monaco
friends
friends
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
friend
friend
and Jean Shafiroff
&amp
of The New York Women's Foundation
Erica &amp;amp
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Colette with Juan Puntes
The National Dance Institute to Michael Jackson's Thriller
New York Song &amp
judith Jamison
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Associates Committee of Fountain House hosted the Fountain House Fall Fete
and Dan Futterman
and Arlene Marshall
Kathy Grano leaves an appreciative note for the hostess
with Lisa Spiro
Samantha Spillane of PROMISE Program at Columbia
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Guests at Legends 2011
Pratt Institute's largest annual scholarship benefit.
pPerforming the capoeira dance by the African Brazilian Carnival
Arts Horizons students
Pratt Thomas F. Schutte addressing Legends 2011 guests
Legends 2011 Awards Designed by Pratt student Jason Rivera
Legends 2011 Award designer Jason Rivera
Agnes Gund presenting Legends 2011 Award to William Wegman
Laurie Anderson performing after awards ceremony
Cocktails at The American Museum of Natural History
Demonstration of 3d training
Dinner in the Milstein Hall of Ocean Life
and Tom Riles
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Jane Krakowski at the Restoration Project's annual Hulaween gala.
Stevie's daughter
Judy Gold. Hugh Hildesley was the auctioneer who also did a bit of "singing
dancing"
Judy Gold. His cajoling brought in $500K for the organization
The packed ballroom of the Waldorf
Martha Stewart with 'Slash'
middle
right
friend
Hulaween GhostiesandGoodies-goers
Director of the Arthur M. Sackler Gallery
Smithsonian Director of Advancement
Giosetta Capriati with Kenneth Buckfire
Fantasy Table created by Floralia Decorators
Fantasy Table created by Penny H.
Albert Einstein College of Medicine
Physician-in-Chief
The Children's Hospital at Montefiore
of Montefiore
Co-Host of The View
Chairman of the Board of Trustees
Albert Einstein College of Medicine
Physician-in-Chief
The Children's Hospital at Montefiore
of Montefiore
Chairman of the Board of Trustees
and Lari Attai with Philip O. Ozuah
former patients at the Children's Hospital at Montefiore
of Greater New York Hospital Association
Special Advisor to the
and Irwin Redlener
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Students of the Josie Robertson School of Music
Art perform at The Women's Board of The Boys' Club of New York's 63rd Annual Fall Dance.
Decor by Antony Todd
The dinner scene
Dancing the night away
The ballroom at the Plaza Hotel for the World Monuments Fund's 2011 Hadrian Award Gala
The Hadrian Award was presented to Ronald
Juan Pablo de la Puente
auctioneer
baby Judd Hock
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
French Consul of NY Philippe Lalliot
Baronne Bernard d’Anglejan Chatillon
Baronne Bernard d’Anglejan Chatillon
Baroness Philippine de Rothschild receiving the Lalique Ochidée bowl
Baronne Bernard d’Anglejan Chatillon
French Consul of NY Philippe Lalliot
baritone James Martin
his team working in the kitchen
baritone James Martin
Copland House resident composer Daniel Brewbaker
Marcus Samuelsson with Susan Dworkin
Corinna daFonseca Wollheim
Kidsfest-mosphere
Kidsfest-mosphere
children
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Guests at table at Mass Hospital for Children's 12th Annual Storybook Ball.
The Board of Directors with Ganga Stone
friend
friend
The centerpieces
Luann Sampson pointing out Carlisle's must-have looks for the season
Bats covering the walkway into Storybook Ball
Pediatric Surgeon-in-Chief of MGHfC
Physician-in-Chief of MGHfC
guest
Guests hitting the dance floor
The women of Storybook Ball dancing up a storm
Dancers for the evening ...
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Guests dine in the East Gallery at The Frick Collection's annual Autumn dinner.
Guests dine in the Oval Room
Guests dine in the long West Gallery
event Chairmen Barbara
event Chairman Elizabeth Eveillard
Chairman of the Board of Trustees Margot Bogert
Frick Associate Curator of Decorative Arts Charlotte Vignon
guests enjoy the Living Hall
Chairman of the Board of Trustees Margot Bogert initiates the remarks
Chairman of the Board Margot Bogert
honoree Anne L. Poulet
Front row: Laura Whitman
Janet Boris. Back row: Jessica Marinaccio
Chairman Joella Lykouretzos with husband John
children
Allison Mignone with children
Melissa Hawks with children
Chairman of the Museum's Board of Trustees Lewis W. Bernard
friends
Children color bookmarks at the Scribble Press booth
Attendees get up close to the Herpetology table at the Museum's Science Center
"A Touch of Nature" with Jerry Zelenka
The Museum's Associate Dean of Science Christopher Raxworthy show attendees a tortoise
Attendees get up close to a giant squid tentacle with Museum Graduate Student Sebastian Kvist
Children check out a lizard
Space gloves
Tiffany &amp
Co. Gem dig
Chairman Allison Mignone with husband Roberto
family
Let's Dress Up
Tiffany &amp
Co Jewelry Box station
Shadow puppeteer
Magician "Magic Al" performs
TV family band Laughing Pizza performs
Milstein Hall of Ocean Life
pastel on paper
her brother Edward Bourdon-Smith
with Leah Durner
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at Capitale at the 3rd Annual Save A Life charity benefit.
Hamilton Fish speaks
Guests listen
Chairman of the Board of Trustees
Chairman of the Board of Trustees
husband Rich
Geoff Teillon with Meghan Kelly
Young Preservationists Co- s Emma Hanratty
Caroline Wallach both of Rye
JHC Board member Kay Booth
friend Stephanie Clark
New JHC Board member Bob Mennella
his wife Pat
Elizabeth Berg is ready for a champagne toast to the Young Preservationists!
Alicia Baldwin take in the JHC's Civil War Exhibit
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
FDNY Ceremony Unit at 26th Annual New York Police
Children's Benefit Fund.
The Park Avenue Armory Drill Hall set for dinner
FDNY Emerald Society Pipes &amp
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Director’s Council of the Museum of the City of New York's “New York After Dark.”
The Pool Room at The Four Seasons
Peter J. Coffey addresses the crowd in the Rose Room of Jazz at Lincoln Center
Click to order The Rise of Fashion
Lessons Learned at Bergdorf Goodman.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Chairman of Carnegie Hall
of the Russian Federation to the United States
of the United States to the Russian Federation
U.S. chairman of PricewaterhouseCoopers
Tchaikovsky’s Variations on a Rococo Theme featuring guest soloist
cellist Yo-Yo Ma.
Maestro Gergiev take their bows
Chairman of Carnegie Hall Sanford
Chairman of Carnegie Hall Sanford
Oscar de la Renta
Oscar de la Renta
The gala dinner at The Waldorf=Astoria’s Grand Ballroom following the concert.
DPC's beloved
adored Byrone
a gift from the Humane Society
Edwina with Harry Benson
Marsia Holzer in Dowry scarf
Edwina with Barbara Taylor Bradford
Edwina with Ashton Hawkin
Stefan Heller addresses the audience
Executive Director of the Hearing Health Foundation Andrea Boidman
actor Richard Kind
singer Shontelle
artist/musician Jay Alan Zimmerman
Executive Director of the Hearing Health Foundation Andrea Boidman
Executive Director of the Hearing Health Foundation Andrea Boidman
ICRF New York Director of Development
ICRF Board of Trustees
Women of Action Judith Sherman with Isaac Sherman
Women of Action Judith Sherman with Isaac Sherman
and Kearran Ambrosino
of Women of Action
of Women of Action
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Guests at 583 Park Avenue for the Hispanic Society of America's annual gala.
Oscar de la Renta
friend
Agatha Ruiz de la Prada
friend
friend
friends
Costanzio del Alamo
friend
Toni duBrul
The packed ballroom of the Plaza Hotel
the Winner Family
former Governor David Paterson
Swizz Beatz gives an autograph
former Governor David Paterson
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Guests milling about before dinner at Hudson River Park’s Pier 57 for the 2011 Whitney Gala.
of
of Women in the Boardroom
with Leena Gurevich
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
A cocktail reception at Doubles marking the 18th annual Quest 400 List.
Cocktail hour
The dinner reception
with Jacob Lieberman
and Nick Hissom
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Cocktails in the Peggy Rockefeller Rose Garden at The New York Botanical Garden’s annual Rose Garden Dinner Dance.
friends
Ellie Naess with friends
friends
friends
friends
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Leonard Lauder at Alzheimer’s Drug Discovery Foundation's 2nd annual luncheon
symposium.
Event Co-chairs Martha Busconi
co-owner of EDIT
co-owner of EDIT
Cocktail hour at Pier 60
Chef's for the Emperor's Banquet
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Young Patrons of Lincoln Center's "Party on the Plaza" at Avery Fisher Hall.
wife Kajsa William Olsson
wife Kajsa William Olsson
NBA great Alonzo Mourning thanks his caddy for a job well done
Red Siox Hall of Famer Jim Rice collectted several trophies including "Closest to the Pin"
NBA Hall of Famer George "Ice Man" Gervin
MLB Hall of Famer
Yankees great Reggie Jackson
MLB Hall of Famer Joe Morgan
NBA Hall of Famer Julius Erving
NBA Hall of Famer Artis Gilmore
former NBA All-Star
ESPN analyst Bruce Bowen
NFL Hall of Famer Steve Largent
NBA Hall of Famer Sam Jones
Nancy Altobello of Ernst &amp
Young with NBA Hall of Famer Rick Barry
Chairman of MENTOR
Guests converse at Boyden Gray's Georgetown home
Scalamandre grab bags
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Paul McCartney with Peter Martins
company
Princess Firyal of Jordan
Steering Committee members Alexander Kamins
friends
Steering Committee member Gaelin Rosewakes
Steering Committee member Gaelin Rosewakes
Co-chairs Heather Schulman
Steering Committee member Jameson McFadden
friend
Steering Committee member Carla Franklin
Steering Committee member Jameson McFadden
friend
Steering Committee member Carla Franklin
Managing Member of FSJ Imports Matt Sandy
daughter Nina Howland
daughter Nina Howland
atherine Crockett
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Astor Hall during dinner
Fifth Avenue through windows.
Anthony W. Marx in conversation
A dinner table in Astor Hall
Astor Hall during dinner
and Jon Meacham
Mary Ellen von der Heyden
Princess Firyal of Jordan
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
friend
friend
The BAM Lepercq Space for the Atys Opening Gala.
board member Thérèse Esperdy
BAM board member Beth Rudin DeWoody
BAM’s board chairman
Field Producer for Nate Berkus Show
Prime Minister of Antigua
Models wearing Eredappa Hart
First of Iceland Dorrit Moussaieff
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Keith Putnam-Delaney at New York Needs You's 2nd annual fundraising gala.
Oscar de la Renta
and Michelle Wu
friends
Masa Tanaka with Rin Tin Tin
Sara Stein with Rin Tin Tin
lakeshia Hudson
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Giving thanks around the pool at a “Thanks-for-Giving” party hosted by Sag Harbor's Susan L. Taylor
Ron Brown with friends
dancers
Dinner table
living statues on stage
James Berwind are both descendants of the Berwind family that built the Elms.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Star on their way to Fashion's Night Out
ABC's Pan Am Stars
Designer Lisa Perry with her Roy Lichtenstein Pop Art-Inspired collection
"Stewardesses" with Lisa Perry
Holding the infamous give-away Pan Am "Vintage" bag
Marissa Berenson signing her new book for Coralie Charriol at Donna Karan's
Nikki Haskell on Madison
friends
Dressed for FNO
pianist/artist Mark Birnbaum
Valentino blowing a kiss outside his boutique
Selling crocheted bracelets outside Same Sky
"a trade-not-aid" initiative which provides employment to HIV positive Women in Africa
also provides foam mattresses to children in Rawanda
Same Sky founder
Beautiful Glass Bead Jewelry available from www.SameSky.com
NY1's Parenting
Children's commentator
Dennis Basso with Lizzie Tisch
daughter
at
daughters at
Jamie Gregory at Tory Burch
Accessories Benefitting the "good works
" Tory Burch Foundation providing economic opportunities for women in the USA
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The packed house at the 36th Annual Hampton Classic Horse Show.
winner of the $250
The Scotto family with Jill Rappaport
Wolffer Estate Vineyard &amp
Sotheby's International Realty
Willem Van der Wal
Michiel Van der Wal
Frederique Van der Wal
Scyler Van der Wal
Ronald K. Brown leads the company in “Ife My Heart”
A dance Company in “Ife My Heart”
Heating up the dance floor
Susan L. Taylor embraces Ronald K. Brown
Ancy Verdier presents Lola C. West with her award
Event chair Ancy Verdier
wife Katherine Verdier
Diamond's Selene Martinez
Board members Joanne Hill
Ronald K. Brown welcomes the guests
honoree Lola C. West
The honorees: Keith Clinkscales
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Jeffrey Sachs at Plum Hamptons magazine's a Literary Evening
The Romneys with the Henry family
Jody henry
Shary Aziz family
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Sunset cocktails at the Bridgehampton Tennis
A pail of flip-flops as the table centerpiece
Showing off the flip-flops: Shari Vermeulen
On the lawn of 1 MiMA Tower
friend
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Isabel Fernandez with Peregrin Falcon
Isabel Fernandez with Peregrin Falcon
friend
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Albert Einstein College of Medicine of Yeshiva University held its 22nd Annual Wild Wild West Carnival.
friend
James D'adamo
friend
James D'adamo
Kara Stein with Alexis
family
Nina Rennert Davidson with Joshua
daughter
family
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Rooftop scene from Alex Hitz's Summer Dinner Party in Hollywood Hills
Christine deForest Keys
Christine deForest Keys
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Medal Day picnicers at The MacDowell Colony's 52nd annual Medal Day celebration.
Michael Chabon presents Edward Albee with the 2011 Edward MacDowell Medal
clockwise from top left: David Macy
Medal Day Crowd under the Tent
Visitors view Kristin Jones installation at Pageant Theatre
Sarah Jones entertains visitors in her studio
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Savannah Buffet hosted a charity benefit for Playing For Change at Surf Lodge in Montauk.
Walter Looss with Bettina Stelle
Carol Sue Gershman: The Jewish &amp
Susan Lucci: All my Life
Christina Oxenberg: Will Write for Compliments
Leah Lane: Jews on Broadway
Jill Martin: I have Nothing to Wear
Beth Ostrosky Stern: Oh my Dog
Lisa Hartman: Dial a Dynamite Dog
Charla Krupp: How to Never Look Fat Again
Richard Wiese: Born to Explore
Jack deLashmet: Hamptons Gardens
Christina Haag: Come to the Edge
friends
Irvin Mayfield &amp
the New Orleans Jazz Playhouse Revue
son Charlie Raymond
daughter
son Charlie Raymond
her Stephanie Trolle
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
the Documentary premiering on Monday eve August 15th
activist &amp
founder of Ms. Magazine
Gloria Steinem - looking good at 77
Gloria at the HBO Podium
during a Q &amp
following the screening
activist &amp
founder of Ms. Magazine
Gloria Steinem - looking good at 77
Gloria at the HBO Podium
during a Q &amp
following the screening
Celebrated artist Barbara Nessim turns to focus on speaker
of the Women's Media Center
Celebrated artist Barbara Nessim turns to focus on speaker
of the Women's Media Center
speaker Gloria Feldt
speaker Gloria
still mentoring
The Gap aka Grandparents Advocacy Project
friends
other honorees
other honorees
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Last Friday in Newport
Isherwood Gallery hosted an Opening Reception for artist Frederick Ames Cushing.
Bidding at the auction
View of ArtCrush silent auction
artist Will Cotton
Baldwin Gallery's Richard Edwards
2011 Aspen Award for Art Recipient Roni Horn
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Renee Liddell at Lisa Perry
Dorothy Lichtenstein's launch of their dress collection in Sag Harbor.
John Simpson with Spanks
Ruth Katz with a rescue
Denise Lucas with Spanks
and Richard Burns
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Anne Hearst hosted cocktails to celebrate the upcoming 2011 Alzheimer’s Association Rita Hayworth Gala.
the scene of the party
Hyde Hall in Springfield
Mary-and Ellen Kachanis
Mary-and Ellen Kachanis
Marilyn O'neill
Marilyn O'neill
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Young aspiring ballerinas with baskets of mystery boxes at the Island Moving Company
The Newport Historical Society's Opening Night: "Dance with the Stars."
The Island Moving Company's dancers pay homage to Fred Astair
"Cheek to Cheek."
Table settings by Sharon Cameron Lawn
Dancing the night away in Newport
A view of the Chicago skyline
Navy Pier from Chicago Opera Theater's 3rd Annual Opera Cruise
Guests enter the "Pick-Your-Prize" raffle aboard COT's 3rd Annual Opera Cruise on Lake Michigan
the generous sponsor of COT's 3rd Annual Opera Cruise
COT's signature cocktail
the "Opera-tini
" on Chicago Opera Theater's 3rd Annual Opera Cruise
COT Director of Marketing
PR Colleen Flanigan with COT Production Manager Brad Vernatter
COT 's Council Member Edward "Bud" Dobbins with Board Trustees Gs L. Wolff
Mezzo-Soprano Katherine Calcamuggio sings
Tenor Scott Ramsay sings
COT Director of Development Andrea Cedusky
COT Events Coordinator Sally Preminger with Ashley Kincaid
Chair of COT's Opera Underground Executive Council. Opera Underground is COT's young professional's club.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Julie Ratner at The Heat benefit for the Ellen Hermanson Foundation
Under the tent
tzhak Perlman
the children
The buffet
guests
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The NYC Dance Alliance Foundation held its night of song
dance Roberta
celebrating Roberta Flack at the Skirball center.
The slient auction
which included over 70 packages
friend
John Lombardo with Knicks City Dancers
John Lombardo with Knicks City Dancers
family
friend
Katie Chappell with a friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Under the dinner tent at "Voluptuous Panic
" the 18th Annual Watermill Center Summer Benefit.
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene from above at Ovarian Cancer Research Fund’s 14th annual Super Saturday 14 benefit.
A look around the Eric Cohler-decorated townhouse in lower Manhattan ...
friend
friends
friend
friend
Consul of Latvia
Consul of Korea in New York
of the Consular Corps of Philadelphia during his presentation
Consul of Korea in New York
of the Consular Corps of Philadelphia during his presentation
Consul of Israel
Honorary Consul of Chile
Consul of Mexico
Niki Gerard from New York
wife of the Consul of Italy in Philadelphia
from Harrisburg
The Historical Society of Pennsylvania
honorary chair of the Gala
Honorry Consul of Sweden
of
CFO of the Philadelphia Museum of Art
H.E. Hafstrom from Sweden
Joseph del Rasso
friend
Honorary Consul of Norway in Philadelphia
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Kathy Bolkovac at The Cinema Society's screening of "The Whistleblower."
Children of the City boardmembers
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Fernanda Gilligan gets a ride at Fitch’s Corner Horse Trials
in Millbrook
riding Bali Hai
wins a grand prize
The luncheon tent
Setting up for the Luau
Hula Dancers at the Luau
Nancy Schaefer with Madder Hatter
Nancy Schaefer with Madder Hatter
Robert Redd shoppers
Robert Redd shoppers
Being fitted for La Mundial custom boots
Being fitted for La Mundial custom boots
White Birch team walked away with a 16-10 victory.
Vanity Belles sing at the 15th annual Bridgehampton Polo challenge at Two Trees Farm
Russell Simmons staying cool
The winners: White Birch Farms
children
The winners: White Birch Farms
children
daughter Lulu Johnson
daughter Lulu Johnson
Jeremiah James sings I Surrender
Jeremiah James sings I Surrender
Brass players Michael Davis
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Eryn Reece of Mayahuel
Among the chefs who created culinary magic were:
Brasserie 8 ½ Jonathan Benno with Richard Capizzi
Lincoln Matteo Bergamini with Marisa &amp
David Burke Townhouse Jawn Chasteen &amp
The Sea Grill Victor Chavez &amp
Smith &amp
Wollensky with Craig Koketsu &amp
Scarpetta Jeremy Culver with the Gurrera Family
Ford’s Filling Station Larry Forgione
An American Place with Marc Forgione
Wynn Encore Clark Frasier &amp
Mark Gaier of Arrows Restaurant
Craig Hopson with the Maccioni Family
Zarela Catering &amp
Consulting with Aaron Sanchez
Craigie on Main Tory McPhail with Ti Martin &amp
the Brennan Family
Commander’s Palace Marco Moreira &amp
Proof on Main Charlie Palmer
Aureole Ben Pollinger with the Livanos family
Gotham Bar &amp
Rock Center Café with Juan Branez
Cucina &amp
Social Eatz Joachim Splichal &amp
Olympe with Thomas Troisgros
il Gelato Vivoli Jean-Georges Vongerichten
Jean-Georges with Cedric Vongerichten
Sylvia’s Bill Yosses
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Under the Nautical-themed dinner tent at Caramoor's Opening Night of its 66th International Music Festival.
baritone Daniel Mobbs
with baritone Scott Bearden
his wife
The cast of HMS Pinafore on stage of the Venetian Theater
Jorell Williams in HMS Pinafore
Georgia Jarman in HMS Pinafore
After Dark party dancing to Vince Giordano
the Nighthawks
/Executive Director of OSL
Vice of OSL
Caramoor's Director of Opera Will Crutchfield
Muffie Fitzgerald with Caramoor trustees Bim Kendall
Will Crutchfield with soprano Georgia Jarman
anesthesiologist
Hospital for Special Surgery
anesthesiologist-in-chief
Hospital for Special Surgery
anesthesiologist
Hospital for Special Surgery;
former SEC chairman
Hospital for Special Surgery board member
pediatric orthopedic surgeon
Hospital for Special Surgery
former of the City of New York
executive vice
surgeon-in-chief director
medical director
Hospital for Special Surgery
foot surgeon
ankle surgeon
Hospital for Special Surgery
Hospital for Special Surgery trustee
including Anil S. Ranawat
Hospital for Special Surgery
Hospital for Special Surgery;
Hospital for Special Surgery
radiologist-in-chief
Hospital for Special Surgery
physiatrist
Hospital for Special Surgery
William A. Haseltine Foundation for Medical Sciences
the Arts
chief
Hospital for Special Surgery
Lifetime Achievement Award recipient;
his wife Barbara
daughter Jennifer
spine surgeon
Hospital for Special Surgery
chairman
Black Enterprise founder Earl Graves
chairman
Hospital for Special Surgery board member
dinner committee chair
pediatric hip surgeon
Hospital for Special Surgery;
his wife
Hospital for Special Surgery Board of Trustees co-chair
hip surgeon
Hospital for Special Surgery
orthopedic surgeon
Hospital for Special Surgery
his wife
along with Dines parents' David Dines
sports medicine orthopedic surgeon
his wife Judi Dines
co-chair of the Board of Trustees
Hospital for Special Surgery
Hospital for Special Surgery Board of Trustees co-chair
executive
chief executive officer
Hospital for Special Surgery
vice chairman
Members of the First Troop Philadelphia City Cavalry present the Colors
Valley Forge Military Academy cadets at entrance to Corinthian Yacht Club
J. Travis Logan fold the American flag before dinner
5-foot long
illuminated model of the SS United States donated by Ered Matthew adorns the buffet table
The Program Books were based on the original 1950's menus from the SS United States
Julia Wirts joined H.F. “Gerry” Lenfest during the cocktail reception. Steven Ujifusa served as a Gala Committee
H.F. “Gerry” Lenfest chats with gala committee members Penelope
Maritime artist James Allen Flood
Siu Fung in front of Flood’s painting of the SS United States
Jac Lieberman in 50’s attire
Maritime artist James Allen Flood
Siu Fung in front of Flood’s painting of the SS United States
Jac Lieberman in 50’s attire
both recipients of the Conservancy’s Blue Riband Award
Colonel David Gray of VFMA with Honorary Gala Gerry Lenfest
who last year donated $5.8 million to the Conservancy to purchase the SS United States
saving the fabled ocean liner from certain destruction
First Troop Philadelphia City Cavalry member Charlie Rogers
First Troop Philadelphia City Cavalry member Llewellyn Hunt
Event Planner Alix Jacobs with Valley Forge Military Academy’s Denis Spizuoco
Matthew Schulte of the Steamship Historical Society presents “Ship of the Year” award to Daniel J. McSweeney
Matthew Schulte of the Steamship Historical Society presents “Ship of the Year” award to Daniel J. McSweeney
musician Skip Denenberg
Mark Byers of Wilmington Trust addresses the Gala
of the Conservancy
speaks at dinner
his Orchestra play music in the style of the ship’s original first class Meyer Davis Orchestra
Heidi McKenzie. Their Jim Green was a steward on the maiden voyage
met his wife Frieda aboard the ship a few years later
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Opening night of the second edition of Art Antiques London.
Italian historian
The Hermitage Museum's Ekaterina Khmelnitskaya with Geoffrey de Bellaigue
former Keeper of the Queen's Collection
former Windsor Castle archivist
Kate Malone at Adrian Sassoon
Master of Ceremonies
Kate Malone at Adrian Sassoon
Master of Ceremonies
Silver expert John Culme
wife
with husband
San Francisco's Malcolm Gutter
Woolley director
Wallis director
New York's Erik
Cornelia Thomsen with daughter
San Francisco's Malcolm Gutter
Woolley director
Wallis director
New York's Erik
Cornelia Thomsen with daughter
Giles Haughton with Kitty Flight
Santa Fe's Tai Gallery
Clocks at Raffety
Adrian Sassoon on his stand
New York's Jane Kahan Gallery
Michael Goedhuis holding court in his stand
E &amp
former ACC grantee
with John Vaida
Museum of Modern Art
Museum of Modern Art
Manager at Mikimoto
SAKAYA sake shop
the Japan Foundation
Center for Global Partnership;
the Japan Foundation;
Sapna Champaneria an Fiona Kaye
friends
friends
Edd Dillworth with Dinner Chair Patricia Vallary
Edd Dillworth with Dinner Chair Patricia Vallary
musician Daniel Liguor
musician Daniel Liguor
NHL Hall of Famer Rod Gilbert
NHL Hall of Famer Rod Gilbert
NHL Hall of Famer Rod Gilbert
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Amar Ramasar perform at LONGHOUSE Preserve's Summer Benefit
A rapt audience
David Slivka andß Michelle Slivka
Karen LeFrak with Gem
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Suzanne Geiss at English-Speaking Union Garden Party.
Donation board for the Learning Center
Fundraising board
Deborah Cox drew everyone to their feet
Deborah Cox drew everyone to their feet
Models waiting their turn on the runway
Walking the runway
of The Feinstein Institute for Medical Research
ABC-TV’s John Quinones
legendary singer Carly Simon
of
of North Shore LIJ Health Systems
Committee Board member
Board of Directors of the Feinstein Institute for Medical Research
of the North Shoe LIJ- Health System Foundation
legendary singer Carly Simon
ABC-TV’s John Quinones with his family
producer Al Rodriguez
: ABC-TV’s John Quinones
committee board member
of
of North Shore-LIJ Health System
ABC-TV’s John Quinones with Daniel O. Griffin
ABC-TV’s John Quinones emcees the 6th annual summer concert “Nobody Does It Better
” benefiting The Feinstein Institute for Medical Research
Michael Kovner with Phoebe
Michael Kovner with Phoebe
Leigh Algiere with Regis Philbin
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Summer Soiree guests enjoying the 70th Street Garden
designed by Russell Page.
Guests in the 70th Street Garden.
Wines were provided by Anna de Cordorníu
Chairman Lucy Jane Lang wearing a Rod Keenan hat made from the dress sleeves
with Frick Director Anne L. Poulet
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Douglas Sheldon addresses the crowd at the Mandarin Oriental for a post-performance dinner.
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Terrie Sultan on stage with various Founding Partners of the Parrish Art Museum in Southampton to celebrate the 2011 Midsummer Party gala.
friends
dancing
and Ellen Lewis
and Ellen Lewis
friend
DJ Ray Jarrell provided the evening’s soundtrack
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Ed Westwick at the Duke of Edinburgh’s International Award
Young Americans’ Challenge at the Pierre Hotel.
Cheri R. Kaufman with Nikki
Whoopie Goldberg with friends
HRH the Prince Edward
HRH the Prince Edward
friends
Juan Carlos anglero
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Kathleen Rogers with children
Kathleen Rogers with children
Children playing
Children playing
with children
with children
children
children
children
Carol Goldberger enjoys a Nathan's!
Tabitha Queens of Noize
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Third Annual Sunset Cruise to benefit Friends of Animal Rescue.
Rescue Ink's Pal
Jay with Brutus
Christine with Fanny
Renee Ryan with Winnie
Renee Ryan with Winnie
Town&amp;Country
Berluti in action
Town&amp;Country winning team – Hannah Buchan
The Buchan family
Duke Buchan with Don Langois
the boys
Turquoise dream
The right tie
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Charles Maddock Foundation's annual benefit at Avenue.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Jamie Lister at Barefoot Under the Stars to Benefit Group for the East End.
Another majestic sunset over the Hudson.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
friend
friend
The gorgeous oceanfront home of Margie
Michael Loeb in Southampton
friend
Guests were treated to a viewing of a collection of ABT’s recently restored ballet costumes
The Grand Ballroom of the Plaza Hotel
friend
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dinner in The Altman Building for RIOULT dance company's annual gala.
company
RIOULT dancers
RIOULT dancers
David Webb designs
Jenna Lyons w/ Children
Playing the Sing for Hope Piano
friends
friends
August duPont
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
CancerCare Board of Trustees Susan Smirnoff
CancerCare Board of Trustees Member Paul M. Friedman with Susan Friedman
Master of Ceremonies Max Gomex
Showtime Network of Entertainment David Nevins
with CancerCare Board of Trustees Members Edward C. Lauber
CancerCare Board of Trustees Member Jan Myers Cook with William Cook
Honoree Jenny Bicks with Congresswoman Nita Lowey
Sotheby's Auctioneer C. Hugh Hildesley
CancerCare Board of Trustees Member Linda T. Vahdat with Anne Moore
CancerCare Board of Trustees member Paul M. Friedman
CancerCare Board of Trustees Susan Smirnoff
Master of Ceremonies Max Gomez
CancerCare Board of Trustees Member Paul M. Friedman with CancerCare Board of Trustees Susan Smirnoff
CancerCare Board of Trustees Susan Smirnoff
Showtime Network of Entertainment David Nevins
Mario Lacouture with CancerCare Director of Education
CancerCare Director of Communications Jeanie M. Barnett
CancerCare Board of Trustees Member Andrew Pizzo
friend
Pajama program's 10-year anniversary cake
and Ashky Nadkam
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
A musical performance by the Little Flower Choir at The Rose Luncheon honoring “The Woman Who Makes A Difference.”
Jeffrey Pfeifle welcomes guests
Table settings at the Metropolitan Club
A fashion show featuring designer Kimberly Towers
Kimberly Towers with models
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Chelsea Dreamers at 2011 “I Have A Dream” Foundation Spring Gala.
An awesome table of kids
&amp
former Gov Thomas H Kean
Udell family
friend
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Silk Road Ensemble with Yo Yo Ma
students of the Harbor Conservatory for the Performing Arts in Journey of a Dream
performed at Boys &amp
Girls Harbor’s 19th Salute to Achievement.
Boys &amp
Harbor alumni Judge Edwin Padro
Boys &amp
Chairman of the Board of Directors
Boys &amp
Co of Tishman Speyer
of Pershing Square Capital Management
Boys &amp
Girls Harbor Board Member Sylvester Miniter with his wife Gillian
Harbor Boardmember David Knott with his wife Ginny
Boys &amp
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Event co-chair Kathy Gantz
luncheon committee member Marilyn Rosen
Museum trustee Rita Lerner
event co-chair
Museum trustee Patti Kenner
event co-chair
Museum vice chair Ann Oster
The luncheon at the Pierre
Stella Levi with her family members John Grunberg
Helen Shabas Melin with her daughter Charlette Klarfeld Jaffe
a member of the Spring Women's Luncheon committee
Gallery educator
Patron member Priscilla Grabino with her guest Kay Kalegerakis
Owner of "My Most Favorite Food" Doris Schechter with Primo Levi Deputy Director Alessandro Cassin
Spring Women's Luncheon Committee Member Marilyn Rosen
her Angie Goldfeier
Luncheon committee member Elyse Butnick
her daughter Francesca Butnick
luncheon committee member Rosa Strygler
author of Recipes Remembered: A Celebration of Survival
with Cynthia Perl
Museum Trustee Nancy Fisher with Director of Education Elizabeth Edelstein
Museum Trustee Fanya Gottesfeld Heller with Lucinda Morgenthau
The rooftop bar of the Gramercy Park Hotel was the scene for The Lincoln Center Institute's Junior Spring Benefit.
Dani Baum on "Goldie Rush": "She's our maven."
friend.
Another round of blood orange cocktails.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Chairmen of The New York Botanical Garden's Conservatory Ball: An Evening at the Alhambra at the Botanical Garden.
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
students
students
a young AIS client who gave a speech about her stuttering
a young AIS client who gave a speech about her stuttering
Honoree Arthur Blank with NFL Friends
Pulitzer Prize journalist Clarence Page
Pulitzer Prize journalist Clarence Page
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Michael Green at Lotus Leadership Awards Luncheon
Doria de la Chapelle
former Chairman
of Aetna
of Financial Services
Chairman of
of Xerox
COO of Verizon Communications
of the National Academy Foundation
of Capital One Financial Corporation with students
Moody's Corporation looks at student projects
Chairman &amp
chat with NAF students
of the National Academy Foundation
with Gene Ludwig
Chairman &amp
Founder of
Chairman of Promontory Financial Group
Former Chairman of the Federal Reserve
of the National Academy Foundation.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Friends of the High Line
AOL celebrated the opening of Section 2 of the High Line.
Kelly d
Christopher d
Kelly d
Christopher d
Rainbow City by FRIENDS WITH YOU
Taking in the view
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Rinaldini family as the Royal family: Prince Harry
Camilla Duchess of Cornwall
Kate Duchess of Cambridge
Queen Elizabeth at The Theodore Roosevelt Sanctuary &amp
Audubon Center's 2011 Legacy of Conservation Gala.
The Thrift Shop was transformed into a Designer Showhouse featuring 9 rooms
ARF dogs
cats were available for adoption
Nicole Cicogna addresses the crowd
Alice Truax - of the Board
Jen Kelly for Marc Jacobs
McGraw Hill table
Luis Rinaldini as Prince Philip
Alice del Bosco
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Milly de Cabrol with Asprey Executives at The Madison Square Boys &amp
Girls Club's 6th annual Purses &amp
Pursenalities luncheon
Under the tent
Cheo Leon at Asia de Cuba
Sam at Sushisamba
gang
Justin Vogle at Gilt
Stephen Attoe at Swifty's
Jennifer Pascale at Bridgewater Chocolate
George Aviles at Columbus Tavern
Chef Silverio Chavez at Bice
Vittorio Assaf at Geisha Restaurant
Chef Antoine Camin at La Goulue
Swifty's Robert Caravaggi
Taj at Thalassa Restaurant
Taj at Thalassa Restaurant
the West Point Glee Club
The whole cast taking bows
and Barbara Taylor Bradford
and Barbara
wife Patty Read
wife Patty Read
with Music Director Steven Reineke
with Music Director Steven Reineke
friend
friend
friends Tyne Daly
friend
friends
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
David Yarnold with" Women of The Gulf" at The National Audubon Society's 8th annual Women in Conservation Luncheon at The Plaza.
Literacy Partners’ “Food for Thought” luncheon at Le Cirque
Erica Jong signs my book
Stephen Burks with Marybeth Bentwood
Adam Smith with Vera Djonovic
Burks with Nicholas Andersen
Julie Ho of Confettisystem
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at the Heckscher Playground at the annual Playground Party.
daughters
her daughter
Face painting
Hula hooping
Vehicle exploring
Stilt walking
Cup cake decorating
The guests in the ballroom at 583 Park Avenue
Seriana van den Berg
Susie van den Berg
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The dinner tent on Gracie Mansion's lawn at the New York Restoration Project 's 10th Annual Spring Picnic.
Flowers by
decor by
Tree of 40 Fruits by Sam Van Aken.
friends
friends
udy Gold
friends
The 29th Annual Fred &amp
Adele Astaire Awards at the Skirball Center for the Performing Arts
NYC Dance Alliance partiers
Jacques d'Amboise
Jacques d'Amboise
Charlotte d
Christopher d
Karen Ziemba congratulates Susan Stroman
Karen Ziemba congratulates Susan Stroman
Choreographer Melanie LaPatin with dancers Iveta Lukosiute
Choreographer Melanie LaPatin with dancers Iveta Lukosiute
Jacques d’Amboise
Jacques d’Amboise
CCFA TEEN Committee members
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Cecelia McCarton addresses the guests at The McCarton Foundation's 10th Year Diamond Anniversary.
dancing
Peter Gerhardt education Dir of McCarton School
auctioneer
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Amy McFarland at a private cocktail reception at PRADA to benefit the New Yorkers For Children 2011 Fall Gala.
NMSDC Board member Lisa Martin of Pfizer
honoree David Morgan of D.W. Morgan
honoree J. Leslie Prystup of Prystup Packaging Products
Eileen Drake of United Technologies Corporation
who accepted the award for UTC Chairman
Jr. of Tyco International
Soloist Tia Fuller plays "America
the Beautiful."
Bandleader George Gee conducts the George Gee Orchestra
which provided entertainment for the Dinner Dance.
Swinging to the George Gee Orchestra
Bandleader George Gee with Earvin "Magic" Johnson
Peter Lamm with Drs. Petre
Spurlock with Herbie The Labrador Retriever
AMC s
Currao with
Spurlock with Kate Coyne
Herbie accepting his award
Event chair Annette Osnos with Christian Miller
Event chairs Kane Nussbaum
Barbara Hoffman with Ann Hohenhaus
Deborah Lamm with Amos accepting his award
friend
Dana Buchman with daughters Annie
Children's Host Committee 2011
Board of Trustees
Board of Trustees
Board of Trustees
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Hellenic Times Scholarship Recipients with John Aniston
friends
Tovah Feldshuh with students from the Frank Sinatra School of the Arts
Bonnie Comley with friends
Guest artists Sister Sledge
Scott the Knife
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Josh Charles at Food Bank For New York City's Ninth Annual Can-Do Awards
Make the Road New York
Katrina vanden Heuvel
friends
Dancing at the after-party at the 2011 Community Gala
Director of Hester Street Collaborative
Executive Producer of Glee
Chairman of the ETM Board of Directors
Michael Schaefer stands with ETM Honoree Dante Di Loreto
Michael Trevino enjoy ETM awards ceremony.
Glee stars Darren Criss
Chairmen of Twentieth Century Fox Television
proudly watches Dante Di Loreto accept his award
Pulitzer Prize winning playwright
looks on from an adjacent table.
Ronald McDonald House New York children
Terry Lundgren with a thank-you card for event sponsor
Musical performance by the children of the Ronald McDonald House New York Chorus
led by Steven Reineke
Director of the New York Pops.
Stanley B. Shopkorn with wife Tracy
son Matthew
daughter of RMH-NY Founder Vivian Harris with Ronald
Keith T. Anderson with Ralph Schlosstein
Ronald McDonald House New York &amp
Chairman of the Board Stanley B. Shopkorn
of Weber Shandwick Worldwide
Kenneth G. Langone with Keith T. Anderson
Warnaco Chairman Joseph Gromek with Ronald McDonald House New York Director of Special Events
CFO of Earl G. Graves
Barbara Walters with a Ronald McDonald House New York recognition award
Ronald McDonald House New York Board Member Tina Lundgren with RMH-NY resident Chloe Hewitt
Lydia Fenet of Christie's conducting the auction
Jon Stewart steals the mic
Lucy Cabrera with her grandchildren
Sarah McLaughlincloses the evening
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Elyse Newhouse at The Crohn’s
Colitis Foundation of America's Eighteenth Annual Women of Distinction Luncheon at the Waldorf-Astoria.
The Crohn’s
Colitis Foundation of America
hosted their Eighteenth Annual Women of Distinction Luncheon at the Waldorf-Astoria.
friends
friends
supporters
friend
friends
friends
friend
DOGGY JOHN in The New York Palace hotel's courtyard.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Performers greet the guests on Ellis Island as The National Ethnic Coalition of Organizations held its 25th annual Ellis Island Medal of Honor ceremony followed by a black tie gala in The Great Hall on Ellis Island.
Scene of lower Manhattan
Sailing on the Hudson River
Statue of Liberty
Performers greet the guests on Ellis Island
Servicemen great the gala guests
Korean Tradional Dance Institute dancers
The Great Hall on Ellis Island
The newly designed Medals of Honor
The scene before the medal ceremony
women
Medal of Honor recipients
Fireworks illuminate the Statue of Liberty
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Minutes before dinner on the promenade of the David H. Koch Theater for the New York City Ballet's annual Spring Gala.
event chairmen Clemence von Mueffling
Daniel Brodsky with Wendy Whelan
Dinner on the promenade of the David H. Koch Theater
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
friend
Mika Brzezinski. Click to order Knowing Your Value: Women
Getting What You’re Worth.
Ruthanna Hopper. Click to order Beneath a Starlet Sky.
Ruthanna Hopper. Click to order Beneath a Starlet Sky.
owner of Satine Boutique with Coco Lee
owner of Satine Boutique with Coco Lee
friend
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Guests at the Frick's Spring Party enjoyed rare access to the Russell Page Garden on 70th Street.
Guests in the Russell Page Garden
Rosé wines were donated by Wölffer Estate Vineyard
friend
friend
the Frick's Andrew W. Mellong Chief Librarian
friend
the Frick’s Andrew W. Mellon Chief Librarian
Executive Director of the Frick’s Center for the History of Collecting
grandson
Associate Curator of Decorative Arts Charlotte Vignon
Guests enjoy the Music Room
dr Robert I. Grossman
Ken langone
Ken langone
Mark Tortarella with a friend
Four pairs of Paul Mayer ballet flats were offered with four tickets to the New York City Ballet as one of the silent auction lots
Lauren duPont
Lauren duPont
Lauren dePont
Lauren duPont
Chinese Arts Revival hosted a celebration of Asian Heritage Month at Radiance Tea House
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
On the runway at 2011 Parsons Fashion Benefit at Pier Sixty.
Diana by Will St. John
cookies
Phillips bag
Will Ryman's Tulips on Park Avenue
View from La Suite
Minister of Economic Affairs
Societe e De Solidarite SA
&amp
Head of OCC
Beija Flor Samba school
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Debutantes dance
escorts dance
Bal des Berceaux Debutantes
Caroline de Ravel d'Esclapon
of FAAFC
of FAAFC
Tristane de la Presle
Seated for dinner at the Plaza Hotel's Grand Ballroom
Consul of France in New York
of France to the United States
Débutante Cecilia Claire Lewis singing USA National Anthem
Orchestra of St. Luke's 2011 Gala at The Plaza included a performance by OSL with guest artists soprano Christine Brewer
conductor Julian Kuerti
Interior décor by David Monn
Interior décor by David Monn
OSL Gala Alicia Glen representing honoree The Goldman Sachs Urban Investment Group
The table settings
The “Pink Bomb" awards
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dancing at the Pierre for The Society of Memorial-Sloan Kettering's 43rd annual Spring Ball.
The decor for the The Society of Memorial-Sloan Kettering's 43rd annual Spring Ball.
Back of Carole Mack
and Sara Johnson Kaplan
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The New York Foundation for the Arts celebrated their 40th Anniversary at the Prince George Ballroom.
Façade of 583 PARK - awaiting guest arrivals
View of the ballroom of 583 PARK from the balcony
View across dining room
table décor by Renny&amp;Reed with Robert Van Nutt
honoree Alllan Greenberg
salutee Inge Heckel
salutee Patti Matson
honoree Allan Greenberg
honoree Allan Greenberg
honoree Allan Greenberg
wife Judith Seligson
and Dickinson and
co-chair Susan Ball
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
L’Art de l’Automobile: chefs-d’oeuvre de la collection Ralph Lauren
Katlean deMonchy
Blake Lively’s Chanel Madamoiselle handbag
Michael R. Bloomberg’s Golf Bag
Courtney Cox handbag
Celebrity bags
Clockwise from top left: Jessye Norman
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at the Brooklyn Artists Ball
Scholarship Chair Steve Cho talks over the Lotus Evora IPS
E.J. Viso in Lotus Evora IPS
Fe Fendi in Lotus Evora IPS
friend
The auction table
Mia with
Eva with
Angela laPick
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dancing in the Akeley Hall of African Mammals
Drinks in the Roosevelt Rotunda
Bagpiper lead guests to dinner
Dinner in the Milstein Hall of Ocean Life
Dancing in the Akeley Hall of African Mammals
Dinner centerpiece
Guests were encouraged to dress in British fashion ...
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Colleen deVeer
Kip deVeer
Quiana Grant andn Ariel Meredith
Quiana Grant andn Ariel Meredith
and Nichelle “Browneyes” Brown
with All Stars youth performers
youth leaders of All Stars Project
with All Stars youth performers
Minutes before dinner
Georges Chakra table: Seated
l. to r.: Dana Bethune
l. to r.: Kristen Ingersoll
of Beth Israel Medical Center
of St. Luke's
with Georges Chakra
The luncheon was followed by a fashion show by Georges Chakra.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Clinton Howell cuts the ribbon at the inaugural Art
Antique Dealers League of America Spring Show.
The crowd
and Harrison Morgan
and Judy Bavasi
friend
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dennis Walcott at PUBLICOLOR'S 15th Anniversary celebration
at Martin Luther King High School.
The luncheon tables before guests arrived
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Peter Cottontail Easter Egg Hunt at Doubles
Seconds before the Egg hunt
Let the Egg hunt begin!
Princess Marina of Greece
Princess Alexandra of Greece
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Deborah Norville join the 2011 honorees on stage: Sen. George J. Mitchell
Crossing the Hudson River on their way to Ellis Island are 2011 honorees Sen. George J. Mitchell
along with Deborah Norville of Inside Edition
Tennis great Martina Navratilova receives the B.C. Forbes Peopling of America® Award for Sports from Moira Forbes
granddaughter of "Bertie" Forbes. Joining them on stage are Will Shafroth
of the U.S. Dept. of the Interior
Lee Iacocca reflects upon the early years when he toured the Statue
Ellis Island at the request of Reagan to head up their restoration efforts
sponsors of the B.C. Forbes Peopling of America® Award
chat with event host Deborah Norville aboard the Statue Cruises ferry
Joseph Doddridge speak with Will Shafroth of the U.S. Dept. of the Interior before the 10th annual Ellis Island Family Heritage Awards
greets Sen. George J. Mitchell
recipient of the Ellis Island Family Heritage Award for Government Service
in Battery Park
Sports honoree
receives his Margaret Rofrano's 1911 manifest from Foundation Stephen Briganti
Acting Assistant Secretary for Fish
U.S. Dept. of the Interior
as Deborah Norville looks on
Event host Deborah Norville greets Lee Iacocca
his sister Delma Kelechava in the Great Hall
Foundation Board Member Gene Bay catches up with Lee Iacocca
his sister Delma at Ellis Island
Lee Iacocca receives A Special Tribute for his years of dedication to preserving
restoring the Statue of Liberty National Monument
Ellis Island. Presenting him with his parents Nicola
Antoinetta Iacocca's passenger manifests are Will Shafroth of the U.S. Dept. of the Interior
Foundation Stephen Briganti. Event host Deborah Norville joins the gentlemen on stage.
Government Service recipient
speaks about his 's 1920 journey from Lebanon through Ellis Island to Waterville
Lee Iacocca greets his friend Nasser Kazeminy as Juliette Telander looks on
Martina Navratilova are welcomed to Ellis Island by event host Deborah Norville
Joe Torre with his son
Ronald K. Brown his dancers from Evidence
Dancing with the Dancers
Felicia Daniels accepts award on behalf of United Airlines
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
In the Pool Room at The Four Seasons for "Through the Kitchen
" a benefit for the Cancer Research Institute.
composer Steven
conductor Steven Mercurio
friend
features editor of Opera News
Friends of NYCS
Figure skater Marni Halasa
Figure skaters Michele Forchione
DRF board member Shari Eberts
son Alden
Figure skaters Marni Halasa
Clifford the Big Red Dog skating with guests
Figure skater Henry Berlin
Figure skater Jennie Berlin
Musician Jay Alan Zimmerman with wife Lisa
son Zach
Associate Director of Individual Giving Elissa Freedberg
Chairman of the board Cliff Tallman
Executive Director of Deafness Research Foundation Andrea Boidman
special guest Eve Chalom
DRF board member Rebecca Ginzburg with her daughters Mia
Clifford The Big Red Dog with guests.
Figure skaters Emma Krinsky
Jennie Berlin attend the Skate for Sound Benefit presented by the Deafness Research Foundation at City Ice Pavilion on April 9
2011 in Long Island City
borough of Queens
DRF board member Paul Orlin with wife Victoria Blau
children Eddie
Director of The Escape Family Resource Center
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
On stage with Sting at the 17th Breast Cancer Research Foundation’s annual Pink Party.
Ballroom pre-dnner
A Mike's Hard Lemonade for all
Francesca Haass with friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dinner is served at the French Heritage Society's kick off celebration for its upcoming 30th anniversary.
honoree E.L. ow
Emcee James Naughton with Malachy McCourt
Emcee James Naughton with Michael Cerveris
who presented the award to E.L. ow
Board member Christopher P Dixon
Lynda Baquero presents the award to Arturo O'Farrill
which performed in honor of Arturo O'Farrill
of Adam
Philip Glass with honorees Tania León
Artistic Director Laura Kaminsky with Board member Claire Aidem
Three composers: Marc Adamo
honoree Tania León
Board member Jane Pollock
part of Symphony Space's education program
entertained
Philip Glass reads his tribute to Tania León
B.D. Wong reads a selection by an All Write! literacy student
friends
Ann Van Ness with Guy Robinson
friends
Annette de la Renta
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
friends
Panel discussion
Panel discussion in the LeFrak Theater
Luncheon in the Milstein Hall of Ocean Life
Museum Ellen V. Futter with chairs Catherine Sidamon-Eristoff
friends
Curator of the Division of Paleontology
chair Connie Spahn
Moderator Lynn Sherr with panelist Dickson Despommier
panelists Nevin Cohen
friends
students from the Harvey Milk High School
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Wendy Sarasohn compare foot injuries
Claudio Guazzoni dei Zanetti
Claudio Guazzoni dei Zanetti
Gail Karr in Carlisle
Paul dePoo
Jackie dePoo
Anne Funicane andTom Brokaw
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Host Committee for New Yorkers for Children's 8th annual Spring Dinner Dance
“A Fool’s Fete."
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Celebrating Spring with Young New Yorkers for the Fight Against Parkinsons Committee
Alvin Ailey American Dance Theater dancers
Robert Battle of the Alvin Ailey American Dance Theater
actor Dennis Haysbert
Co-hosts Norm Nixon
dancer/choreographer Desmond Richardson
Gala Co-Chairs with Herbert Pardes
Kathy Jacobson with Hall &amp
Hall &amp
Oates with Herbert Pardes
Glowing ladies
The fashion award
The fashion award
friends
Terry kalish
Shaping the Future
Barnard College's annual Scholarship Dinner
held at the Plaza
The crowd at The Vivian Beaumont Theatre
Entertainment on the plaza
Dinner under the tent
guests
UN Secretary- Ban Ki-moon
Madam Yoo Soon-taek
UN Secretary- Ban Ki-moon
Madam Yoo Soon-taek
Entrance to dinner gala
Leah lane
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Guest artists Chris Fitzgerald
City Center &amp
City Center Chairman of the Board
City Center &amp
friend
Bebe with
painter Sydney Neuwirth
Bebe with Husband Chris Calkins
watercolor by Sydney Neuwirth
Actress Lillian Askew-Everdell with husband
Robert Score with daughter
ballerina Faith Score
actor Jesse
producer
Children's book author
Karen Mitchell modeling new Caplette
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Arian Moayed at the opening night of Robin William's Broadway debut in BENGAL TIGER AT THE BAGHDAD ZOO.
co-anchor of PBS' "Need to Know
" with College Bound Senior presenting award to Camp Ramapo for Children
several guests play a round of chess
a member of The Knight's Council
with members of The Associates
Senior Counsel at Simpson Thacher &amp
a supporter of CIS
with guests
Chess-in-the-Schools' chess instructors
Chess-in-the-Schools college bound senior takes a break to pose for the camera
Curtain Call for opening night
Brian d'Arcy James
The official ribbon-cutting at The DiMenna Center for Classical Music
The DiMenna Center's Mary Flagler Cary Hall
décor by David Monn
Violinist Christian Tetzlaff plays with Orchestra of St. Luke's
H3 Hardy Collaboration Architecture's Hugh Hardy
Orchestra of St. Luke's Trustee Janet Seidler
Orchestra of St. Luke's
H3 Hardy Collaboration Architecture's Geoff Lynch
Orchestra of St. Luke's
Orchestra of St. Luke's Co-Founder
Orchestra of St. Luke's V. P. of Finance
St. Luke's Chamber Ensemble flautist Elizabeth Mann
Orchestra of St. Luke's Trustee Bill Watt
Orchestra of St. Luke's Board Chairman Norman Benzaquen
Mezzo-soprano Susan Graham
conductor Patrick Summers
Orchestra of St. Luke's Trustee Kristen Barbato
Orchestra of St. Luke's
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
“Divas At Home: Shop for Opera” at the City Opera Thrift Shop.
Pinchas Zukerman taking a bow
Paula Robison in performance
Jennifer Johnson Cano in performance
and
friends
friends
Alexander Romanovsky performing in Weill Recital Hall
pianist Alexander Romanovsky
Members of Genghis Barbie: Jacquelyn Adams
pianist Alexander Romanovsky
Members of Genghis Barbie: Jacquelyn Adams
Guests arriving at Brasserie Cognac
Reception at Brasserie Cognac
The dinner guests
Michel Delacroix celebrates his 78th Birthday with the Gallery Opening of "Paris" at Soho's Axelle Fine Arts
son Bertrand
Frank Norman celebrate their 25th anniversary with the purchase of a Delacroix
Collector's Corner Maurice Hayot
La coeur de Paris au ciel rose Serigraph by Michel Delacroix
Moulin Rouge by Michel Delacroix
Michel Delacroix's Paris
the book
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
NRDC tables
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Cocktails during Castle Connolly Medical's 6th annual National Physician of the Year Awards at the Hudson Theater in the Millennium Broadway Hotel.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The New York City Opera presented the opening night of Monodramas
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Patrick McMullan at his annual St. Patrick's Day Party at Pacha.
and
b michael
b michael
b michael
b michael
b michael
b michael
b michael
b michael
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at the 3rd Annual Blossom Ball to benefit the Endometeriosis Foundation of America.
George D'founi
Olga D'founi
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
ian Woods
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Sean Combs at The Jackie Robinson Foundation's Annual Awards Dinner
Lana Lawrence talks to the group
husband Baz Luhrmann
Dinner on the stage of the BAM Howard Gilman Opera House
The BAM Lepercq Space where guests were treated to a post-performance dessert reception with the cast
Geoffrey Rush with BAM Executive Producer Joseph V. Melillo
Bank of America
DJ duo AndrewAndrew
Bank of America
Gala Chair Amy Schulman with guests
and Major
Honoree Ingrid Saunders Jones greets David Robinson while Rachel Robinson
Della Britton Baeza look on
honoree Sean Combs
daughter Savanna K. Stevens
honoree Ingrid Saunders Jones
honoree Sean Combs
The scene at the Buchan apartment
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Children enjoying entertainment by Magic Al at the Associates Committee of The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center's 20th Annual Bunny Hop.
children
children
daughters
daughters
Arthur Wayne of Brooks Brothers
Arthur Wayne of Brooks Brothers
son
son
son
daughter
daughter
daughter
Mariana Zois with the Lotus
Attendees enjoyed cocktails
hors d’oeuvres while mingling amongst the stunning Italian mosaics
contemporary furniture at Sicis.
The gift bag
DJs supplying the music
guests
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Fashion sponsor Rachel Roy at The Frick Collection's 12th annual Young Fellows Ball.
Champagne generously donated by Veuve Clicquot
Joann Pailey enjoying Veuve Clicquot
Roxanne Robinson of Women's Wear Daily
James Andrew in the West Gallery
Judith Leiber bag worn by Chair Sloan Overstrom
Jaime E. Jiménez of Baccarat
Alexandra Lebenthal with Erica Roseman
Dennis Gleason of Company Agenda
Young Fellows Steering Committee Member Sarah Irwin with husband Christopher Irwin
Alexis Clark of Town &amp
Country with Adeline Wong Ettelson
Young Fellows Steering Committee members Caitlin Davis
Young Fellow's Steering Committee member Caitlin Davis
guests
John Munson in the Living Hall
Sloan Overstrom in the Garden Court
Annika Connor enjoy the thematic food in the form of offerings of the dim sum table by caterer Oliver Cheng
Dancing in the Music Room
The Washington Square Arch at Fifth Avenue
quintessential Greenwich Village
The Influence of Teachers
a new book by PBS-Newhour Education Correspondent John Merrow
her father
As John Merrow speaks
Sam Dillon listen.
Eduardo Marti CUNY Vice Chancellor of Community Colleges with Stephanie Weber of The Hewitt School
Dick Beattie with Randi Weingarten
Guest of Honor
John C. Whitehead with Joe Quinlan
The Lehrer sisters
celebrate on the part of their father
Silda Wall Spitzer with New Visions for Public Schools Bob Hughes
Party hostess
host Mary Lou Quinlan with Joe Quinlan
Ron Ohaluisan of New Visions with Harry Ziokower
Sandra Norfleet with Gene Geisert
A smiling guest with Joel Klein
Brian Lehrer of WNYC with Audrey Baker from LearningMatters
Chloe models
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The crowd at the New York Junior League's Award for Leadership
april Blackmon
april Blackmon
Nia van der Velden
Nia van der Velden
Jennifer adams
Wynton Marsalis Jamming at his Celebratory Dinner
Jazz at Lincoln Center Orchestra member Sherman Irby
friend
MFAH Wortham Curator of Latin American Art
ICAA director
family
MFAH Wortham Curator of Latin American Art
ICAA director
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
family at the annual Sugar Cane Ball at Round Hill in Montego Bay
Round Hill Staff dressed up for Alice in Wonderland
husband Mandy
Leonora Rueda with Jamesand Manuela Goren
family
David Gilmour with Herbert Jacobi
guests
his wife
US to Jamaica Pamela Bridgewater
s of the historically black UNCF colleges
Peggy Conlon &amp
Doug Blonsky addresses the guests
Beth van der Slice
Stefania Magidson with friends
Vogue journalist Doris Sangeorzan
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The second floor of the new Ralph Lauren store on 72nd
Madison last night at a book signing for Karen LeFrak.
Melinda Blinken waits to descend the grand staircase while her husband converses.
The authoress signing.
appropriately dressed in Ralph Lauren
waits for her books to be brought to sign.
The Donald arrives.
Fredi Friedman. I introduced them to each other when Amy noticed each was wearing a vintage Christian LaCroix.
Peter Lyden with Gem.
Richard LeFrak with Francine LeFrak
Regis Philbin contemplates Karen LeFrak's champion pooch.
The mannequin takes in the party.
The ribbons
the silver trophies are all the winnings of Gem
the LeFrak show poodles.
Looking from the second floor to the main floor.
View across the avenue to the original Ralph Lauren store for men.
The cocktail reception included Provençal inspired hors d’oeuvre by Laurent Kalkotour
the new chef at db Bistro Moderne. The dinner menu included Maine diver scallops layered with black truffle
celery root
brown butter
Chef Gerald Passédat’s Loup de Ligne Lucie Passédat
laced with truffle;
a poulard roasted with black truffle
served with fleischnecke
brussels sprouts
chestnuts. Passédat’s dessert
Immaculate White Vacherin with a Multicolored Center
delighted guests as well.
Jason Alexander performed the Purimspiel while escaping from a straitjacket.
Debi Wisch with Jo Ann
Debi Wisch with Jo Ann
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Cocktails at the Core Club to celebrate GiGi's Playhouse's Inaugural National event.
Josunjari classical string trio with their parents
Meli'sa Morgan
USMA Cadet candidate Roberto Huie
Tiffany Moller introduces Ashely Merryman
Tiffany Moller introduces Ashely Merryman
Nathalie Kaplan welcomes guests
Nathalie Kaplan welcomes guests
On each of the tables were centerpieces that the Luncheon Co-Chairs created to highlight the many activities The Boys’ Club offers to boys daily.
The board of GiGi's Playhouse
gMargarita Rosado
gMargarita Rosado
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Robert Downey Jr. at the Vanity Fair Oscar Party at the Sunset Tower Hotel in Los Angeles.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at Nicolas Berggruen’s party at the Chateau Marmont.
At Nicolas Berggruen’s party at the Chateau Marmont: Dori Cooperman
Pierre d'Arenberg
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Plaza ballroom was packed for the Director’s Council of the Museum of the City of New York's annual Winter Ball.
Christina Addison amd Michell Tashjian
Christina Addison amd Michell Tashjian
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
A performance by Mai Ueda at Freight + Volume gallery in Chelsea.
The dinner scene
A table setting
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Cocktails at Metropolitan Club for the Sons of the Revolution's annual George Washington Birthday Ball.
Knickerbocker Grays - age 6-12
Ping-yi Lee
The fashion show featured the latest designer clothing
hottest trends
Herme deWyman Miro
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
An assortment of Lena Horne's garments which will go up for auction at Doyle next Wednesday at 2 PM.
lifelong friend of Lena Horne
leans in to say something to Lena's daughter Gail Buckley last night at the preview of her 's estate at Doyle NewYork
Jane Powell with Gail Buckley
Gail Buckley's two daughters with Geoffrey Holder
C-CAP grads
Richard Grausman with a C-CAP grad
CCap with Matt Hoyle
Union Square chef Carmin Quagliata
Yuhi Fujinaga from Bar Basque
chef Jonathan Waxman
Jonathan Benno chef
tuna tartare spring rolls
oyce Appelman
sous chef Jeff
chef Carmine Quagliata
Park Avenue chef Kevin Lasko
Southgate chef Kerry Heffernan
Almond chef Jason Weiner
Daniel chef Dominique Ansel
candied butternet squash float
Karen LeFrak with Miki
karen LeFrak
Text to Pledge technology
the signature Generositini
Sam Zises texting their pledges
Brett Kasner at the generosity candy bar
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Associates Council of The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center's 3rd Annual Luncheon at Rouge Tomate.
Wally Lamb at podium
friend
Alyssa Barrie welcomes guests
laura Kornhauser
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Board Members at The Drama League's 27th Annual Black-Tie Benefit Gala
Tara Vance with a friend
Cocktail hour at the Pierre
friend
Guests at entrance to fair
Graff models
Women's Business Luncheon Committee: Elizabeth Garvin
Dean at Convent of the Sacred Heart
Convent of the Sacred Heart Students
Dolores McKeever Donahue with a friend
with Kathy Tierney
Executive Vice Chairman of the Board of Sur la Table
USF Director of Graduate Programs with guests from USF
Students from Convent of the Sacred Heart High School
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at the NewYork-Presbyterian Phyllis
David Komansky Center for Children’s Health First Annual Plates for Pediatrics dinner at the St. Regis Hotel.
Lauren Bush with Dieter Beintrexler
Executive Director of The Viennese Opera Ball
with HIH The Grand Duchess Arianna
Silvia Frieser with Johannes Hofer
of the US-Austrian Chamber of Commerce
Austrian to the US Christian Prosl
Amy Shoremount with Metropolitan Opera Maestro Julius Rudel
standing Myra Biblowit
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
NYCB's 2011 Annual Luncheon Benefit Chairmen Sue Ann Weinberg
Amar Ramasar in Susan Stroman's newest work for New York City Ballet
Savannah Lowery in Susan Stroman's Blossom Got Kissed
Ashley Bouder with Susan Stroman
NYCB Board member Jane Carroll
NYCB Board member David Heleniak
NYCB Corps dancer
NYCB Corps dancer
NYCB Board member Marie Nugent-Head
Lycee Francais de New York's 75th anniversary celebration brought out more than 900 guests at Park Avenue Armory
The table settings
the English UK
the English UK
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Grand Finale of Valley Performing Arts Center Inaugural Gala Performance
Monica Mancini singing Moon River.
The lobby of the Valley Performing Arts Center
Under the tent before the gala dinner
Gala guests celebrating under the tent
American Ballet Theatre stars Gillian Murphy
Jose Carreno with gala guests
Andy Garcia with Talisa Soto
of CSUN Jolene Koester
friend
friend
her husband Cheech Marin
V.P. of University Advancement Vance Peterson
with Tyne Daly
wife with Jolene Koester
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Place cards at The New York Botanical Garden’s annual Orchid Dinner
table design by Sebastian Li.
friend
friend
Silena van der Geest
Silena van der Geest
Macy*s guest receives make over from Fashion Fair experts
Janet Rolle with honorees Suzanne DePasse
honorees Brenda Blackmon
and Debra Lee
The Plaza’s Palm Court
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Front row: Janet Ginsburg
MD. Back row: Howard Ginsburg
Andrea Greeven Douzet with Gaby
Lisa Silverman with Talia
Steve Ginsberg with Alexis Givens
The Chun family
Nina Edwards Anker with Theo
Artist Ariane Smith with Tess
Balloon twister Jonathan Vasquez
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Cast of KNICKERBOCKER HOLIDAY
of Wilhelm Scholê International Marilyn Wilhelm
Pipes &amp
Cig girls with Bruce Gendelman
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
and
and
Crown Prince Pavlos of Greece
Crown Prince Pavlos of Greece
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Segerstrom family pose at the Orange County Performing Arts Center's renaming ceremony to Segerstrom Center for the Arts
Former Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger presents the official Governors ring to Founding Chairman Henry Segerstrom
Violinist Caroline Campbell performs
Grammy award winning performer Chris Botti performs
Violinist Caroline Campbell performs
Grammy award winning performer Chris Botti performs
The Segerstrom family on stage for the unveiling of the Orange County Performing Arts Center's renaming ceremony to Segerstrom Center for the Arts
The crowd at the Orange County Performing Arts Center's renaming ceremony to Segerstrom Center for the Arts
husband John Daniels
husband Joseph Modica
Former Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger talks with Board Chairman Thomas McKernan
Bolshoi Ballet dancers Natalia Osipova
Former Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger talks with Board Chairman Thomas McKernan
Bolshoi Ballet dancers Natalia Osipova
Orange County Museum of Art Director Dennis Szakcas
Orange County Museum of Art Director Dennis Szakcas
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Cocktails at Zankel Hall
The auction consisted of 20 pieces of artwork by various artists affected by autism
Mistress of Ceremonies Laura Linney
Mistress of Ceremonies Laura Linney
jazz prodigy
Singers from Wicked
the TV series Big Love
The Miracle Project presents the Fly Singers
b michael
daughter's night out to support Autism
Rio Wyles aka MC Soul-shocker
Curtain call with Tim MacDonald
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Kyle DeWoody with friends at the Jane Hotel for the after party of the opening of January White Sale.
friend
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
2010 Cotillion Participants at the Philadelphia Charity Ball.
Honoree &amp
Recipient of the Edwin Booth Lifetime Achievement Award
actor
educator
Kevin greeted by Tony Bennett.
Kevin in conversation with actor Richard Thomas.
Tony Bennett with wife
Agent of
of
Cabaret performer Steve Ross.
pal.
Steve Ross at the grand piano with the Edwin Booth Award in the foreground.
Kevin Spacey with his award.
Kevin Spacey with Stephen Baldwin.
The walls of the venerable 1888 Gramercy Park The Players Club.
The Union League of Philadelphia
the debutantes with Philadelphia's City Hall in the background
Debutantes of
Members of
Members of the Board of Directors line up in front of the Union League
The Cotillion is danced at the midnight presentation
Former debutantes Katherine Del Raso
both s of Young Ladies’ Committee members
Chloe Carabasi with fellow graduates of the Agnes Irwin School
Bouquets for the Young Ladies’ Committee
Members of the Young Friends of the Charity Ball
wife Margaret
their daughter
debutante Murphy Olivia Glass
debutante daughter Carter Leighton Barnhart
escort Michael Maisel
his wife Constance
Former deb Alexandra Meigs Noll
Young Friends Committee member Justin Jeffers
both of New York
Debutante Ashley Catalano-Leckerman with her
her father
Debutante Jesicca Stokes with her Patti
who is the wife of Director Scott Zelov
2009 deb Virginia Grey Le Vine dances with her father
past Board D. Christopher Le Vine
Former deb
Young Friends Committee member Katie Bonner
a Chairman of the Junior Committee
poses with Carloyn Kraeutler
former deb Alexa S. G. Marymor
Young Men’s Committee Member Pearce Melikian Lockwood
Peter Sachse with University of Arizona students
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The playbill
Guest speakers David Schweizer
David Schweizer's boots
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
View of the bayou
downtown at Houston’s Sabine Promenade for a cocktails
a seated dinner under a 300’ tent spanning the entire Sabine Street Bridge.
Designs by Kelsey Quan
his wife
honoree Charles Urstadt
his granddaughter Ellie Biddle
honoree Charles Urstadt
Ellie Biddle. Both Biddles are granddaughters of Urstadt
The honorees: Elinor
past chairman
current chairman of the organization's Executive Committee
past honoree Howard Milstein
her husband
chairman of Historic Hudson Valley's Board of Trustees
a past Historic Hudson Valley honoree
her husband Tom
honoree Charles Urstadt
Marcia Brookler with Richard Brookler
"Herd" of Buffalo along Buffalo bayou
Unveiling of Buffalo Bayou Partnership's new tour boat
the "Spirit of the Bayou"
Table decor
Colorful boots
Guests showing off their "ranch dressing" attire
Gala Honoree Bob Eury "shooting the breeze"
Gala Honoree Sonny Flores being awarded by Buffalo Bayou Partnership Chair Chuck Carlberg
2009 Buffalo Bayou Partnership Gala chairs - Sis Johnson
Buffalo Bayou Partnership Chair Chuck Carlberg singing Happy Trails to You at the end of the evening
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Coconuts in Palm Beach ... Back row: Jay Maddock
Maxim Beloserkovsky with Jan Rosenthal
Maxim Beloserkovsky with Jan Rosenthal
friend
friend
Musicians play the Musical Tree
Grammy-award winning Scott Sloan at the rear of the Cathedral sounds the shortest day
the longest darkness of night - the solstice
Grammy-award winning Scott Sloan at the rear of the Cathedral sounds the shortest day
the longest darkness of night - the solstice
The eclipsing of the light
The eclipsing of the light
Traditional Peace-Dove Christmas Tree at the Cathedral
Traditional Peace-Dove Christmas Tree at the Cathedral
Gospel singer Theresa Thomason
Gospel singer Theresa Thomason
Armenian singer
musician Arto Tuncboyaciyan with performer
Armenian singer
musician Arto Tuncboyaciyan with performer
Paul Winter with his famous Soprano Sax
Paul Winter with his famous Soprano Sax
Dancing drummer
Dancing drummer
Forces of Nature Dance Theater enter down the long aisle of the Cathedral of St John The Divine
Percussion players
Forces of Nature Dance Theater
The crowd at the Flagler Pavilion
Shannon Donnelly reported in the Palm Beach Daily News that Steven Stolman turned theKenan Family Pavilion into a replica of Miami's famed Coconut Grove nightclub
Fireworks over Lake Worth
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
friends
Barbara Corcoran with Michael Kovner
children
Santa's helper doing face painting
twins
twinettes
daughter
son
Stewart Lane with twins
Doubles 'Junior Chorus' sings "We Wish You a Merry Christmas"
sons
son
twins
kids
daughter
daughter
family
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
T’was the Night Before Christmas reading by Christopher Hyland
designers Claus
Brenda Barak with New York City Fire Department bagpipers Gerard Brengel
Constantino Castellano with Hudson
Erica Feiger with Hudson
Erica Feiger with Hudson
Award-winning singer
actress Leslie Uggams
and John C. L'Insalata
At Webster Hall for Rob Pruitt's 2010 Art Awards
Designs by Kelsey Quan
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Unleashed Board members Erin Riggins
Cheryl Benton at The Carlisle Collection's New York City penthouse to celebrate Unleashed
a recently launched non-profit
created by Stacey Radin. The goal of Unleashed is to develop confidence in middle school girls so that they will become active participants in their communities.
lean Kathleen Ryan
lean Kathleen Ryan
Christina Del Balso speaking to the group
Isabella tells the group about her experiences
Unleashed wrist bands
Founder of Unleashed
Isabella with her mom
pop
Leena Gurevich with Isabella
always smiling for the camera
Dancers from Ailey II performing Donald Byrd's Shards
Stephanie Olmsted with Rick Stone
Resident Director David Macy with friends
retiring Chairman of the Board Robert MacNeil
Third Street’s honorees
guests
student performers
Third Street jazz band students
String students perform with Mark O’Connor
guest
friends
Pacha models
Click here to donate to the North Shore Animal League
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Marie Josee Kravis welcomes guests at a book party for Lin Arison
her new book Feast For the Senses
A Musical Odyssey in Umbria.
Party goers watch a documentary on Frank Gehry's NWS campus
Lin Arison with MoMA Marie Josee Kravis
Young Arts Christina De Paul talks to a friend
friends
Playwright John Guare with filmmakers Kirk Simon
her literary agent Amy Rennert
MoMA trustees Richard E Oldenburg
Lin's granddaughter
her fiancée Eric Masella
MoMA staffers
Co-author Diana C. Stoll shows Feast for the Senses to a friend
Nancy Silverman with Tiger
Passed hors d'oeuvres
children
Helen Goldsmith Menschel Director of The Jewish Museum
Event Co-chairs Sharon Coplan Hurowitz
Elizabeth Berman with Harry
Joseph Dilorenzo with Jada
Christopher Pastor with Charlie
Jennifer Coffey with Ellie
Erika Searl with Cubbie
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at the 12th Annual Winter Wonderland Ball in the Enid A. Haupt Conservatory at The New York Botanical Garden.
The scene of the ball: the Enid A. Haupt Conservatory
The Grand Ballroom of The Waldorf=Astoria
Performance by Broadway's Million Dollar Quartet
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Kathy Rayner with Rufus
Two of the NYPD's bomb-smelling dogs
Princess Firyal of Jordan
The table settings
DPC as emcee
The room
friend
Princess Firyal of Jordan
The official Centennial cake made for the occasion by the Barefoot Contessa herself
Ina Garten And cookies also made for the occasion by the Barefoot Contessa
Bloomingdale’s Tony Spring with the Bloomingdale’s Little Brown Bear
Cocktail reception in the Hall of Saurischian Dinosaurs
Junior Council members in Brain: The Inside Story
Steering Committee member Jameson McFadden
Steering Committee members Avi Barak
friend
Steering Committee member Gaelin Rosenwaks
friend
Steering Committee members Luca Mihaly
Co-chair Sarah Crews
Steering Committee member Val Bitici
Co-chairs Holly
Marty Okner with the curator of the exhibition
Co-chairs Lori
friend
Dana Center with lights
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Musical numbers
dance numbers
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Marie Nugent-Head Marlas. Anne Hathaway showed her support during a recent evening with The Bachmann-Strauss Dystonia &amp
Parkinson Foundation. The Bachmann-Strauss Foundation invited their generous supporters to join the actress over an intimate dinner at Il Postino
followed by a screening of her new film “Love &amp
Other Drugs” at The Japan Society. She introduced the film by speaking about her experience playing the character of Maggie
the importance of bringing awareness to both Parkinson’s disease
dystonia
how proud she is to be involved with The Bachmann-Strauss Dystonia &amp
Parkinson Foundation. For more information
visit www.dystonia-parkinson.org.
The scene at Gotham Hall
raffle winner
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at the Holiday House 2010 Opening Night Gala.
Dan off
Prince Dimitri of Yugslovia
Paul M. Friedman addresses the group
Paul M. Friedman autographing his book
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Stephanie Iris Weiss at the inaugural Guardianship of World's Waterways Award
Book Arts project
Art Advisory Board members Harriet Sawyer
Art Advisory Board member Phong Bui
Art Advisory Board member Elizabeth Szancer Kujawski
Scratchboard art project
Kate Von der Heyden
Welded recycled sculpture
Nickelodeon's S.Hillenburg
inspired from Jacques Cousteau
Anne Seelbach oil
water
Christopher Engel with his sold Turtle to Larry Rosen
Katherine greeting Steven Kaplan
Katherine greeting Steven Kaplan
Langur monkey from Tiger Indian Reserve
Langur monkey from Tiger Indian Reserve
James Albinson with his painting
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Asia Society held its annual Awards Dinner at the Waldorf-Astoria.
The 2010 Home for the Holidays Designers
Gérard Araud shares an amusing story with his guests
friend
diSalvo-Miller-Russo family
The Brain Injury Association of New York State Board of Directors
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Guests at a special champagne brunch hosted by Patricia Kennedy
founder of Step Up 4 Vets.
Future Woman of Distinction Carolina Torres
Future Woman of Distinction Carolina Torres
Future Woman of Distinction Carolina Torres
Board Patricia Stensrud with Girl Scouts
Mary Phipps with Girl Scouts
Patricia Kennedy with War Vets
the kids
wife Tiffany
sons Graham
wife Tiffany
sons Graham
The Rodriguez Family with Patricia Kennedy
The Rodriguez Family with Patricia Kennedy
with Patricia Kennedy
with Patricia Kennedy
Writing message to Santa
Writing message to Santa
Austin Rodriguez sends a message to Santa
Austin Rodriguez sends a message to Santa
IAVA’s Jason Hansman
Enjoying the brunch buffet
IAVA’s Jason Hansman
Enjoying the brunch buffet
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Associates Committee of The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center &amp
Gucci Host the Fall Party at The Four Seasons Restaurant.
friend
friend
The New York Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Children's 2010 Gala at The Plaza Hotel in Manhattan.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Elton John in Ocean Life
Elton John performs in the Milstein Hall of Ocean Life
Alice Michaels with Jimmy Fallon
Ed Sayres with Pearl
the 2010 Dog of the Year
The Empire State Building Company provided special lighting that night in celebration of The Cooper Union's 8th Annual Urban Visionaries Award Dinner
Table piece
setting
Cooper Union Board of Trustee Chairman Mark Epstein
Urban Visionaries honoree-Engineering
Urban Visionaries honoree-Art Marina Abramovic
Cooper Union Trustee Doug Hamilton with Michael E Porter
Architecture student Laura Genes
Artist Keith Godard at the auction
George Campbell Jr. with School of Art Dean at Cooper Union Saskia Bos
Irwin S. Chanin School of Architecture Dean at the Cooper Union Anthony Vidler
School of Art student Onyedika Chuke
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Matthew Reeve with The Gonzalez-Bunster Family
The Gonzalez-Bunster family
The dessert
The dancing ...
Starlight Orchestra leader
The Bloomingdale family
group
the Outstanding Volunteers Shari Elizabeth Aser
Jin Joshi admiring some of the artwork up for auction
Fall Fete attendees
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Leighton Meester at the Seventh Annual CFDA / VOGUE Fashion Fund Award at Skylight Soho.
Consul of France Honorable Philippe Lalliot with Laurence Folliot Lalliot
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
in MacKenzie
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The dinner scene at Cipriani 42nd Street at Silver Hill Hospital's 80th Anniversary Gala.
Bernie Williams performing
Craig muMs Grant
CeCe Peniston performing
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The dinner scene at The Women’s Board of The Boys’ Club of New York's annual Fall Dance.
Christie's auctioneer
Fall Dance Co-chairs Merrill Curtis
Women's Board Cynthia van Eck
husband Jan
Van Cleef &amp
Arpels model
Fall Dance co-chairs: Claudia Overstrom
A swirl on the dance floor
Tom Chappell addresses the crowd
Nancy barton
Veterans Corps of Artillery
Veterans Corps of Artillery
Silent Splendour: Palaces of the Deccan 214th – 19th Centuries
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Lenox Hill Hospital's annual Autumn Ball at the Waldorf=Astoria.
lizabeth Fuller
lizabeth Fuller
friend
friend
The Tables at Daniel
Alain deLotbiniere
Burgundy 2008 _____ Slow Baked Striped Bass with Gingerbread Dust Brussels Sprouts Fondue
Chimay Sauce Domaine de la Citadelle
Duo of Beef Black Angus Short Ribs with Stewed Lentils
The Romanoff family
David McFadden presents the Lifetime Achievement Award
Narciso Rodriguez accepts award on behalf of Donna Karan
David McFadden presents the Lifetime Achievement Award
Narciso Rodriguez accepts award on behalf of Donna Karan
Joanne Heyman of Urban Zen
ATA Trustee Charles Clifford with wife Martha
ATA Trustee Charles Clifford with wife Martha
Romanoffs celebrate
Friends hosted
Family hosted
Director of the Solomon R. Guggenheim Foundation
Ellsworth Kelly presenting Rob Pruitt with his autograph
with Glenn Fuhrmann
Students of P.S. 58 Performing
Benji Madden of Good Charlotte
musician Jason Mraz
of VH1 Tom Calderone
Kristin Chenoweth performs
Actress Julie Andrews speaks as actress Kristin Chenoweth looks on
of VH1 Tom Calderone
Executive director of VH1 Save The Music Paul Cothran
New York City Michael Bloomberg speaks as actor Cheyenne Jackson looks on
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The table settings
Elizabeth Stafford with her husband
Consul of France
Living sculpture
Most of the awards were presented early in the program allowing the audience to revel in the dynamic artistry of dancers from some of America’s greatest dance companies: Alvin Ailey American Dance Theater
and Parsons Dance. There were show-stopping Broadway numbers from” 42nd Street”
cast
Chris kellogg
author Kay Thompson
From FUNNY FACE to ELOISE
with Hilary Knight
Illustrator of All "Eloise" Books
the Williams brothers - Andy
Bob - Breaking records 1948
7-year-old Evelyn Rudie as Eloise in Playhouse 90's adaption
Playhouse 90 promotion played on screen at the Event
Legendary chanteuse Julie Wilson
creator of the Gene Marshall Doll
with Eric Meyer
creator of "Boys In The Band
Dori Lang does an animated Interpretation of Eloise accompanied by David Maddox
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Marcia Gay Harden with graduates at Help USA's Domestic Violence Graduate Scholarship Awards Luncheon.
Cocktails before the one-time-only performance of A Mixed Bill For Bill.
Bill Irwin’s son Santos
wife Martha Roth with a friend.
New 42nd Street Board member Charles Shorter
Bill Irwin’s sister Nan Irwin with friends.
New Vic Teaching Artists lead gala guests to dinner down 42nd Street.
Ray Halbritter with Graduates
Carolyn Murphy poses with a graduate
Ray Halbritter with a graduate
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Performa presented The Red Party
a dazzling gala benefit. Proceeds from The Red Party will directly support the creation of new Performa Commissions for the Performa 11 Biennial.
Scaasi: American Couturier Exhibition at the MFA
Back to front
Top to bottom
Lung Cancer survivor Joey Smith with his family
Top to bottom
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
850 members of the fashion industry gathered at the Empire Ballroom to honor Ronald Frasch
Josie Natori for their contributions to fashion
their dedication to the Phoenix House Foundation.
of The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center
with Annette Rickel
Othon Prounis shopping
Dara O'hara
Invites for R. Couri Hay's Le Bal Vampire II
New York Restoration Project's Hulaween 2010.
Pretty young goblins
Watching Magic Al do his tricks
n
Amy Hoadley with the Bed Bugs
Costumed revelers
“Hulaween” at the Waldorf.
Dia de los Muertos
Bette serenades
Liz smith
Liz smith
Bette Midler look-alike
Bette Midler look-alike
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The cocktail hour at The Loomba Foundation's "Diwali Dinner."
"Diwali Dinner" at the Essex House
on right
friends
Chilis of Mexico at opening night Gala
Margaritas at opening night Gala
Opera in the Rink with “Mariachi Real de Mexico
Mariachi dancers
Mariachi singing
Rafael Marquez gives hi-five to #1 fan
John DeRosa of Credit Suisse
Placido Domingo with Yolanda Montes “Tongolete"
Placido Domingo with Yolanda Montes “Tongolete"
Maite Embil gives SIVAM award to her uncle
John C. Mack skating to Nortec Collective
John C. Mack skating to Nortec Collective
Maureen Reidy at the Gala
NYIT Auditorium on Broadway
chairman of the United Hospital Fund
recipients of the Distinguished Community Service Award
of the United Hospital Fund;
chief operating officer of TIAA-CREF
which underwrites this award
who accepted the Special Tribute on behalf of the Sisters of Charity of New York
recipient of the Health Care Leadership Award
Caramoor Chief Executive/ Director Michael Barrett with benefit chairs Ralph
Guests enjoy dancing to the sounds of the Roaring 20's provided by Vince Giordano
the Nighthawks
Soiree guests dancing the Charleston
The Music Room in the historic Rosen House at Caramoor
Rob Schwimmer instructs a guest on how to play the Theremin
Alicia Mugetti with benefit chairs Barbara DuPont
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at Cartier for a kick-off party for the French Heritage Society.
40 under 40 honoree Tayari Jones
Commissioner of
Chair of
Christie's
Mira Nair during Auction
Uma Thurman Presenting to Mira Nair
Clinton opened the BCRF Awards Luncheon
Joanne deGuardiola
Joanne deGuardiola
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Orthopaedic Foundation for Active Lifestyles hosted its sixth anniversary gala dinner at Espace.
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Spud Williamson with Joni Smith
Contempo Menswear by new Designer Janet Zheng
Traditional sumptuous elegant Traditional Chinese Fashion from the Zhou Dynasty thru 1912
Two models Awaiting Fashion show
Two models Awaiting Fashion show
r Yu Ge
r Yu Ge
Contempo Womenswear Ensemble by Designer Ann Yee
Contempo Womenswear Ensemble by Designer Ann Yee
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Gabrielle’s Angel Foundation for Cancer Research held its signature fundraiser
the Angel Ball
at Cipriani Wall Street.
Students attending Pratt's Legends 2010 scholarship gala
Students attending Pratt's Legends 2010 scholarship gala
Students attending Pratt's Legends 2010 scholarship gala
Rosanne Cash performing
Carmen McCleod with Pratt alumna
artist Mickalene Thomas
Legends 2010 Honoree Tommy Hilfiger with wife Dee
Legends 2010 Honoree Tommy Hilfiger with Rosemary Lois
Ellsworth Kelly accepting his Legends 2010 award
Recent Pratt alumni Jeff Dodd
Dean of Pratt's School of Art
with Rebeccah Pailes-Friedman
Acting Chair of Pratt's Fashion Design Department
Pratt students Krissa Cavouras
Legends 2010 with Marjorie Kuhn
friends
and Stephen Nimer
Ilona rich Schachter
Jacob the Jeweler with friends
friend
Kenneth Dudek with Co-Chairs
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Maria Bonta de la Pezuela
Board member Aso O. Tavitian
The long
recently relit West Gallery
Guests enjoy dining in the just fully relit West Gallery at the 2010 Frick Autumn Dinner
Board member Agnes Gund
Barbara Burns with Walter A. Eberstadt
Ana Sanz-Magallón with Juan A. Sabater
Joanne d. Foster
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Back row: Romy Coquillette
Andre Koester . Front row: Jessica Marinaccio
Attendees in the Dinosaur Dig
Children at the Dino Wood Coloring booth
Magician “Magic Al” performs
Tiffany &amp
Co. Treasure box booth
Attendees get up close to a giant squid tentacle with Museum Graduate Student Sebastian Kvist
Attendees with Museum ornithologist Paul Sweet in the Science Center
Visitors examine a scorpion at the Science Center
children
Chairman Diana Roesch DiMenna with husband Joe
daughters
children
Chairman Diana Roesch DiMenna with husband Joe
daughters
daughter get a close look at scorpions
Chairman Joella Lykouretzos with husband John
children
Erica Martini with husband
child
Museum Trustee Connie Spahn in the Science Center
Chairman Allison Mignone with husband Roberto
children
Zibby Right with husband Andrew
children
Michelle-Marie Heinemann with husband Jon
child
children
sons
Traxys Team with Alan K. Docter
Traxys Team with Alan K. Docter
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
New York Public Library's Astor Hall.
Nocturnal view of new Smith-Gans stained-glass window at Museum at Eldridge Street
Paul Shapiro's Hester Street Orchestra at the Museum at Eldridge Street
Museum Lorinda Ash with The New Yorker's Adam Gopnik
Museum Executive Director Bonnie Dimun with Ron Zimmerman
Arne Glimcher with Anh Duong
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Suzy Bales signing books at The Mount Vernon Hotel Museum &amp
Garden's "First Bloom of Autumn" benefit to support plans for the museum’s new Edible Kitchen Garden.
Charlotte Armstrong with Allison White
Cullman &amp
Cullman &amp
Opening night at The 38th Annual Kips Bay Decorator Show House.
friend
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
2010 Top Tails Cocktails Benefit Committee members with The Animal Medical Center's Sara Katz
Emilia Fanjul Pfeifler with Diamond
Kristy Hinze Clark with Guiding Eyes for the Blind volunteer
puppy
Two very tired puppies from Guiding Eyes for the Blind
Guiding Eyes for the Blind volunteers with puppies
his wife Amy Magee
friend with Guiding Eyes for the Blind pups
AMC Benefit Committee Member Kristy Hinze Clark with Guiding Eyes for the Blind puppy
Kristy Hinze Clark with Guiding Eyes for the Blind puppy
AMC Veterinarian Allyson Berent with AMC technicians Haven Bade
AMC Junior Committee Member Kris Huegel with friends
AMC Veterinarian Deirdre Chiaramonte with Jim Coyne
AMC Benefit Committee members Marcie
Jordan Pantzer with Junior Committee members Cass
Artist Peter Tunney donated a commissioned pet portrait for AMC's Raffle
Charlie Allen with Guiding Eyes for the Blind puppy
AMC Junior Committee members Curt
Kris Huegel with AMC Vet Chiaramonte
AMC Chief Executive Officer Kate Coyne with AMC Radiologist Fischetti
AMC Benefit Committee member Tripp Callan with Lindsay Fox
Guiding Eyes for the Blind puppy
Cast of 'Bloody Bloody Jackson'
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Carnegie Hall’s membership
ticket program for music lovers in their 20s
presented Redemption Song
an evening that included a panel discussion in Zankel Hall.
underwriters Pia Zankel
panelists Steven Adler
moderator Henry Rollins
panelist Ace Frehley
moderator Henry Rollins
Steven Adler reads from his book "My Appetite for Destruction: Sex
The after-party at Providence was sponsored by FUZE Beverage
Redemption Song underwriters Pia
Jimmy Zankel with Steven Adler
Steven Adler signs copies of his book
"My Appetite for Destruction: Sex
Guns N' Roses" for guests
Katy Steele with copies of "My Appetite for Destruction: Sex
guest
their daughter
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Pre-dinner on the Grand Promenade of the David H. Koch Theater.
Guests of the Event
Guests of the Event
Giorgio G Cognac models
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Mili Shah Brown at restaurant ROBERT at the Museum of Arts
Design for a cocktail party benefiting The Society of Memorial Sloan Kettering's 2010 Annual Appeal.
Christian de Portzamparc in the LVMH Tower "Magic Room"
kelvin Lynch
Co-chair Holly Okner
friend
co-chair Marty Okner
Steering Committee member Jonathan Right
friend
Steering Committee member Gaelin Rosenwaks
Steering Committee member Jameson McFadden with Caitlin Nelson
friend
co-chair Lori Pomerantz
Monika Plocienniczak with Steering Committee members Jonathan Right
Steering Committee member Val Bitici with Alex Twerdahl
Co-chairs Zachary
Junior Council guests
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
friend
friend
friend
friends
Garden Terrace Room-decor designed by Bowman Dahl
guests
guests
HRH the Infanta Cristina of Spain
Carla de la Mora
Carla de la Mora
Andrew Blank with table of friends
Chocolate by Roxanne Browning
Marilyn Gonzalez with a friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Klode with Regine Roumain
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The first-ever edible auction at Sotheby's
which was also part of the kick-off of Eat Drink Local week.
Heirloom vegetables in the live auction
P. Allen Smith beside one of his paintings
Event co-chairs Amy Todd Middleton
friend
Chefs preparing dinner in the kitchen
Bottoms up!
Delicacies from Oms b
Hibino's roasted octupus was a big hit
Guests sample some of the over 330 sakes at their peak
Keg breaking ceremony kicks of Joy of Sake tasting
Smoked oysters from Bond Street
Sampling Bond Street's smoked oysters
Chris Pearce welcomes guests to Joy of Sake
Tanuki Tavern's team
Neil Wolfson samples Wagyu beef from Zengo
Woo Lae Oak's staff preps Dungeness crab with crepe
15 East offered house marinated salmon roe
Geisha Chef Don Phom with his Tuna Truffle Sandwich
his wife Margarita
TY Ku's Trenton Scott Ulnicy
and Andrew T. Chrisomalis
friend
friend
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Michael Bloomberg the center of attention at the Fete de Swifty.
Liz Smith with the Fete de Swifty Junior Leader Chairs Jake Bright
Commissioner Yolanda Jimenez of the ’s Office to Combat Domestic Violence
Fete juniors
Joe Pugliese with his sister Susan
friend
Mike greeted by Susan
Gail Karr in Carlisle
Salvador Dali The Vision of Hell 1962
Francis Bacon Study for Portrait 1952
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Emily Fisher Landau makes a wish at her 90th birthday celebration.
The El Morocco-themed decor.
The birthday cake.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Pre-dinner for 1000 under the Venetian-themed marquee inspired by the Resnick’s art collection.
The Resnick family
friend
friend
friend
friend
friend
friends
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Kick off Party at Giorgio Armani Boutique for MEMORIAL SLOAN-KETTERING CANCER CENTER Antiques Show.
kara Ryan
Neil deGrasse Tyson
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dinner in Astor Hall after the Chernow-Meacham discussion
at The New York Public Library's 's Council Fall Dinner.
UN Goodwill for Biodiversity
Gisele Bündchen with Kuji Uyunkar Kaniras
Crown Prince of Monaco
Dinner in
program in
Venerable Bun Saluth from Cambodia
My Hanh Diep Thi from Viet Nam
Chittiama Buguru from India
Kuji Uyunka Kaniras from Ecuador
friends
Cornelia Thornburgh with friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
the PS 22 Staten Island Chorus
The dinner scene at Cipriani 42nd Street.
Paz de la Huerta
Paz de la Huerta
Paz de la Huerta
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scenet at Saks Fifth Avenue.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The opening preview of the American Fashion Designers' show house at the Aldyn Riverside Boulevard.
Martin Bouygues with Henri de Castries
Minister of Culture Frederic Mitterand
Ma la Secretaire d'etat Nathalie Kosciusko-Morizet
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Atop the Gansevoort Hotel for the ASSOCIATION to BENEFIT CHILDREN Junior Committee Fundraiser.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at Bergdorf Goodman on Fashion's Night Out.
The waitstaff
The view from Kevin Sharkey’s “Home at Last”
Morad with Shelly Brom
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The huge gathering at Avery Fisher Hall.
Crystal McCrary with friends
Sigrid de l'Epine
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Atop the Gansevoort Park Avenue.
models
models
Models in Minnie Mortimer
Models in Minnie Mortimer
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Fashion's Night Out NYC Bus
Amar'e Stoudemire
Fans line up for Jamie Lee Curtis
Tina Brown introduces Harold Ford Jr.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Pre-dinner for 1000 under the Venetian-themed marquee inspired by the Resnick’s art collection.
The Resnick family
friend
friend
friend
friend
friend
friends
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Kick off Party at Giorgio Armani Boutique for MEMORIAL SLOAN-KETTERING CANCER CENTER Antiques Show.
kara Ryan
Neil deGrasse Tyson
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dinner in Astor Hall after the Chernow-Meacham discussion
at The New York Public Library's 's Council Fall Dinner.
UN Goodwill for Biodiversity
Gisele Bündchen with Kuji Uyunkar Kaniras
Crown Prince of Monaco
Dinner in
program in
Venerable Bun Saluth from Cambodia
My Hanh Diep Thi from Viet Nam
Chittiama Buguru from India
Kuji Uyunka Kaniras from Ecuador
friends
Cornelia Thornburgh with friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
the PS 22 Staten Island Chorus
The dinner scene at Cipriani 42nd Street.
Paz de la Huerta
Paz de la Huerta
Paz de la Huerta
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scenet at Saks Fifth Avenue.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The opening preview of the American Fashion Designers' show house at the Aldyn Riverside Boulevard.
Martin Bouygues with Henri de Castries
Minister of Culture Frederic Mitterand
Ma la Secretaire d'etat Nathalie Kosciusko-Morizet
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Atop the Gansevoort Hotel for the ASSOCIATION to BENEFIT CHILDREN Junior Committee Fundraiser.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at Bergdorf Goodman on Fashion's Night Out.
The waitstaff
The view from Kevin Sharkey’s “Home at Last”
Morad with Shelly Brom
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The huge gathering at Avery Fisher Hall.
Crystal McCrary with friends
Sigrid de l'Epine
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Atop the Gansevoort Park Avenue.
models
models
Models in Minnie Mortimer
Models in Minnie Mortimer
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Fashion's Night Out NYC Bus
Amar'e Stoudemire
Fans line up for Jamie Lee Curtis
Tina Brown introduces Harold Ford Jr.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Rico Mansur with children from Work-to-Ride.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at the 35th annual Hampton Classic Horse Show.
riding Sapphire
winner of the FTI GP &amp
winner of the $30
Under the Grand Prix Tent
Troffa/LaRosa table
Nicolock table
Southampton Hospital table
Troffa/LaRosa table
Cohn/Pevaroff table
Beach Acre Farm table
ASPCA table
Prudential Douglas Elliman table
Kramer table
NASDAQ OMX table
Rechler Equity table
Rocafellow table
Fendi table
Sotheby's International Realty table
Betty Knight Scripps table
Bloomberg table
Leat table
Puris/Topper table
Hermes table
Bridgehampton Florist table
Wolffer Estates table
Warren table
Quoge Pony Farm table
Louis Roederer group
family
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Curtain Call for "It Must Be Him."
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Halle Berry at a luncheon at Ronald Perelman's estate to benefit the Jenesse Center in Los Angeles.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Lorenzo Martone with a friend
Richard N. Beattie of Jaguar
Richard N. Beattie of Jaguar
honoree Reginald Van Lee
honoree Reginald Van Lee
Lidia Arriagada with Stefanie Taylor
Lidia Arriagada with Stefanie Taylor
A.J. Alfino &amp
A.J. Alfino &amp
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The dance floor at On Our Toes in the Hamptons
the annual performance
fundraising gala for Ronald K. Brown’s Evidence
Ebony Magazine: To a Village performed by Evidence
Hermes scarves
Douglas Dickerson aka DJ Trife
Susan L. Taylor on the dance floor
Susan L. Taylor on the dance floor
The Women of Evidence
friend
friend
friend
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Post-screening supper at the oceanfront estate of Julia
David Koch for "Wall Street: Money Never Sleeps."
The Staff from Olivier Cheng
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Harry Slatkin's joint birthday in Montauk at Navy Beach.
Martha Stewart with her birthday cake
friend
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
presentation speaker
jazz critic Gary Giddins
The Fred Hersch Trio gives a free jazz concert under the Medal Day tent in honor of Sonny Rollins. Left to right: Colony Fellow Fred Hersch
bassist John Hebert
drummer Eric.
jazz pianist Fred Hersch performs tunes associated with Sonny Rollins’s career in a tribute performance under the Medal Day tent.
who will retire from his leadership post on the Colony’s board of directors later this year
holds up a compilation of his past Medal Day speeches titled “Why Is This Important?” after delivery his last Medal Day speech on behalf of the Colony.
Sonny Rollins accepts the 2010 Edward MacDowell Medal at The MacDowell Colony.
Left to right: Medalist Sonny Rollins
presentation speaker Gary Giddins
Donna MacNeil enjoy a picnic lunch after the Medal Day award ceremony.
Sonny Rollins signs an autograph for a fan after receiving the 2010 Edward MacDowell Medal
Kinky Friedman's Reflection in Sunglasses
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The starting line for 5th Annual Strides for Life.
A record 1
100 participants at the start of the race around South Hampton's Lake Agawam
Children sprinting in the 50-yard dash on the green
" spearheaded by Kimberly Kravis Schulhof
Strides for Life
group shot in front of the South Hampton theater pre-race
"Trudy's Tribe" poses with their members
"Sonia 07" lead by Rose-AnnWeinstein
Lung cancer survivor Joe Buckheit
his team of the "Buckheit Brigade" band together just before the starting line
with Rosanna Scotto
Mistress of Ceremonies kicking off the 5th anniversary of the race
Participant running in memory of her grand
friend about to man a watering station
Strides for Life
Anne Nordeman delivering balloons to the starting line
"Pat-tini" family
friends strike a pose
Shawn Warren with "Team Rosalind" gearing up for the race
Nick Ellonoff is the first to cross the finish line
Strides for Life Co-chair
with Dana O'Hara in "Team Hedi" baby blue hats
Gambrelle Snyder of "Team JPS
" with her
running in memory of Gambrelle's father
whose favorite color was purple
Strides for Life Committee Member
with her specially designed 'RUN
LIVE' shirt
Kimberly Kravis Schulhof with Shoshanna Gruss
running on behalf of "Team Hedi"
"Team Silvana" members embracing before the race
fellow "Team Caryl" member as they cross the finish line
"Pat-tinis" team shirt
Rosanna Scotto crossing the finish line with her fellow "Team Caryl" mini-members
Rosanna Scotto with the top five winners of the race
Laurie Carson with her team "BC2"
Children's race participant with her medal
Strides for Life
friend crossing the finish line
husband treasurer
LCRF treasurer
High above Sunset Plaza at Alex Hitz's Los Angeles aerie.
Milly deCabrol
Guests were treated to the chef’s summer specials
a totally Southern menu: Fried chicken
grits
Corn pudding
The New York Premiere of Giving Back: The Film
The Disney screening room on Park Avenue where Meera's "Giving Back" was screened.
Marcy McDonald and Vikram Gandhi
Laura Nelson with the Production Team
Laura Nelson with the Production Team
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Courtney Arnot outside Erica Wilson Needleworks on Nantucket.
Counterclockwise from top left: Coco Kopelman incribing: "To Kristen - Wishing you many happy meals!
Counterclockwise from top left: Coco Kopelman incribing: "To Kristen - Wishing you many happy meals!
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
with Madeline
Hoedown Trophy winner
Hoedown Trophy winner
Christina deForest Keys
Christina deForest Keys
Christina deForest Keys
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The opening of the Barbara Kruger exhibition in East Hampton Guild Hall.
friend
friend
Museum Director with hosts Ingeborg
Museum Trustee Rita Lerner with Cliff Salm
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Tug o' war at the 21st Annual Einstein Family Day Wild
Cockails at the Boom Boom Room.
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The view from The Montauk Lake Club.
Guests sat at tables bearing the titles of Albee's numerous plays ...
Raffle prizes.
longtime Montauk resident
the evening's honoree
with Dick Cavett
the evening's emcee.
Lily Vonnegut. Michalski is the director of physical therapy at Executive ER in Beverly Hills. Ms. Vonnegut is my darling daughter
has recently been cast in a Los Angeles production of Slaughterhouse Five. She'll be playing the roles of Lily
Billy Pilgrim's
of the Montauk Playhouse Community Center Foundation
Master of Ceremonies
head of the theater community. Said Ms. Beckmann: "We've been working towards having a performing arts center. Edward is on that committee
we're getting closer to actually building it."
Edward Albee talking about his longtime love affair with Montauk where he lives in a house overlooking the ocean. Albee is known as a "Montaukian"
can be seen regularly at the post office
the IGA. "I came to Montauk after I wrote Who's Afraid of Virginia Woolf
bought a place
I've continued to live here in all four seasons. because I consider Montauk the great-good place
it's great specialness is that it's not the Hamptons.
Dick Cavett. As you can see
though she was somewhat coy about it
Ms. Rogers is wearing a diamond ring on her left ring finger. They have been a couple for several years.
the artistic director of Hampton's Shakespeare. "We are a non-profit organization that produces theater
educational programs from Montauk to the city. Albee helped us out a few years ago by participating in some of our fundraising events
so I wanted to be here for him this evening."
Joan Hildreth greets Cavett
Elaine Peterson. Lau runs the Edward Albee Foundation. Ms. Peterson's husband is on the Friends Committee of the Montauk Playhouse.
his wife
Susan Saint-Rossy with Dick Cavett. Ms. Saint Rossy is visiting Cavett
Ms. Rogers in Montauk
she is in the process of moving from Africa to India.
Mary Gambill with husband Tom
Mary Gambill with husband Tom
2010 Swan Award recipient Lynn Wyatt of Houston
2010 Swan Award recipient Lynn Wyatt of Houston
Dave Anderson checks in
family
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Jay McInerney Hosted a Midsummer Garden Fete benefiting Princess Grace Foundation-USA.
HSH Prince Albert II of Monaco
HSH Prince Albert II of Monaco
HSH Prince Albert II of Monaco
HSH Prince Albert II of Monaco
HSH Prince Albert II of Monaco
and Anne Hearst
HSH Prince Albert II of Monaco
and Anne Hearst
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
QVC Style Initiative Dinner hosted by Mike George at the home of Dennis Basso
partner Michael Cominotto.
Russell Simmons at Macy's celebrates Russell Simmons Argyleculture Fall 2010 Menswear Presentation.
Taylor Momsen at Macy's exclusive launch of Madonna's "Material Girl."
DJ Maia Wojcik at the Kess Agency launch party.
Melissa George at the 2nd Annual Australians in New York Fashion Foundation party.
Susan Fales-Hill's One Flight Up book launch party at the Isaac Mizrahi Store.
Kay Unger at Yummie Tummie at Super Saturday at Nova's Ark Project
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The children raised $403 from the sale of lemonade
Tate’s brownies at the launch of The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center’s Park Avenue Potluck CELEBRATIONS.
Florence Fabricant autographing copies of Park Avenue Potluck CELEBRATIONS.
Members of the Kids Kick In committee make $403!
Heather Leeds blowing out her birthday candles
Isabel van der Linden
Ms. van der Linden
Suri gets some affection from Rene Schlathur
actor Kevin Conway
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at Super Saturday 13 in Watermill
benefiting the Nova’s Ark Project.
friend
friend
The 27th annual Alzheimer’s Association Rita Hayworth Gala will be held on October 26th. Click here to purchase tickets.
The 27th annual Alzheimer’s Association Rita Hayworth Gala will be held on October 26th. Click here to purchase tickets.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Chace Crawford at the screening of "Twelve" at Landmark Sunshine Cinema
hosted by The Cinema Society &amp
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The 2nd annual Australians in New York Fashion Foundation Party at the Crosby Hotel.
The Liberty National Golf Course in Jersey City
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
family
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Perlman Music Program's Annual Summer Benefit at the oceanside estate of Annette
The Perlman Music Program students
faculty
Student performance
Students performing
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
son Oliver
1st place Junior open Preliminary
Enjoying the view
Enjoying the view
Diane accepts award to Thoroughbred Retirement Foundation
A good shopping day
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Ramona Singer with Performance Artists
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
LongHouse Reserve's Summer Gala EXCENTRICA at LongHouse in East Hampton.
JosÈ Enrique Maci·n
friend
Elizabeth Ives Hunter unveil “Sea Food” by David Sitbon
Si Hyland unveil “Evening Amber” by Matthew Schulz
Gwen Dadoly of Yarmouth Port
Charlotte Benner of Yarmouth Port
Kathy Goddard of Eastham
Bill Hatfied of Providence RI
Pat Barnhart of Yarmouth Port
Steve Michell of Chatham
Pat Barnhart of Yarmouth Port
Nancy Kaplin of Dennis Village
Jerry Forman of Brewster
Christopher Hyland holding baby Samuel
Sally Edmonds of Osterville
Mriam Talanian of West Barnstable
Kim Barnolky-Grossman of Osterville
Michael Levinson of NY
Christopher Hyland with Hudson
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dinner for Schmucks after-party at Jerry Della Femina
Judy Licht’s sprawling seaside cottage.
Poolside at Jerry Della Femina
Judy Licht’s.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The second annual sunset cruise benefit for Friends of Animal Rescue on the Atlantis.
The silent auction
Betsy Goldman with raffle prize-winner
Camilla Hansen with Lenny
Cake by Award-winning baker Martin Howard
Crew of Atlantis
A look around Stephanie Hessler's Southampton house ...
friend
Clockwise from above: Andaz chefs preparing a sumptuous spread inspired by in-season produce
Guests enjoyed delicious canapés of fresh
locally sourced produce prepared by the Andaz chefs
cheeses meats
specialty meats were served from the stylish open kitchen
bar at the Andaz 5th Avenue.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
On The Great Lawn in Central Park for a joint performance of the Shanghai Symphony Orchestra
the New York Philharmonic.
Allison flores
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
friends
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
friends
David Aaron of Born Again Baldwins
friends
friends
friend
friend
kk Shedy
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Arriving at Ocean House in Watch Hill
Bob Hardwick leading his 19-piece orchestra
The Greenbrier in White Sulphur Springs
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Sandra McConnell hosted a dinner at her Southampton home celebrating the birthdays of her children
Christopher Obetz save the last dance
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Campbell family
Under the tent
Dancing under the tent
Soledad O'Brien with Sofia
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
friend
children Jack
friend
friends
and Luther
granddaughter Leslie Lewis Sword
Kate deBriene
Voices of Christian Cultural Center Choir
Voices of Christian Cultural Center Choir
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
HRH Prince Harry of Wales
Forget Me Not NOLA group
HRH Prince Harry of Wales
HRH Prince Harry of Wales
HRH Prince Harry of Wales
friend
family
HRH Prince Harry of Wales
HRH Prince Harry of Wales
HRH Prince Harry of Wales
HRH Prince Harry of Wales
HRH Prince Henry of Wales
Rosemarie diSalvo
Annemarie diSalvo
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Jane Kelsey at “Once Upon A Time
" a fashion presentation
show featuring the debut of “Rouge et Noir." The evening benefited MillionTreesNYC.
family with Jennifer Raab
Lieutenant Governor of New York
William vanden Heuvel
former Manhattan District Attorney
Wickersham &amp
William vanden Heuvel
The Bachmann Strauss Dystonia &amp
Parkinson Foundation’s Founder
Bonnie Strauss thanked co chairs Edward McBride
NBC’s DeMarco Morgan
Mark Standish with Event Chairs Stuart Davies
Women’s Mafia partner Sonja Leix
Women’s Mafia Partner Elisha Dang
Women’s Mafia Founder Marcy Clark
Women’s Mafia Founder Marcy Clark
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Yoga on the Great Lawn.
the Ice Cream Man
Nasdaq welcomes Arlene Dahl
Ruth Westheimer with Lois Aldrin
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
A Summer Solstice Dinner benefiting the Edible Schoolyard at the Tribeca loft of Lela
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
God's Love We Deliver Board of Directors at the 9Tenth Annual Midsummer Night Drinks at the home of Chad Leat in Bridgehampton
Chad Leat's Bridgehampton home
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
"An Evening At Cipriani with Mary J. Blige
Friends” to benefit The Foundation for the Advancement of Women Now
fans
Summer Party Crowd in the European Old Masters Gallery
Art Auction in the MFA Ruth
Summer Party Crowd in the European Old Masters Gallery
his cake
a performer
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Joan Baez at the Children’s Health Fund's annual benefit.
Joan Baez perform
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
School's Out 2010 at Grey Gardens in East Hampton.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Seals showing off for guests of the Wildlife Conservation Society's Spring 2010 Gala
"Flight of Fancy
" at the Central Park Zoo.
The dinner ...
The after-party ...
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Kids from the Art of Dance
Puttin on the Ritz
Castmembers from Memphis
Tribute to Michael Jackson
Cast applaudes Ben Vereen
Cast Members from Fela
Best dancer Charlie Neshyba-Hodges gets a hug from Carol Lawrence
All of the artists perform “Bride Over Troubled Waters” as an encore performance.
John Roderick perform “The Only Living Boy in New York.”
Ricky Skaggs perform “I Am a Rock.”
Livingston Taylor perform “59th Street Bridge Song.”
Drawing of all the 25th Anniversary SummerStage Gala artists by Michael Arthur.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Committee members of the Young Patrons Circle of the American Friends of the Louvre at their annual fête – Soirée au Louvre.
Fulbright Grantee from Pakistan Khaula Jamil
Fulbright Student from Iraq Haider Hamza
Consul of France Philippe Lalloit
Ann Jeffreys with Fred Krimendahl
friends
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dancing at the School of American Ballet's Workshop Benefit at Lincoln Center.
The trophies
Stephanie Odegard with Finalists
friend
Lisa deRibere
Veronica Bulgari with Clive Gillinson
friends
AIS clients &amp
staff: Clora
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Carnegie Hall Medal of Excellence Gala Honoring Henry Segerstrom at the Waldorf-Astoria.
Earl of Wessex
his Fugue Band
Beth Rudin deWoody
Earl of Wessex
Earl of Wessex
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
American Ballet Theatre Dancers at its annual Family Day benefit at the Metropolitan Opera House.
Liya Kebede with Raee
guest
guest
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
LTA Staff Student Docents at the opening of A Year with Children 2010 at the Guggenheim Museum.
PS 134 teacher
student docent
with Taylor
granddaughter of LTA founder Natalie K. Lieberman
friend
board member Tom Scarangello
Southampton Village Mark Epley with Marianne Epley
Roberta Amon with Bob Wachs
event co-chair
Lee Harris Pomeroy with Talia
the kite decorating table.
lung cancer survivor Mark Ogonowski
his wife
“Please Hurry” kite flown by a lung cancer survivor speaks to the important mission of Uniting Against Lung Cancer
raising money for research to find a cure.
Mount Sinai School of Medicine
Executive Vice for Academic Affairs
The Whitney Museum of American Art invited members
their friends to an “End of Year Celebration” in the studio
home of contemporary artist Michele Oka Doner
her husband Frederick Doner.
of Lincoln Center for the Performing Arts
Associate at Diller Scofidio + Renfro
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The entertainment at El Museo del Barrio's annual gala.
Juliano deRossi
Countess LuAnn deLesseps
friend
friend
Juliano deRossi
Countess LuAnn deLesseps
Oscar de la Renta
Moises de la Renta
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Doubles celebrated its 34th Anniversary with a black-tie dinner dance.
Rock climbing
Tractor training
The fishpond
Tug-o-war
Jill Ross with daughter
his band
his band
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Musical Performance by The Northside Center Kids.
Northside Center for Child Development
Back row: Mark Smith
Northside Center for Child Development
Pepsico &amp
Guest. Front row: Larry
Northside Center for Child Development
Northside Board of Directors.
Master of Ceremonies Maurice DuBois
honoree Joan Caraganis Jakobson.
Oscar de la Renta
Moses de la Renta
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Sarah Jessica Parker at the premiere of Sex in The City 2.
Jerry andJessica Seinfeld
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at the ARTrageous Gala Dinner
Art Auction at 55 Wall Street.
master of ceremonies
honoree Ralph G. Moore
of Ralph G. Moore &amp
honoree Frederick Ruiz
chairman emeritus of Ruiz Food Products;
executive vice
chief administrative officer
Wal-Mart U.S. Mars accepted the award on behalf of Wal-Mart Michael Duke.
NMSDC Harriet R. Michel is joined by her family: Christopher Michel
his wife
her husband
daughter-in-law Valerie Michel
her husband
More than 1
400 guests attended the event at the New York Hilton
Towers to honor long-standing achievement in minority business development.
master of ceremonies
enjoy a moment together at the Chairman's Reception held prior to the Dinner-Dance.
Spike Lee greets NMSDC Harriet R. Michel as the Reverend Jesse Jackson looks on.
the Reverend Jesse Jackson.
conductor of the George Gee Orchestra
which provided entertainment at the Dinner-Dance.
Living Legend Award Winner - Eddee the Yorkie
Pioneer Award Winner - Jack the Lab
AMC Trustee Tina Flaherty with William Secord
Annette de la Renta
Linda Gyuro with Eddee the Yorkie
Mina Ebrahimi with Jack the Lab
Andrea Allen with Mia the Maine Coon
Wendy Lash with AMC Veterinarian
At the Angel Orensanz Foundation to celebrate WET’s 11th Season.
Co-Founders of WET Productions – Victoria Pettibone
Graff models
PatrickMcMullan.com
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Orchestra of St. Luke's plays waltzes for the 2010 "Gift of Music Gala" at the Plaza.
students from P.S. 138
The High School of Art
Moody's Corporation
Faith Massingale of Citi Inc.
Mike Conway with alum Jackie Burgos
Pearson Arts &amp; Sciences
of the National Academy Foundation.
of the Verizon Foundation
of Xerox Corporation
of the National Academy Foundation.
with a student.
Chairman &amp
American Express Company with his wife Kathryn.
Students from Patterson High School’s Academy of Finance in Baltimore
Maryland explain their work-based learning projects to Sandy Weill
Chairman Emeritus of Citigroup
his wife Joan
Chairman &amp
his wife
Executive Director of the New York Council for the Humanities gives a business card to a student.
Information Technology Instructor at the Atlantic County Institute of Technology
in New Jersey talk with business professionals.
A student shows her project to Jay Fishman
Chairman &amp
of Coca-Cola
New Utrecht High School Academy of Hospitality
Students from the Academy of Finance
Enterprise in Long Island City
with Audra McDonald.
Students from the Academy of Finance
Enterprise in Long Island City chat with Ursula Burns
of Xerox Corporation.
of the Xerox Foundation
of Xerox Corporation
More than 600 people honored Howard L. Ganek at The Pierre Hotel.
friends
Sarah Chang performs with the Orchestra of St. Luke's
Janet Prindle Seidler with Charles Seid
OSL chairman Norman Benzaquen
OSL board member Judi Flom
Gala honoree Jonathan F. P. Rose
Gala honoree Jonathan F. P. Rose
conductor Rossen Milanov
conductor Rossen Milanov
OSL Board member Barbara Feldon
OSL Board member Barbara Feldon
Gala honoree Virginia James accepts award from OSL Presi
Gala honoree Virginia James accepts award from OSL Presi
OSL Board member Joe DiMenna
OSL Board member Georgia Frasch
OSL Board member Josie Natori
Ken &amp
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Lauren Bush hosted the Pink Agenda’s Annual Spring Gala at The Box.
The bar at The Box.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
&amp
NYWF Prez &amp
300 women
men gathered for The New York Women’s Foundation’s® 23rd Annual Celebrating Women® Breakfast at the Hilton Grand Ballroom.
Executive Director of Grand Street Settlement
Kate Calderon from Row New York
Emcee Soledad O'Brien with Honoree Eileen Fisher
Honoree Mary J Blige with Grantee Speaker Antoinette Coffi-Ahibo
&amp
of NYWF - Grantee Partner Organizations in the background
Lucy Danziger with friends
Jan Willem ven Bergen Henegouwen
friends
Jan Willem ven Bergen Henegouwen
Moises de la Renta
Moises de la Renta
Jan Willem ven Bergen Henegouwen
Geoffrey Bradfield's courtyard ...
interior
The Children's Storefront 8th Grade Graduates
friends
special performer
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Catherine Malandrino toasted for her 2010 Pratt Award.
Cocktails at Dia: Beacon
guest
sons
friend
friend
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Pre-dinner at the Oak Room in the Plaza Hotel at Lighthouse International's annual POSH fashion sale.
Daniel R. Garodnick at the New York City Center Demolition Party.
Michael R. Bloomberg kicks off the demolition on the New York City center stage.
NYSID 2010 Green Awards Table Design by NYSID students
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Hope Lodge guests
Hope Lodge guests
Girl Scouts with Melissa Morris
Mezzo-soprano Teresa Buchholz
Deborah Norville with dinner guests
Patrice Tanaka with Junior Girl Scouts
Melinda vanden Heuvel
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Buds co-chairs Emily Conner
NYRP Bud co-chair
Buds Junior Board members
co-chairs stuff gifts bags for event
Buds Junior Board members Heidi Wolf
Valley Forge Military Academy Drummer announces dinner
his wife The Duchess de Vendôme
His Imperial &amp
Royal Highness Prince George Frederick of Prussia
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Members of The Dallas Junior League in New York for the New York Junior League's 15th Annual Spring House Tour.
Mamie &amp
designed by Eva Marie Ruschak
Lunch at the A &amp
Goodie bag girls Amy Carpenter
Designer Robert Passal with co-chairs Lori Silverstein
friends at Plaza Residence
Veranda's Caroline Englefeld
Guests at the Ana Tzarev cocktail reception
Cocktail reception hosted by Ana Tzarev
The crowd packed Elaine’s for the Nominations Announcement Party
Nominees are congratulated
Twyla Tharp with nominees from Come Fly Away
Awards producer Patricia Watt
Emmy winning actor Richard Thomas reads nominees list
Emmy winning actor Richard Thomas reads nominees list
Event co-cost Carolyn Kendall Buchter
associate producer Bronwen Carson
Patricia Watt confers with Elaine
Luncheon chair Kate Kelly
luncheon host Jill Zarin
Bags up for auction from Zoe Saldana
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The American Patrons of the Tate's Artists Dinner at the Hearst Tower.
NCLD Chairman of the Board
Former of Walgreens
CFO of Walgreens
Executive Director at National Center for Learning Disabilities
William vanden Heuvel
City of Hope East End Chapter/Jeanne Kaye League Board Members
friends
Yummie Tummie by Heather Thomson
The crowd
Hartley duPont
August duPont
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Volunteers at PROMISE
the Center for Attention
Learning Disorders at Lenox Hill Hospital's third annual fundraising event.
The view from Verdura.
Council Member Marlene Mieske samples the donated merchandise
J Crew's Jenna Lyons
friend
friends
PROMISE's Advisory Council
Foundation &amp
welcome Kip Forbes
sponsors of the B.C. Forbes Peopling of America® Award.
Foundation &amp
recipient of the B.C. Forbes Peopling of America® Award for Sports
with the Foundation’s Stephen Briganti
Business honoree Pete Peterson
his grandsons with former NBA star Dikembe Mutombo
recipient of the B.C. Forbes Peopling of America® Award for Sports.
Warren Winiarski talk with award recipient Dikembe Mutombo as they approach Ellis Island.
Crossing the Hudson River on their way to Ellis Island are Wally Forbes
recipient of the B.C. Forbes Peopling of America® Award for Business
greets Avon Chairman
recipient of the B.C. Forbes Peopling of America® Award for Business.
Lee Iacocca welcomes Pete Peterson
recipient of the Ellis Island Family Heritage Award for Business.
Entertainment honoree
receives his grandfather Antonio Zerilli’s 1900 manifest from Lee Iacocca
U.S. Department of the Interior. NBC’s Brian Williams
who grew up at the Jersey Shore in Monmouth County
served as master of ceremonies.
Bruce Springsteen is joined on stage by his aunt Dora Kirby
aunt Ida Urbellis
the daughters of Italian immigrant Antonio Zerilli.
Greeting one another are honorees Peter G. Peterson
NBC’s Brian Williams
Assistant Secretary for Fish
U.S. Department of the Interior
speak with Pete Peterson
the Ellis Island Family Heritage Award Business honoree.
The 2010 Ellis Island Family Heritage Award recipients
invited guests
museum visitors watch the event’s opening performance of “Coming to America” in the Great Hall at Ellis Island.
The luncheon.
Sharon Rosenbaum Smith anf Cynthia Nixon.
friend.
Reem Acra runway show
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Adam Crown at The Greater New York Chapter of Crohn’s &amp
Colitis Foundation of America's 17th Annual Women of Distinction Luncheon.
friends
The event included a fashion show presented by Bergdorf Goodman
featuring the Evening Collections of Andrew GN
Oscar de la Renta
and
Jewelry by Sister Act Lorraine Schwartz
evening bags by Judith Leiber. Lorraine Scwartz
Kaufman Franco were present to watch their collections make their way down the runway.
Cast of Enron
Jamie deRoy
Jamie deRoy
William Lauder with Danielle Lauder
friends
Beth Jacobs speaks
Beth jacobs
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
New York City Ballet Spring Gala at Lincoln Center.
guest
friend
The dinner scene at Cipriani 42nd Street
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
St. George’s Society of New York English Ball at The New York Public Library
honoring Mark C. Pigott.
Clockwise from top: Peter
St. George’s Society of New York
Clockwise from top: Diane
Scott s
Happy event attendees.
Orrin Devinsky with Drs. Terri
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Cancer Research Institute's 28th Annual “Through the Kitchen” Dinner at the Four Seasons.
Entering the Pool Room at The Four Seasons ...
The crowd
Larry Rosenthal with Mom Mitzi
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Spirit the Dog at "Sweet Adoptions" for The ASPCA hosted by Dylan's Candy Bar.
Michael the Dog
Emery the Dog
family with Chocolate Bunny
Spirit the Dog
Guests crowd the sidewalks at Dora Frost’s opening in Chelsea
Pink by
Green by
Marzipan by Dora Frost.
Celestial by Dora Frost
Gallery owner Miguel Herrera
artist Dora Frost
Interior designer Stef-Albert
jeweler Caryn Picker
producer Pamela Laudenslager
Georgia serves up wild salmon with caviar
Emmy winning videographer Consuelo Gonzalez
William Norwich has a word from Janet Lehr
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Brooklyn Museum celebrates American High Style: Fashioning a National Collection
at its annual Brooklyn Ball.
An oversized Andy Warhol piñata was the source of much amusement all night long.
Jennifer Rubell takes a crack ...
Making good use out of the table centerpieces
Isabelle d'Harnoncourt
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Pamela A. Lewis with All Stars youth hosts
performers at The All Stars Project's National Gala Benefit
“Out of Crisis Helping the World’s Youth to Grow."
Oliver Platt perform
Gala Co-chair
Kelso &amp
Gala Co-chairs Larry
Gala Co-chair Christopher P. Dixon
Co-host Joanna Gleason
Back row
l. to r.: Consul Philippe Lalliot
Consul Asaf Shariv. Front row
l. to r.: Nishat Tabassum
Front row
l. to r.: Ray Thek
Steve Alesio. Back ow
l. to r.: Jeff Hurwitz
Gabrielle L. Kurlander with All Stars youth performers
Gerald Krovatin family
friends
son
son
and Anne Akers with a friend
and Anne Akers with a friend
Lainie Kazan on stage
Lainie Kazan on stage
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Orpheus Chamber Orchestra performing at its annual Orpheus Gala
Orpheus performing with pianist Jeremy Denk.
Tia Walker andFlavie Bagnol
Janice Savin Williams with James Esposito
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dinner in the Milstein Hall of Ocean life at the American Museum of Natural History's annual black tie Museum Dance.
Cocktails in the Theodore Roosevelt Rotunda.
friend
friend
Prince Dmitri of Yugoslavia
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Guest of honor
artist Kehinde Wiley at The Studio Museum in Harlem's 4th annual Spring luncheon.
Guest of Honor
thanks guests for attending luncheon.
Crystal McCrary Anthony with Darren Walker. Ms. McCrary Anthony is a lawyer
an award winning documenary film-maker. Walker is presently with the Rockefeller Foundation
but about to move to the Ford Foundation as its next vice for Education
Centerpieces of lilacs
red tulips
designed by Harlem Flo.
of Pace Prints.
who owns The Daily Blossoms Events
which provides flower arrangements for various events.
a lawyer with Fox Broadcasting in California
of Carver Savings Bank in Harlem.
Spencer Means with Deborah Roberts.
Jonelle Procope. Ms. Cafritz is a prominent art collector. Ms. Procope is
of the Apollo Theater Foundation.
Lise Evans with artist
Wardell Milan. Ms. Evans used to teach at Children's Storefront in Harlem
is now a trustee. "I taught the students English with a Norwegian accent
" she said. The Children's Storefront is an independent
tuition-free school in Harlem committed to providing comprehensive education to children.
Associate Curator Contemporary Art at Los Angeles Country Museum talking with Peggy Cooper Cafritz.
assistant curator of The Studio Museum.
The Studio Museum in Harlem.
Flo Perkins from Sante Fe. She blows glass
works with copper.
Margaret Keelan with her figurative sculptures. The faces are based on nineteenth century dolls
yet their contemporary styling
decayed surfaces disconnect them from time
space. Keelan is the Associate Director of the School of Sculpture at the Academy of Art University in San Francisco
where she also teaches ceramics.
Work by Artist Christie Brown
Artist Coby Kennedy. He is not exhibiting at Sofa
but one could safely say he was his own self-contained exhibition piece.
Running Hare by Irwin Peeters.
Artist Mara Superior with her ceramic
Piggy Bankers-The Great Recession of 2008. Ferrin Gallery
Sergei Isupof. Isupov was born in the 1960s
a decade in which Russian artists began to actively question
defy the prescribed artistic ideology dictated by the Soviet Union. He left in 1983
just before the turbulent artistic breakthroughs incited by Gorbachev's perestroika in 1987.
Beadist on view at the Lyons Wier Gallery
Booth #306. The entire Gallery was devoted to Ms. Huling's work
many of her pieces sold quickly on opening night.
This guitar once belonged to Ms. Huling's son. Ms. Huling is apt to cover anything in sight with beads. "We had a turtle for a while who used to quake every time I came near him
" confessed the artist.
Butterfly Cups by Irina Zaytceva. Jane Sauer Gallery
High Tea. Porcelain sculpture by Irina Zaytceva. Ms. Zaytceva was born in Moscow in 1957. All of her works are created using high-fire porcelain
over-glaze as well as under glaze colors
18K gold.
Twist by
Sit by
Prince Dmitri of Yugoslavia
Lewis Lapham with friends
Frederique van der Wal
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Doug Blonsky at a cocktail reception for "Platinum Jewels in Bloom
" hosted by Graff
the Central Park Conservancy.
Platinum Jewels in Bloom at Graff on Madison Avenue.
star of Broadway’s Scottsboro Boys
hundreds of singers from the Young People’s Chorus of New York on stage
lining the tiers of the Rose Theater
open the chorus’s March 15 gala.
The legendary tapper Maurice Hines shows John
up-and-coming tap stars of tomorrow
how it’s done.
YPC chorus members.
YPC Gala dinner guestsin the Allen Room.
with Gala co-chairs Shauna Tarshis Denkensohn
a double Pulitzer Prize-winning journalist
founding board member of the YPC
is honored with the YPC’s Humanitarian Award presented by Vice Chairman George Nemeth
the chorus’s Founder
Juliet Williams accepts the YPC’s Corporate Award for Toyota
a longtime supporter of the Young People’s Chorus of New York City from YPC Chair The Hon. A. Jerry Kremer.
YPC conductor Elizabeth Núñez
YPC board member Nancy Bloom
YPC conductor Sophia Miller.
director of administration of the Statue of Liberty/Ellis Island Foundation
with YPC Artistic Director/Founder Francisco J. Núñez.
Clockwise from top left: Glen Myles
YPC Board member Suzan Kremer
Late night revelers at The Park for the opening of the 15th Annual Gen Art Film Festival.
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Rory Hermelee at New Yorkers for Children's 7th Annual Spring Dinner Dance: A Fool’s Fete.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Sharon Bush at Somaly Mam Foundation's "Voices of Change" launch event.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Louise Linton dipped
Louise Linton dipped
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
An Easter Egg Hunt for the youngest Doubles members
their friends
families.
GC of Soul Mafia
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Tearing it up at Chicago Opera Theater' s “Opera Among the Stars” gala.
Maestro Kirk Muspratt of Chicago
Susan Stein of Winnetka
Lydsey Baker of Chicago
Pat Anderson of Chicago
Morgan Walsh of Chicago
Director Andrew Eggert of New York
COT Board Trustee Julie E. Green of Chicago
Eva Lichtenberg of Chicago
COT Board Trustee Bennett Neuman of Chicago
COT Board Trustee / 2010 Gala Committee Member Lincoln S. Ellis of Chicago
Auctioneer Steve Zick of Christie’s Fine Art Auctioneers in Chicago with Ann Blickensderfer
Mike Stockreiter of Chicago.
Gloria Williams of Chicago
Todd Johnson of Chicago
Trustees of The Elizabeth Morse Charitable Trust
James Alexander and Anita Tyson of JPMorgan Chase receive an engraved memento from Tiffany &amp
Co. from COT Board Trustee
2010 Gala Master of Ceremonies Henry Fogel of Chicago
Senior Director of Major Gifts Kim Swinton
Manager Peter Calibraro at Goodman Theatre
David McGaw of Chicago
Kenneth Griffin - Harvard Club of Chicago 2010 Award Winners with Lisa Choi
of the Harvard Club of Chicago.
The scene at Arcature Fine Art.
The "Art of Science" Menu
The "Art of Science" Menu
Cindy’s Having a Ball LA Invite
Cindy’s Having a Ball LA Invite
Jr. with Emilia
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The New York Choral Society celebrated its 51st Anniversary with a Winter Gala at The National Arts Club.
Gala Commitee with Susan Seigle
Valentino models
and Louis Sullivan
and Ralph Lopez
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Duchess of Marlborough
HRH Princess Elizabeth of Bavaria
The Duchess of Marlborough
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Zarin Mehta at The New York Philharmonic's 2010 Spring Gala with SONDHEIM.
Niall Ferguson interviewed by James Surowiecki.
Howard Milstein with Library Paul LeClerc
Commissioner Marjorie Tiven with Roger Alcaly
his wife
his wife
his wife
his wife
The crowd at Pacha.
SassX7 performs.
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
"Pisces" birthday party of John Demsey
and Anna Porcella Pinheiro
Moises de la Renta
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The publication party of Linda Fairstein’s Hell Gate
held at Gracie Mansion.
of the Gracie Mansion Conservancy
host of the party
introduces Linda.
Linda addresses the guests.
Click to order Hell Gate.
Linda autographing a copy for Cynthia Lufkin.
With her Carlos Falchi bag made especially for Linda by Mickey Ateyeh.
Gala student speaker.
former SS student.
The scene at Cipriani 42nd Street.
The crowd at intermission.
The French to the United States
Pascal deLisle.
his dancers.
Consul of France in New York Philippe Lalliot
Cultural Conselor of the Embassy of France in the United States Kareen Rispal
of France to the United States His Excellency Pierre Vimont.
Guests at The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center’s Health Education Seminar.
Moshe Shike of MSKCC.
friend.
Lisa McCarthy with guests
Wendy Arriz with guests.
friend.
of The Society of MSKCC.
Maria Villalba with friend.
guests.
Martha Glass with a friend.
Letitia Bennett with friends.
Janet Weinberg GMHC’s COO
GHMC’s Marjorie Hill Phd
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Associates Committee of The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center 's 19th Annual Bunny Hop at FAO Schwarz Fifth Avenue.
The Associates Committee of The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center 's 19th Annual Bunny Hop at FAO Schwarz Fifth Avenue.
Annabelle Fowlkes with Leslie Heaney
of The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center
Associates Committee Chairman Leslie Heaney with children
son Barron
daughter
daughter
daughter Helena Grace
sons Sam
daughter Siena
sons
The ladies of Papo d' Anjo
Bunny Hop sponsor
son
daughter
daughter
friend
The Cohen family
daughters
daughter
children
daughter Natalie
Children at The Bunny Hop
Children at The Bunny Hop
family
children Vivienne
daughter
son Nicholas
children
son
daughter Allesandra
Children at The Bunny Hop
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Johannes Fischer at The International Musical Olympus Festival's Six Rising Stars at Carnegie Hall.
Johannes Fischer at The International Musical Olympus Festival's Six Rising Stars at Carnegie Hall.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Young New Yorkers of the Philharmonic Chairmen: Keith Connor
Young New Yorkers of the Philharmonic Chairmen: Keith Connor
Kelly Thomas with NY Philharmonic Board Chairman Gary Parr
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Careers through Culinary Arts Program celebrated its 20th anniversary at Chelsea Piers' Pier 60.
The Careers through Culinary Arts Program celebrated its 20th anniversary at Chelsea Piers' Pier 60.
C-CAP graduates.
C-CAP graduates.
Bill Levine from Sarabeth
Ja-Laurel of Sarabeth
Christina Grdovic of Food
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dayle Haddon at The School of American Ballet Winter Ball 2010.
Dayle Haddon at The School of American Ballet Winter Ball 2010.
Click above to play ...
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Garden Court lighting having gradually changed from sunset to dusk to midnight at The Frick Collection’s Diamond Deco Ball
hosted by the Young Fellows to commemorate the museum’s 75th Anniversary.
The Garden Court lighting having gradually changed from sunset to dusk to midnight at The Frick Collection’s Diamond Deco Ball
hosted by the Young Fellows to commemorate the museum’s 75th Anniversary.
Zondra Pappas enjoy the 1935 East Gallery.
Guests enjoy the West Gallery.
Models in
Chairmen in
guest
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The dinner scene at the Plaza Hotel for the the New York Junior League's 58th annual Winter Ball
The dinner scene at the Plaza Hotel for the the New York Junior League's 58th annual Winter Ball
Gena Lovett with award recipients.
friend
Alison Minton with friend
Eliza Osborne with a friend
Kelly d
Nicolas d
Barbara Tober with Hunt Slonem
friends
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
David Brand with students.
David Brand with students.
Rodney Wilson with students
Students with Rodney Wilson
Senior students wear golden ties
Students with NYC Comptroller John Liu
Craig Simmons with friends
Michael Bloomberg with students
Clodagh with Ellen Sweeny
Monique Van Vooren with Eric Purcell
Vintage Asian setting at the Society of Mechanics
Dressed in homage to Palamino
Designer Elisa Palomino midst applause &amp
Ralph Rucci with his mentor
friend
pontificating to Collaborations artist
Michael J. Maiarecki witha friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Brunch gathering at the New York School of Interior Design with a special presentation by New York interior designer Michael Simon
"Channeling Genius: Recreating Edith Wharton's Bedroom Suite."
Melinda vanden Heuvel
Amb. William vanden Heuvel
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
VANITY FAIR &amp
The FEED Foundation launched The Hungry In America Project
hosted by Natalie Portman
Tom Colicchio at Colicchio &amp
Nina Vizcarrondo with Clotilde Dedecker
Rufus Wainwright- Metaphysical Portrait by Colette
Metaphysical Portrait Light box by Colette
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Front row at Isaac Mizrahi's Fall 2010 Collection at the Bryant Park Tents.
Models backstage ...
Kyle with Liya Kebede
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Kane Manera at the after party for Happy Tears
hosted by The Cinema Society
One very talented guy
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
models backstage at her Fall 2010 Collection at the Chelsea Art Museum.
Elise Overland with models backstage
Carol Alt gets a good look
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Mechad Brooks at CALVIN KLEIN COLLECTION Men's Fall 2010 Runway Show.
Runway rehearsal
Grace Coddington from the back
Robert Verdi at the Premiere of "The Robert Verdi Show."
Chinese LifeStyle reporter Jeffrey Ying.
PORTS 1961 Collection through haze.
The Heart Truth's Red Dress Collection 2010 Celebrities in Designer Red Dresses: Bethenny Frankel Elisabeth Hasselbeck
Dara tprres
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
A full house on the Promenade of the David H. Koch Theater for the New York City Ballet's 2010 Annual Luncheon.
Décor by Dejaun Stroud.
Costumes from some of Ms. Kistler’s most significant roles decorated the Promenade.
Paige Bluhdorn bidding on the afternoon’s auction item
which included dinner for 4 at Alain Ducasse with Darci Kistler
former NYCB Principal Dancer Jock Soto
tickets to Ms. Kistler’s farewell performance on June 27.
NYCB dancer Kaitlyn Gilliland
NYCB Principal Dancer Philip Neal with Arlene Cooper
Adam Levin with NYCB dancer
previous honoree Kathryn Morgan
with Principal Dancer Darci Kistler
event co-Chairwoman Alexandra Kerry
Valentino USA Wendy Kahn with Peter Martins
NYCB Ballet Master in Chief
her daughter Talicia Martins
Evidence founder Ronald K. Brown
Peven Everett with the Dance Company.
Ronald K. Brown in an impromptu dance tribute to Reginald Van Lee.
Jennifer Holliday sings with the Evidence dancers.
Hermès created a limited edition scarf to commemorate the Company’s 25-year history.
Dancers with their gifts.
Board member Ancy Verdier
Princess Keisha Omilana of Nigeria
Prince Kunle Omilana of Nigeria
Rudy Chavez of Baume Mercier
wife Gillian
Board member Lisa Walker
b Michael
First of New York Michelle Paterson
Yvette Durant at the Hermes table
"Fela" star Saycon Sengbloh
date
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center’s Spring Ball Kick-Off reception at the Core Club.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Ruth at The Princess Ball Mardi Gras Masquerade Gala.
The scene at Cipriani 42nd STreet.
The cake.
The ice bar.
Cutting the cake.
HRH Crown Prince Alexander II of Serbia
sons
Prince Philip of Serbia.
The dancers ...
HRH Crown Prince Alexander II of Serbia
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
HRH Prince Philip of Serbia
HRH Prince Philip of Serbia
HRH Princess Katherine of Serbia
with Genesis
A little magic
Caroline caricature
her caricature
Dierdre Laterman with Beatrice
Freddi Baranoff with Michael
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Super Bowl party to kick off Fashion Week at Soho House.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Partnership for the Homeless
Honorary Co-chair
Partnership for the Homeless National Spokesperson Jessye Norman
Co-chair Richard Serra
Partnership for the Homeless Vice
Director of Advocacy Piper Hoffman
Partnership for the Homeless
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Graff models Jessica Santiago
Mashi Azmudea visiting Tiffany
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The guests at Le Cirque for an intimate luncheon in honor of HRH Crown Princess Katherine of Serbia.
The luncheon guests ...
HRH Crown Princess Katherine of Serbia
HRH Crown Princess Katherine of Serbia
HRH Crown Princess Katherine of Serbia
HRH Crown Princess Katherine of Serbia
Christine Miller Martin at entrance to Burden Mansion
Christine Miller Martin with architect Jonathan Marvel
Christine Miller Martin with her daughter Phoebe Martin
Christine Miller Martin with Roy Lindsay Morrow
Christine Cachot with daughter Allegra Williams
Sacred Heart alumnae: Jennifer Adams. Leslie Coleman
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The opening reception for Erwin Olaf at Hasted Hunt Kraeutler.
The Rising Star Winners Amanda Pearl Brotman. Juliette karague Uzoglou
Poster announcing Awards.
Waiting Waiters at Cipriani.
daughter Laura.
FGI's Rising Star Awards.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The electrifying Evidence dancers at a reception hosted by Hermès at its Madison Avenue flagship store for the friends
supporters of Evidence
A Dance Company to celebrate the acclaimed dance troupe’s upcoming 25th Anniversary.
Reginald Van Lee displays Evidence Commemorative calendar.
founder &amp
artistic director
Reginald Van Lee with the limited edition Hermes custom scarf for Evidence
A Dance Company’s 25th Anniversary.
Board Chair with Bruce Michael
Fashion doyenne Audrey Smaltz
friends.
Happy shoppers at Hermes.
Evidence founder Ronald K. Brown
of HBO Documentary Films
Featured Children in A Family Is A Family Is A Family.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Mitra Margolis at Pink Elephant for New York Junior League's Most Outstanding Volunteer Party for Amy Phelan.
The of the Russian Federation Sergey Kislyak
The of the Russian Federation Sergey Kislyak
Amy Phelan with Andrew
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
John Crowley Jr. at a screening of Extraordinary Measures
hosted by The Cinema Society
friends
Guests of the Event
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Co-chairs Meredith Verona
their children at Guggenheim Kids’ Club Party.
Paz de la Huerta
Kids drawing on floor of the rotunda
daughter Quinn
Helen Dietze with granddaughters Emerson
sons Alexander
sons Alexander
Kimberly Tighe with son William
Kimberly Tighe with son William
Henry Garnett with Guggenheim model
The evening's honoree
evening honoree
Parasol ceiling at Le Cirque.
Ceslie Armstrong &amp
Marco Maccioni being interviewed for the "You Better You" show ...
Watchful Momentum women
Watchful Momentum women
CNN's Alina Cho
The crowd at ART Palm Beach
VIP reception for the Young Friends of The Norton Museum of Art
Young Friends of The Society of the Four Arts.
Michael Goedhuis of Goedhuis Contemporary.
Artist Federico Uribe with Arlene Kaufman
Sandy just purchased Uribe's Abstract Piece "Books"
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Milling about at the 2010 FSF Geffrey Beene National Scholarship Awards Dinner.
friend
Alex Gonzalez with FSF Scholars
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Daryl Roth caricature
Daryl Roth caricature
Clockwise from top left: Sara McCann
Pamella Roland fashion
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
friend
More than 300 people stopped by over the course of the evening.
Sabrina Wirth sitting on Kristy's chairs that she made.
Reet Das in front of his painting.
Andres Serrano's girlfriend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at one of Doubles’ annual Christmas Luncheons.
The dessert buffet.
friends
ICA&amp;CA Chairman Peter Pennoyer
friend
ICA&amp;CA Paul Gunther
Stephen Siegel of CB Richard Ellis
Michael Salem of National Jewish Health
Larry Silverstein of Silverstein Properties
Jon Mechanic of Fried
Shriver &amp
Lee Neibart of AREA Property Partners;
Mitchell Rudin of CB Richard Ellis
Jon Mechanic of Fried
Shriver &amp
Steven Scheinfeld of Fried
Shriver &amp
Craig Reicher of CB Richard Ellis
Robert Sorin of Fried
Shriver &amp
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Leon Fassler Family goes watch shopping
Cartier on Worth Avenue
daughter Courtnay
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Badner families at the Jewish Museum's 15th annual Family Hanukkah Party.
Menorah by Joel Otterson
Ali cupcake
her cupcake
The Pruzan family
The Wasserman family
family
Mark Aaron with Laelah
Jacqueline Harris Hochberg with Alexander
Jacqueline Harris Hochberg with Sally Siegel
family
Alison Brod with Austin
Hammerman family
Cozy Friedman's make-overs
grandson Tucker
Balloon artist
Sophie Auster performs
surgeon-in-chief at Hospital for Special Surgery
Executive Vice &amp
Manager of A&amp;E Stores Inc.
member of Hospital for Special Surgery’s Autumn Benefit Dinner Committee;
Hospital for Special Surgery sports medicine surgeon
his wife Laurie Warren
member of Hospital for Special Surgery’s Autumn Benefit Dinner Committee
chairperson of the Benefit Committee
wife of Thomas P. Sculco
surgeon-in-chief at Hospital for Special Surgery;
executive vice of external affairs at the hospital.
wife of Lou Shapiro
member of Hospital for Special Surgery’s Autumn Benefit Dinner Committee
Hospital for Special Surgery.
Broadway performer Andrea McArdle.
Former New York Giant running back
NBC Sports correspondent Atiim “Tiki” Barber
his wife Ginny Barber
chairperson of the Benefit Committee;
her husband Thomas P. Sculco
surgeon-in-chief
Hospital for Special Surgery.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Blessing of The Animals hosted by the ASPCA
Calvin Moore with Augusto
Susan Welt with Elvis
Cindy Adams with Jazzy
Effie Phillips with Giovanni
Arlene Scanlan with Moses
Pamela Gale with Kweon
Décor by Antony Todd
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The young set at outside the Brick Presbyterian Church at 91st
Park Avenue for the Park Avenue Tree Lighting.
The gathering.
The Brick Church musicians
Kids on the bed at the Clark's
The scene at at The Clark's
The ballroom.
John Mack with Roy J. Bostock
Director of Hearts of Hope
Director of Hearts of Hope
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
with students from the School of American Ballet who appeared in The Nutcracker performance.
his children with NYCB Principal Dancer Sterling Hyltin
the Sugarplum Fairy
signs autographs for guests.
NYCB dancer Tabitha Rinko-Gay signs an autograph for a guest.
her son
her family
her daughter
Muffie Potter Aston with their daughters
NYCB Board Member Katie von Strasser with her son
friends
her son with students from the School of American Ballet who appeared in the afternoon’s performance of The Nutcracker
his grandson
a student at the School of American Ballet appearing in The Nutcracker
her family
Santa waves.
Cookie decorating.
Steering Committee members Peggy Hannon
Co-chair Sarah Crews
Steering Committee member Anne Shutkin
Steering Committee member Josh Bernstein
friend
Steering Committee members Jenna Dreher
Steering Committee members Sky Fernandes
Alex Greeley with David Rogue
Steering Committee members Val Bitici
Co-chair Christy Corgan
Steering Committee member Julia Blankertz
William vanden Heuvel
wife
friend
William vanden Heuvel
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Nathalie Kaplan at The New York Botanical Garden's WINTER WONDERLAND BALL.
Moises de la Renta
friend
The UNICEF Snowflake above the intersection of Fifth Avenue
57th Street: a beacon of hope
peace for
compassion for vulnerable children around the world.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Third Street’s honorees
important guests
student performers at Third Street Music School Settlement's 115th Anniversary Luncheon.
some of Third Street’s youngest students
perform for the audience.
Third Street’s Philharmonia Orchestra prepares for their performance.
Third Street’s Philharmonia Orchestra
with 11-year-old violin soloist
perform Vivaldi’s Spring.
Philip Glass applaud Third Street's student performers.
Hugh Hardy takes to the piano as Robert White
Thomas Hampson sing a rendition of Gershwin's "Our Love is Here to Stay"
Anna-Maria Kellen with Helmi Augustin
friend
friend
Third Street's Associate Director Mary Lou Francis with Third Street parent
her daughter
friend
Zarin Mehta presents Thomas Hampson his award for Distinguished Achievement in the Arts
John Corigliano presents Robert White his award for Distinguished Achievement in the Arts
Joel Grey presents Hugh Hardy his award for Distinguished Achievement in the Arts
Chairman of the Board Lisa Schiff
accepting the award for her Albert Murray
who was in the audience
friends
Chairman of the Board Lisa Schiff
Brooke Shields accepts award with Audrey Gruss
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dinner in the Milstein Hall of Ocean Life to celebrate the Museum Gala at the American Museum of Natural History.
Bagpiper leads guests to dinner
Dave Matthews performing
Alec Baldwin bidding during the auction
Museum's Chairmen of the Board of Trustees Lewis W. Bernard
Gala chair Kathy Freston
Gala chair Kathy Freston with John Sykes
Museum's Chairmen of the Board of Trustees Lewis W. Bernard
Gala chairs John
Jodie Eastman with Vanessa Eastman
Dean of the Gilder Graduate School John Flynn
Gala chair Lorne Michaels
Gala chairs Kathy
Gala chair Lorne Michaels
Outside the Edison Ballroom.
family.
Going into dinner.
A dinner table.
The dinner scene.
his guests
Girl Scouts surrounding Future Woman of Distinction Nitiya Walker
Deborah Norville reciting the Girl Scout Promise
Future Woman of Distinction Nitiya Walker
Deborah Norville with Girl Scouts
Brownie Girl Scouts in action
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
ARTWALK NY held a cocktail party “to celebrate artist Pat Steir” at the Skylight Studio at 275 Hudson Street.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Alliance for The Arts in partnership with New York Lawyers for the Public Interest hosted a reception for Friends of the Arts at Christie's.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Apollo Circle Benefit 2009 at The Metropolitan Museum of Art
sponsored by Carolina Herrera.
Dinner at Irish Georgian Society Gala.
CEO/Medical Director of Holliswood Hospital
new NARSAD board member Lynnda-Maria Davis
University of Texas Medical Branch at Galveston
of NARSAD Scientific Council Herbert Pardes
MD. /CEO of New York-Presbyterian
both of University of Pennsylvania
dean of Columbia University Medical Center
his sister Shelley Lewkowict
NARSAD-funded Young Investigators: Paula Bos with “Young Investigator” Javier Gonzalez-Maeso
Mt. Sinai School of Medicine
John Hollaway husband of “Young Investigator” Marjan Hollay
Uniformed Services Univ of the Health Sciences
NARSAD board member Suzanne Golden
Webb Egerton with daughters Brooke Egerton
Karen Klopp with Kell Klopp
daughters Yang
Joyce Yang with daughters Madison
daughters with Danielle Ganek
daughter Zoe Ganek
Christie Brinkley with daughter Sailor
daughter Eva with Roya Obedian
daughter Natalie
Lark Elliott with daughter Lucy
daughter Annika
Joanne Dressendofer with daughter Ava
friend
Georgia Griscom with daughter Ava
friend
friend with Brooke Edgerton-Warburton
Christie Brinkley with Sailor
Linda Garnett with daughter Isabelle Garnett
Andrew Stein of Orphaned Starfish Foundation with Christie Brinkley
Veronica Webb auctioned off David Rockwell’s innovative
light-up waste bin for $6
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Lung Cancer Research Foundation's annual luncheon at the Plaza.
Jewels in Bloom: white
yellow diamond brooch set in platinum featuring 95 carats by GRAFF. Floral by Mariann Kelly Fine Flowers.
Chair of Madison Avenue BID Marketing Committee
Kamie Lightburn with Peter Kairis
Stribling &amp
friends
Christopher Bakkenist receiving the 2009 Scientific Merit Award from Jim Dougherty
The Pratt family
Patti Smith performing
Josh Sobel with fans
Marc Jacobs making more fans
Eduard E. van der Geest
Serena van der Geest
Eduard E. van der Geest
chairman of the United Hospital Fund
recipients of the Health Care Leadership Award;
of the United Hospital Fund
wife
First row: Yoko Ono
honoree visual art
honoree engineering
science
honoree
emerging talent
Cooper Union School of Art alumna. Second row: Cooper Union George Campbell
honoree
urban citizenship
honoree
architecture
honoree
Board of Trustees Ronald Drucker.
honoree engineering
science
honoree
visual art
Dean of the School of Art at The Cooper Union Saskia Bos
honoree
emerging talent
Cooper Union School of Art alumna
honoree
urban citizenship
honoree
Dean of the Irwin S. Chanin School of Architecture at The Cooper Union Anthony Vidler
dinner chair
honoree
visual art
dinner chair
dinner chair
dinner chair
honoree
urban citizenship
dinner chair
honoree
architecture
Board of Trustees Ronald Drucker
honoree
Board of Trustees
honoree
visual art
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dinner in the David H. Koch Theater at Lincoln Center.
Hosts Donor Dinner at the Hotel On Rivington.
After School Pop Stars" with Zelma Davis
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
DIA Art Foundation's Fall Gala 2009 at the Hispanic Society of America.
Philip-Lorca diCorcia
Philip-Lorca diCorcia
Rodale’s Ethne Clarke
Cocktail hour
The Omphoy's O Bar
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Anka Palitz at the 24th anniversary jubilee for Career Transition for Dancers.
Dinner in the Pool Room.
friends
Blake Lively surrounded
Future of Hope Board: Jessica Haber
Marcia Gay Harden backstage
Lombard twins
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Prince Alexander of Serbia
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Ghosties &amp
Goodies at Doubles.
Oscar de la Renta
Co-chairs
committee members Ian Harris
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Sandra del Castillo
fag Jon
fag Jon
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
At Bette Midler's annual Hulaween 2009.
Martha Stewart with Bette
The Jet Blue Table with David Barger
his 8 children
Bette with Crosby
Bette serenades
Liquor heads
Bette making the rounds
A masked marauder
Mika Brezinski Co host of MSNBC's Morning Joe
Leonard Lauder In Leonard's speech he mentions that this is The Breast Cancer Research Foundation's 16th anniversary
then added that him
Evelyn were proudly celebrating their 50th anniversary!!
Elizabeth Hurley Leonard presented this year's Humanitarian award to Elizabeth Hurley
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
KAGENO Harambee "Back to Basics" Annual Benefit at Hudson Terrace.
and John Potter
Prince Dmitri of Yugoslavia
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The First Annual Norman Mailer Writers Colony Benefit Gala at Cipriani 42nd Street.
Norris Church Mailer with the Mailer family.
The dinner scene at Cipriani Wall Street.
Oscar de la Renta
Oscar de la Renta
Oscar de la Renta
Oscar de la Renta
Moises de la Renta
Moises de la Renta
Princess Alexandra of Greece
Princess Alexandra of Greece
Milly deCabrol
Oscar de la Renta
Oscar de la Renta
Prince Amir Sabet d'Acre
Suzy Menkes receives first National Jewelry Institute Award
Arturo Gomez for Loro Piana
Heather Townsend for The Lake Forest Shop
Raul Melgoza for Luca Luca
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dinner in the dramatically uplit West Gallery at The Frick Collection's Autumn Dinner 2009.
The receiving line of Frick Trustee Chairman Margot Bogert
honoree Philippe de Montebello
Guests were able to dine in the newly reinstalled
relit East Gallery among works by El Greco
others.
honoree Philippe de Montebello
Janine Hill in the upstairs drawing room of the Frick mansion with Director Anne Poulet
Honoree Philippe de Montebello in the upstairs drawing room of the Frick mansion with Director Anne L. Poulet during the 6:30 VIP cocktail gathering before the Autumn Dinner
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Christine Burgin with the Frick's celebrated Bellini behind them
Frick Director Anne L. Poulet with Helen Clay Chace
great granddaughter of Henry Clay Frick
honoree Philippe de Montebello
Philippe de Montebello in the Living Hall enjoying works by El Greco
others
Director of The Metropolitan Museum of Art Thomas Campbell
Frick Chairman of the Board Margot Bogert
with his wife Beth
Charles Wadsworth performing "Priscilla" with Paula Robison
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Blake performs at Denise Rich's annual Angel Ball.
friend
friend
The crowd gets ready for the show.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Jr. with members of the Cantata Singers
pianist Peter Basquin.
Renee Chenault-Fattah with Reverend Al Sharpton
friends
Guests at the Bowery Hotel.
Carole Mazius browsing Silent Auction
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
EL MUSEO DEL BARRIO Benefactor's dinner celebrating the grand opening
preview of the inaugural exhibitions.
Silvia Machete’s show.
Osmar Chohfi with Albert
Jeane Lopez-Muniz with Vanessa Simone Pereira
Brazil Natalia anderle
Alice Tisch with friends
friends
guests
andy Unanue
Beatriz de la Mora
Michelle de la Cruz
Cindy Galvin with copies of I Love Your Style
Hostesses with Chanel Vp Retail Susan Platworthy
Kimberly Burt getting touched up
Meredith Wood-Prince in Chanel Shoes
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Drums playing aboard the Intrepid to benefit "Heal A Soldier 's Life."
Drums at Hanover Square
Robertson of Port Ellen
Elizabeth Stribling &amp
HRH The Duke of Kent
HRH The Duke of Kent
Karin Wyser Pratte &amp
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Montana Governor Brian Schweitzer at a lunchtime interview with Jacob Weisberg
Elliott Yamin talks about his Idol Gives Back trip to Angola last year
Atlantic Media Chairman David Bradley addresses the audience at the “First Draft of History.”
Former Chairman of the Federal Reserve Alan Greenspan
Former Chairman of the Federal Reserve Alan Greenspan
ABC News anchorman Charlie Gibson interviews David Axelrod
senior adviser to Obama
The Atlantic’s James Fallows
The Atlantic’s Justin Smith
Newseum’s Charles Overby
The Aspen Institute’s Walter Isaacson
Meet the Press host David Gregory interviews Senator John McCain
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The American Ballet Theatre hosted its 2009 Fall Gala with a performance at Avery Fisher Hall at Lincoln Center
followed by a dinner dance on the Grand Promenade of the hall. Party design created by event designer Shai Tertner of Shiraz Events.
Michel Degroux with Benjamin Steinitz
and Daniel Alcouffe
friend
friend
Bennie the Dog
Bennie the Dog
Uno the Dog
Bennie the Dog
Bennie the Dog
Bennie the Dog
Panda thing
Ricky the Dog
Ricky the Dog
Ricky the Dog
anf Grace Hightower De Niro
Opening Night Gala Concert at Carnegie Hall
Opening Night Gala Dinner at The Waldorf-Astoria
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The dinner scene at AMERICANS FOR THE ARTS 2009 National Arts Awards at Cipriani 42nd Street.
Julie Jaffe &amp
friends
friends
friends
and
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Looking out the window at the kick-off party for the Stark Heart Ball.
Clockwise from top left: Misty Copeland
Nathalie Fernandez de la Valle
Michael Kors model
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Robert Kelly at "SIT
STAY AND STAND-UP!" Comedy Show to Benefit The ASPCA.
Brian Fischler with Nash
Our furry little friends
Every single day of the year
the ASPCA rescues animals from a lifetime of cruelty
violence
pain. Your commitment makes it possible for their life-saving programs to create happy endings for those innocent lives touched by cruelty. Please consider making a donation.
Musicians with David Finkel
Elizabeth W. Smith with daughter
Hall of Biodiversity
David Dwyer with friends
Museum Curator Melanie Stiassny with guests
friend
friend
Co-chairs Lori Toub
Zach Pomerantz with Sherri Toub
friend
Margaret &amp
friend
Co-chairs Andrew
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
DIOR BEAUTY Party to Celebrate the 10th Anniversary of J'Adore at The Boom Boom Room at The Standard New York.
Luba J cuff
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The dinner scene at the 2009 Guggenheim International Gala.
NYWF Board members
Performance artist Kiera Grant
Artnet's Nazy Nazhand
James Kaliardos backstage
Bob Sui backstage
Ania Taubensligel backstage
Natalie Morales backstage
The finale ...
Anna Wintour front
center
friend
A Valentino creation
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
LINDA EVANGELISTA &amp
NOTIFY celebrate RON ARAD at MoMA.
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Marc Jacobs surveys the scene.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Kate Lanphear at Erin Fetherston's Spring/Summer 2010 Collection at Milk Studios.
On the runway with Reem Acra ...
On the runway with Reem Acra ...
models
Elise Overland surrounded backstage
Waris Ahluwalia andAllison Sarofim
models
more models
another model
The front row
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
KiptonART Foundation held an “elegant night of sounds
style”
and Christopher Barry
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
A List Staffing at post-screening dinner for Precious
hosted by Marcia
Richard Mishaan at their Sagaponack home.
Princess Alexandra of Greece
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The gals at the Einstein Medical College's 20th Annual Wild
Wild West Carnival at the Ross School
friends
Children enjoy tasty slices of watermelon
Child rides the toy horse
Child rides the toy horse
Child goes horseback riding
Watermelon eating contest participant
daughter Richards
friend
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
A happy camper at Valentino's luncheon
presentation of the Fall/Winter 2009 collection to benefit City Harvest.
friends
Byung-hun Lee
Guests arriving at the State Street Corporation
The auction
The auction
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Nigel Lythgoe with cast members at the opening night of Burn The Floor.
family
Mad Men cast
friend
friends
friend
Joan Rivers with the cast
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at Super Saturday 12 benefiting the Ovarian Cancer Research Fund.
family
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Ribbons at
Rewards at
Jane Hottensen draws the winning ticket.
Farnham Collins accepts Fitch's corner award from Fernanda Kellogg
Hunter Boot USA booth was a sell out as the grounds were muddy from the rain
the fashionable boots were the accessory of the day.
Hermes brought their custom made saddles from France along with Julian
their expert fitter.
You can never have too many chickens ...
Suzy Abuza of Indo-Chic
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
of Piaget
Todd Rome with daughter
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
UNICEF's Next Generation Steering Committee.
Crumbs Cupcakes lovers ...
The Showhouse at 179 David’s Lane in Water Mill.
The designers
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
” the 16th Annual Watermill Summer Benefit.
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Christophe deMenil
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Marie Claire &amp
Michelle Trachtenberg host GUESS Soho boutique opening.
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
ACRIA's Annual "Cocktails at Sunset" was enjoyed by all creatures.
Models in Calvin Klein.
Elsa the Dog
Richie Notar with Harlow
&amp
of OPTYX by gruen
Alex Bize with daughter Natasha Bize
Performers at "Broadway Stands Up For Freedom"
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Angkor Dance Troupe at LongHouse Reserve's Summer gala.
LongHouse’s exquisite grounds ...
Fred d'Hallewin
SPORTIME’s Mascot
Dean Landis with Brad Peck
Girls sporting summer dresses
friends
Guests enjoy the Fifth Avenue Garden
Sotheby’s Jill Waddell
Maximiliano del Vento
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The dinner scene at the 10th Anniversary of Art for Life in East Hampton.
Anthony Haden-Guest outside the gallery
The crowd at The Guy Hilton Gallery.
Euan Rellie with Heathcliff
According to Euan: "We drank a hundred
fifty Bloody Marys
a few cases of Mexican beer.”
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Soweto Gospel Choir at MANDELA DAY: a 46664 Celebration Concert at Radio City Music Hall.
Will.i.am
james Bennet
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Caramoor's Venetian Theater: the setting for the launch of Caramoor International Music Festival's 64th annual summer season.
Barbara with Andrew Spano
Contessa Brewer with Melissa
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Parrish Art Museum's Midsummer Party
Honoring Dorothy Lichtenstein at Parrish Art Museum in Southampton.
Katlean deMonchy
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
A party outdoors in the Yard of the Soho Grand Hotel for The Cinema Society screening of “500 Days of Summer.”
friend
Vinny of Naughty By Nature
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at Burberry's for Young New Yorkers for the Philharmonic's annual summer benefit
Jill Chalsty with Susan Jones
Dinner in the Museum's galleries
Guests in orange
purple
white ...
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Tent at night with Kilkare House behind.
Michael Safir wedding collage.
Pre-wedding scenes ...
Anna married
Michael married
Outside Queen of the Most Holy Rosary Church: Filippo Mondadori
Queen of the Most Holy Rosary Church
Cocktails at Kilkare House
Michael on the beach.
Michael with
Anna with
The bridal party.
Eleanora Kennedy with groomsmen.
Kennedy families
Safir families
The bridal table.
The wedding cake with bobble heads standing guard.
Clockwise from above: His Excellency Miguel D’Escoto Brockmann
Clockwise from top left: Robin Seegal
Tent at night with luminaries.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Barbara Baldieri-March host a benefit for "March to the Top" in Malibu.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
the scene at the 22nd Annual Southampton Fresh Air Home American Picnic.
JHS 278 performs
Consul in New York of The Kingdom of the Netherlands
Chairman of the Board of Trustees at the South Street Seaport Museum
Counselor of Public Diplomacy
Press at
Culture at the Royal Netherlands Embassy with Henry C. Barkhorn
Consul for Press
Cultural Affairs for the Consulate for The Kingdom of the Netherlands New York
Executive Director of the Maritime Association of the Port of New York
Director of the South Street Seaport Museum
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at New Museum's "Next Generation Party."
friend
of Sirius XM Radio
Jeff Zucker of NBC
Matthew Blank of Showtime
Jason Kilar of Hulu
Joe Kernen of CNBCÕs "Squawk Box"
Alec Baldwin presenting Jeff Zucker with the Ross Humanitarian Award
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Kickoff Party at E-Braun for the 2009 Hampton Designer Showhouse.
friends
Overview of Frank Lloyd Wright Foundation’s Benefit Dinner at the Guggenheim
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
ARF's annual Come
Stay Cocktail event.
Beverly Leopold with Perry
Ellen Delsener with Teddy
friends
Debby Padovano with Poe
friends friends
furry friends
Linda Barone with Ginger
Maralyn Rittenour with Sophy
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at Patrick McMullan Company's Group Show at Bo Concept.
Steuben glass lion
Don Marron with friends
friends
friends
Clockwise from above: Marc Rosen
emeritus of the Fragrance Foundation Annette Green
actress Jane Powell.
Pratt Board of Trustees Chair
Pratt Chair of Graduate Communications Design
of the National Academy of Recording Arts
of Atlantic Records
Executive Vice of Warner Music Group
of Sony Music Entertainment
Sway Calloway of MTV
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The classic 1932 schooner
sails into the American Yacht Club harbor.
of Mystic Seaport
of Rye
Sarah Cecil of maine
Andrew &amp
Iana dos Reis Nunes
Iana dos Reis Nunes
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Children playing at Cocktails in Candyland at Dylan's Candy Bar for the Association to Benefit Children.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Chefs at Street &amp
a Global Street Food Festival for the Benefit of Citymeals-on-Wheels.
Street &amp
Savory guests
Chairperson of the Event
Restaurateur of
partner of Jean Georges
Joe Cohen at The DessertTruck
Rafael Soler of Soler Dominican truck
team at station
Van Leeuwan Ice Cream truck
Roy Choi at Kogi station
The Treats Truck offering up some treats ...
Jacques d'Amboise
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Moonlight in Venice.
Karlheinz &amp
Elizabeth of Bavaria
Helene de Pourtales at Palazzo Grimani
Princess Michael of Kent
Toto Bergamo Rossi at Fondazione Querini Stampalia
Chairman of Venetian Heritage
Laurie Dhue at Palazzo Grimani
Art at "La Malcontenta"
Sybile of Luxembourg
Basilica of St. Anthony
Interior of Basilica
Restored artifact in chapel
had been painted black during the war
Toto Bergamo Rossi in Chapel of St. Anthony
One of the restored marble wall panels in the chapel
Acqua Alta in St. Mark's Square
La Punta della Dogana
Altar at Church of San Salvador
being restored
Princess Michael of Kent
Gary Parr at Palazzo Curti Valmarana
Hilary Geary Ross at La Punta della Dogana
Julian Farrow of Jet Republic
Comte Eric d'Hauteville
Villa Pisani in Strà
Cocktails at Villa Pisani
Dinner at Villa Pisani
Villa Pisani draped in purple
The gang after dinner
Pavlos of Greece
Patricia d
Sylvia d
Sylvie d'Arenberg
Safia al Rashid
Pierre d
Sylvie d
Dancing the night away
William J. vanden Heuvel
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Children's parade at the 12th Annual International Polo Challenge in Pine Plains
Tim King announcing the game
Stomping divots
Passing storm clouds
daughter Alana with Edwina Hunt
daughter Isabel
friend
U.S. Secretary of Education Arne Duncan addresses the guests
U.S. Secretary of Education Arne Duncan
Rosie O’Donnell with Rosie’s Broadway Kids
Chancellor of the City University of New York
Rosie’s Broadway Kids
U.S. Secretary of Education Arne Duncan
Adam Brecht enjoys
Intense Competition as Heathcote battles Airstream
Heathcote players
Airstream players
Jeff Koons sculpture outside Brant Art Study Fndn at Greenwich Polo Club
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Michael Bloomberg with Greater New York Girl Scouts.
Clockwise from above: Luigi Tadini
The Monaco terrace at the Better World Awards 2009 party
friend
French models
Samatha with Julian Lennon
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Four Season's staff at its 50th anniversary gala event.
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
After the medal presentation at the Battery Conservancy’s 14th Annual Spring Gala.
table
vice chairman of Sotheby's
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Consul of France Guy Yelda
Cultural Counselor of the French Embassy Kareen Rispal
of France To The U.S. Pierre Vimont
-Director of The Louvre Henri Loyrette
Chairman of AFL Christopher Forbes
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dancers from the National Dance Institute at Jeffrey Modell Foundation Spring Ahead Gala 2009.
Expert Physicians from 6 continents
The Bornheimer Family with Vicki Modell
Bob Posch with Ruth Gottesman
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
from left
Co-chair Christina Floyd
Clifford the Big Red Dog
Co-chair Abigail Lash
LeeLee Keevil with Clifford the Big Red Dog
Co-chair Abigail Lash
Austin Shapard with daughters
Hattie with
Lucy with Clifford the Big Red Dog
from left
mom Lydia
little sister
learn how to properly approach Ash the Border Collie
veterinarian at The Animal Medical Center in Manhattan
teaches Sanika Hajare
center
her sister
of Queens
how to make friends with Ash the Border Collie
Jordyn Ferrandino of Astoria learns how to play nice with Tequila the Chihuahua
NYPD Transit K9 Unit Officer with K9
right
daughter of Junior Committee member Alieda Keevil
Walker Moore with Clifford the Big Red Dog
Willie Nelson performing
Long time supporter
Joyce Dinkins with Children’s Health Fund’s Dennis Johnson
The panel.
Students of SAB
Doria de la Chapelle
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The reception line at The Conservatory Ball at The New York Botanical Garden.
sFrederic de Narp
friend
sTina Outy
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
honorees Jerry Seinfeld
Sports honoree Joe Namath is welcomed aboard by Foundation Board members Gene Bay
his wife Candice Bergen.
honorees Emilio
Gloria Estefan ride the ferry to Ellis Island.
Science/Medicine honoree Eric R. Kandel
his wife Denise in the Great Hall.
Host Candice Bergen welcomes invited guests
museum visitors to the Family Heritage Awards.
Sports honoree Joe Namath speaks about his Hungarian “Janos” who came through Ellis Island at age 11 in 1920.
Science/Medicine honoree Eric R. Kandel shares his memories of living in Vienna under the Nazis before leaving for the United States in 1939.
Broadway’s Liz Calloway sings “God Bless America.”
Assistant Secretary of the Interior for Fish
present Entertainment honoree Jerry Seinfeld with his grand ’s 1910 manifest.
Cuban-born Emilio
Gloria Estefan receive the B.C. Forbes Peopling of America Award from Assistant Secretary Thomas L. Strickland
Robert Forbes. The award is sponsored by the Forbes Family in honor of family patriarch B.C. “Bertie” Forbes
who immigrated to America from Scotland in 1904.
Greeting one another on stage are honorees Jerry Seinfeld
Sports honoree “Broadway Joe” Namath autographs ferry tickets for his young fans.
Bianna Golodryga with Grover
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Veuve Clicquot Manhattan Polo Classic benefiting American Friends of Sentebale.
Prince Seeiso of Lesotho
Princess Alexandra of Greece
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Renee Rockefeller enters The Abby Aldrich Rockefeller Sculpture Garden at the Museum of Modern Art's annual Party in the Garden.
Estelle performs
A lucky man in uniform/div&gt;
friend
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
French American Aid for Children honored Renaud Dutreil
Chairman of LVMH Moet Hennessy Louis Vuitton at their 68th Annual Bal des Berceaux at the Plaza.
On the Doubles dance floor.
Anne-France de la Mothe Karoubi
cavaliers.
Debutantes group portrait: Faustine Dutreil
friend
Carolina Palermo Schulze wind the raffle
andrea H
keiko aoki Keiko Aoki
Hiroshi Kimura dr hiroshi kimura
Anne-France de la Mothe Karoubi
Emilie Jackson Jr.and Warren Renneisen
More afterparty guests
helping with the live auction
Jean-Jacques De Saint-andrieu
Selby Drummond announces the raffle winner
Julia Flatto with afterparty guests
Post Deb Hanna Lundqvist with after party guests
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Guests enjoying the Fifth Avenue Garden as The Fellows
Young Fellows of the Frick Collection held their annual Spring party.
A jazz quartet out in the Fifth Avenue Garden
Francois Poulet with Frick Director Anne L. Poulet
guest
dancers band
the band
Guests enjoyed strolling through all of the galleries of The Frick Collection
including the West Gallery
Joe McGlynn dance to a jazz quartet on the steps in the Fifth Avenue Garden
Cator Sparks on the dancefloor
Zubin Mehta dances with Annika Connor
Andrew Jones in the Garden Court
Maggie Klarberg in the Music Room
the Frick's Lynne Rutkin
and Leonard Lopate of WNYC
the Frick's Associate Director
Frederick Mwangaguhunga enjoy the Garden Court
Elisabeth Saint-Amand in the Fifth Avenue Garden
Annika Connor in the Music Room listening to George Gee
his Jump Jivin' Wailers
guests enjoy the Fifth Avenue Garden
Jonathan Knight Sturges in the Music Room
Darlene Jordan with tennis great John McEnroe
CBS anchor Charles Osgood
WFUV station manager Ralph Jennings
PBS anchor Jim Lehrer
Fordham University Board of Trustees John Tognino
WFUV deejay Claudia Marshall with Jonatha Brooke
Jill Sobule with WFUV Music Director Rita Houston
Gala Chair Jill Welter with Clare Sheridan
emcee Dennis Elsas
husband Phil
PBS host Jim Lehrer with CBS anchor Charles Osgood
Lynda Shenkman Curtis with Brian Elder
WFUV host Vin Scelsa
WFUV morning host Claudia Marshall
WFUV Board Larry Taylor with WFUV Board John A. Herrmann
Artists from The Chamber Music Society of Lincoln Center
The Grand Ballroom at The Plaza Hotel
and Amanda Young Shortall
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Susan Haspel at the National Audubon Society's Women in Conservation Rachel Carson Awards luncheon.
The ial Suite of The St. Regis New York
designed by Richard Mishaan.
Philippe le Mevel
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Metropolitan Opera House at Lincoln Center was the setting for American Ballet Theatre's annual Spring Gala
sponsored by Carolina Herrera
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
NYCB dancers
guests dancing the night away under the Swarovski Crystal chandelier.
The Promenade of the David H. Koch Theater.
Event chairwoman
Event chairwoman
NYCB Principal Dancer Maria Kowroski in dress of his design
all dressed by Bibhu Mohapatra
NYCB Principal Dancer Janie Taylor in Monique Lhuillier
NYCB Ballet Master in Chief Peter Martins
Principal Dancer Darci Kistler with Charlotte Moss
with NYCB Ballet Master in Chief Peter Martins
NYCB Ballet Master in Chief Peter Martins
Roland Guerrero performing
former United States cultural attaché in Tokyo
artist Wenda Gu
chairman of board
director of Queens Museum of Art
New York City Commissioner of Cultural Affairs Kate Levin
chairman of
co-founder of Storm King Art Center
artist Leonard Ursachi
director of
curator of Storm King Art Center
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
350 guests partied late into the night with music from DJ Tom Finn.
The Grand Ballroom was transformed with beautiful décor by Andrew Pascoe.
of The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center
Sotheby’s Vice-Chairman
member of The Society’s Board of Directors
Guests dancing to Macy Gray’s hit single “I Try”
Luke Watkins enjoying the game in the Empire Suite.
WPIX 11 anchor Jim Watkins his wife Lauren
son Liam with Met.
Mets' catcher Ramon Santos
SNY's Kevin Burkhart
Former Mets pitching legend Johnny Franco
Clockwise from top left: David Katz
daughter Jessica
Met with kiddies
Met greets Lauren
wife May
Megan Kopf with friends
colleagues
Tim Gunn presenting to Kay Unger
Ann Curry presenting to Hoda Kotb
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Waltzing with the Orchestra of St. Luke's
conducted by Damon Gupton
in the Grand Ballroom at The Plaza.
MD Chief of Pain
of The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center
Chairman Department of Psychiatry
Members of
friends of
Former for The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering
Vice for The Society of Memorial Sloan-Kettering
All Stars youth performers
Howard Teich with youth from the Ramaz School
the All Stars Project
Back row
l. to r.: James Capalino
Robert Ross. Front row
l. to r.: Jacqueline Ross
John Singer presenting $1
000 check to youth of All Stars Project
friend
Yo-Yo Ma performs ...
representing event honoree The Mary Flagler Cary Charitable Trust
St. Luke's Marianne Lockwood
Representatives from the evening's honoree
M&amp;T Bank including John Chiti
Mezzo-soprano Susan Graham presents St. Luke's Gift of Music award to Ben Needell
event co-chair
New York City Department of Cultural Affairs Kate Levin
John F. Cook accepts St. Luke's Gift of Music award on behalf of M&amp;T Bank
Guest violinist Joshua Bell
event co-chair Carol B. Grossman
Princess Grace Foundation Players Club Party guests
Tocarra Cash --- all Princess Grace Award winners
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dinner in Four Season's Pool Room for the Cancer Research Institute's 27th Annual “Through the Kitchen” dinner
auction benefit.
Lincoln Center celebrates 50 years.
Horn section outside Alice Tully.
Lisa Schiff arrive.
The gathering in the lobby of Alice Tully Hall.
The breakfast.
The cake.
Manager of the Metropolitan Opera
Managing Director of Credit Suisse
Managing Director of the David H. Koch Theater at Lincoln Center
Board of Film Society
Film Society of Lincoln Center's program director
Chairman of the New York Philharmonic
of Lincoln Center for the Performing Arts
Executive Producer of Lincoln Center Theater
School of American Ballet
retired manager of the New York Philharmonic
Four Seasons staff
Prince Dimitri of Yugolslavia
Clockwise from top left: Isaac Mizrahi
of NARAL Pro-Choice New York
the National Institute for Reproductive Health
students
Best Performance by a Featured Actor in a Musical
Shrek the Musical
Best Performance by a Leading Actor in a Musical
Brian dArcy James
Shrek the Musical
Brian d'Arcy James
Shrek the Musical
Partial cast from Hair
Angela Lansbury will make Tony Awards history if she lands a Best Featured Actress prize - she'll tie Julie Harris for the most acting awards
Best Performance by a Leading Actor in a Play
Exit the King
Joe Turner's Come
Next to Normal
Best Performance by a Featured Actor in a Play
Waiting for Godot
Best Performance by a Leading Actress in a Musical
Shrek the Musical
Rock of Ages
Brian d'Arcy James
Shrek the Musical
God of Carnage
Next to Normal
9 to 5
Speed-the-Plow
Hunt Slonem with New York Junior League Volunteers at his studio
Jeffrey Slonim at Hunt Slonem's Studio
Anthony Baratta with designer Kristen McGinnis
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dinner in the Pierre Ballroom celebrating New York Pops 26th Birthday Gala.
Princess Alexandra of Greece
New York City Opera’s Spring Luncheon at the Mandarin Oriental Hotel.
friend
Moderator Adam Gopnik with panelists Chris Van Allsburg
moderator Adam Gopnik
panelist Salman Rushdie
moderator Adam Gopnik
Library Trustee Annette de la Renta
panelist Chris Van Allsburg signing a book for a guest
Mahnaz Ispahani with Anna Marie Shapiro
The Ronald McDonald House kids
Pops Concert is Sold Out!
Steven Reineke with gala concert host Liz Smith
Brian d'Arcy James
Chairman of The New York Pops
Sara Caswell taking a bow
Steven Reineke with New York Pops Kids
Guests wearing hair design by Edisa Weeks
friend
Assembly member Daniel O'Donnell
of Pearson Arts &amp
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Kate Bosworth at the Costume Institute Ball's "The Model As Muse" at The Metropolitan Museum of Art.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Paz de la Huerta
and Cindy and
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Gregory Long addresses the guests at The New York Botanical Garden's Antique Garden Furniture Show Preview Party &amp
friends.
Young Orpheus chair
friend
Sarah Leibowitz on piano with Julia Lichten on cello.
Chariman of the Board
both Gala committee members
friends
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Fund for Park Avenue’s 60
000 Orange Tulips Celebrated at Scully &amp
Clockwise from above: Betty Scott
Chippy Irvine as John Soane
Jaque Robertson welcomed to the stage by Bob Stern
Tom Wolfe greeted by Jaque Robertson
Publicolor students
Clinical of Pediatrics
Morehouse School of Medicine
Chairman of the Board
Allen &amp
of
of CASA as of May 1
Helena Martinez’s table
Muffie Potter Aston’s table
Polly Sheehan’s table
Mary Davidson’s table
Gay Hackett’s Table
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
his wife
his wife
his wife
of Luis Vuitton
V&amp;H
with his wife
Philharmonic board Member William J. McDonough
his wife
his wife
Philharmonic Board member Lizabeth Newman
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Lunch in the Milstein Hall of Ocean Life at the 19th Annual Spring Environmental Lecture
Panel discussion with Lynn Sher
The guests listening to the panel discussion in the LeFrak IMAX Theater.
moderator Lynn Sherr
and panelists Sloan Barnett
moderator Lynn Sherr with panelists Sloan Barnett
Catherine Sidamon-Eristoff with panelist James Gustave Speth
friends
friends
The scene at Hudson Terrace
friends
Rachael Ray with City Harvest Drivers.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
NY-Presbyterian/Weill Cornell Neurosurgery Team at NewYork-Presbyterian Hospital’s annual black-tie gala at the Waldorf Astoria.
tables.
Audrey del Rosario with Pardes
Philip Stieg with Nick
Steve Corwin with Herbert Pardes
Robert Solomon with
and Robert Solomon
Enjoying the evening
Sy Sternberg with Shelly
and Henry Spotnitz
Anita Gotto with
beau
Jim Libby under a still life by Severin Roesen
the Real Housewives of New Jersey
Tracy Stern with Tea Models
Marie von Thurn und Taxis
Jewish Women’s Foundation of New York's Annual Benefit Luncheon at The Pierre hotel
Marlene Strauss getting their awards from Paula Zahn
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Ballet Hispanico Company performs at its Black Slipper Ball.
Dancing early
but strong
Whoopi Goldberg's kicks
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Curtain Call at BAM for the opening night of Merce Cunningham's “Nearly Ninety."
Andrew &amp
Vice of the Board
Senior Partner at Weil
Gotshal &amp
JBFCS Trustee serves as Secretary of the Board
Senior Partner at Weil
Gotshal &amp
Deputy Chairman of Lazard Asset Management
Senior Partner at Weil
Gotshal &amp
Deputy Chairman of Lazard Asset Management
children Hillary
Director of Communications
Director of Development &amp
Associate Executive Director of External Affairs
Guest at the gala dinner
Senior Partner at Weil
Gotshal &amp
JBFCS Trustee serves as Secretary of the Board
wife Lisa
children Jesse
JBFCS Director of Communications
wife Sandra
Senior Partner at Weil
Gotshal &amp
husband Mark
daughter Elizabeth
retired JBFCS Executive Vice
Senior Partner at Weil
Gotshal &amp
wife Sherry
wife Ethel
UJA Senior Vice for Agency
JBFCS Chair of the Board
Gotshal &amp
David Holland with more furry friends
Bloomingdale’s Spring/Summer 2009 Fashion Presentation
Princess Firyal of Jordan
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Junior Committee members Lauren Remington Platt
Lake Bell at a reception at Gracie mansion to build awareness for Solar One and its June 2nd "Revelry by the River" Gala.
Hartley duPont
Hartley duPont
Deputy Consul of Switzerland
Daniel Haener with his wife
friend
Victoria Lindgren in front of his table
dedicated to Elizabeth Taylor.
and Ingrid Edelman
Margo Langenberg with the honorees.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
300 Young Peoples' Chorus of New York City choristers entertain guests at the Rose Theater.
friend
Board Members of the Franklin D. Roosevelt Four Freedoms Park
William J. vanden Heuvel
Dean of School of Design at UPenn
William J. vanden Heuvel
Director of Arthur Ross Gallery at UPenn
William J. vanden Heuvel
gala performers: jazz greats Toshiko Akiyoshi
from the B-52s Kate Pierson
YPC gala guests in the Allen Room.
presents
Motoasu Sakurai with the YPC Humanitarian Award
Co-chairs Suzan Kremer
Francisco J. Núñez with Adam Chin
his daughter
chorister Hannah Chinn looks on
YPC artistic advisor Linda Golding
Ted Zagat The Consul of Israel in NY Asaf Shariv
The Consul of Israel in NY Asaf Shariv
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at Hiro for Paper Magazine's 12th Annual Beautiful People Issue.
Jay with Mickey Boardman
James Naughton singing "Stress"
Donna Murphy singing "I Happen to Like New York"
Lin-Manuel Miranda accepting his award from Sheldon Harnick
Lin-Manuel Miranda accepting his award
Marcia Santoni enjoying the show
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
friends at the Benefit Performance for EQUALITY NOW: RUINED at NY City Center Stage 1.
family
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Society of Memorial Sloan Kettering Senior Associate Luncheon at The Oak Room
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Kit Powers fast asleep at an opening celebration of "KKK" at Mary Boone Gallery
which features the works of Terence Koh
"To be titled"
The scene at Mary Boone Gallery
gang taking part in "To be titled"
Kai Kuhne's dog
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at the Henry Street Settlement's 2009 Dinner Dance at The Plaza.
Tatiana von Furstenberg amd Diane von Furstenberg
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
On stage for the annual Dressed to Kilt event at M2.
A vid courtesy of JH of many of the evening's models...
Brian d'Arcy James
aka Obama Girl
Geoffrey Carroll closes out the show
and Michele and
Donna d'Cruz
Dancing with the Stars' Alec Mazo
their son
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
DIFFA Launches the 2009 DINING BY DESIGN National Tour.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Maggie Betts celebrates her birthday at AMNH's Museum Days Dance 2009.
Dinner in the Powerhouse.
Dessert in
Dancing in
Chairman of the Museum's Board of Trustees Lewis Bernard
The scene at Social Primer.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The LGBT Community Center's Annual Dinner at the Hammerstein Ballroom.
and Annabel Vartanian
Jake the Dog
Marisa Tomenson with Napoleon
Avner Dorman with PercaDu
the mystery woman
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Catherine Malandrino hosted a soiree to celebrate the new season of “Make Me a Supermodel.”
friend
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
William Ivey Long at SCAD Style Etoile Awards.
the Sadoves
Michael Bloomberg presenting Steve Sadove with award
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Looking up in the Guggenheim Museum for The Cinema Society's screening of “The International.”
Princess Alexandra of Greece
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene inside the Celeste Bartos Forum for the NYPL 2009 Young Lions Fiction Award.
his debut novel
Award co-founder Hannah McFarland
a co-chair of the Young Lions
Ethan Hawke read excerpts from nominated books
Young Lions Committee member Amanda McCormick Bacal
husband Matthew Bacal
Finalist Jon Fasman goes over his book with Billy Crudup
Winner Salvatore Scibona with judges Andre Aciman
Ethan Hawke with this year’s award judges Lore Segal
Salvatore Scibona signs book for a fan
Literary agent Richard Abate
Prince with
Princess with
Library Paul LeClerc gives tour to Prince Felipe
Chief Librarian of the Dorot Jewish Division Michael Terry shows the Prince
Paul LeClerc &amp
Judith Ginsberg rare items from the collection
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Stan Herman at CFDA Awards Nominee Announcement cocktail party hosted by Swarovski at the Rooftop Gardens at Rockefeller Center.
friend
CFDA Awards Nominee Announcement cocktail party hosted by Swarovski at the Rooftop Gardens at Rockefeller Center.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Paul Taylor Dance Company members Christina Markham
Madelyn Ho at the Paul Taylor Dance Company's 2009 New York Season Gala.
friends
Lynda hugs Cari Modine
Tom Harvey w/ Paul Wilmot in the background
friends
friend
Paul Taylor Dance Company member Michelle Fleet
former Paul Taylor Dance Company member Tom Patrick
Paul Taylor Dance Company member Sean Mahoney
Paul Taylor Dance Company member Parisa Khobdeh
Paul Taylor Dance Company members Robert Kleinendorst
Paul Taylor Dance Company members Julie Tice
Paul Taylor Dance Company member Jeffrey Smith
Paul Taylor Dance Company member Michael Trusnovec
Auction overview
friends
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Young Patrons Group of Save Venice held a benefit at Tod's that served as a kick-off for their upcoming March 27th annual Spring benefit at the Bowery Hotel.
Sotheby's Auctioneer Henry Howard-Sneyd
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Heather Mnuchin at the Director’s Council of the Museum of the City of New York's Winter Ball.
Leviev models
The Gypsy Queens from the French Riviera
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
students at the School of American Ballet's Winter Ball 2009 at the David H. Koch Theater
gang
"matter/light"
Curator Chavisa Woods with artist Itziar Barrio
Comissioner Kelly with Award Winners
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Pink Bunny décor by David Beahm at The Society of Memorial Sloan Kettering’s 18th Annual Bunny Hop at FAO Schwarz.
Making music on FAO Schwarz’s Big Piano
Gotham Taekwon-do
Clockwise from above: Event Co-Chairs
Kate Spade with daughter Bea
Mnuchin family.
Sherman Meloni with daughter Sophia
son Dante
of Papo d’Anjo
Mary Snow with daughter Annabelle
Paige Hardy with Tate
The Errico family
Muffie Potter Aston with her kids: Bracie
Clifford the Big Red Dog
Kids at Penelope Peapod activity station
Melania Trump with son Barron
son Harry
Gretchen Gunlocke Fenton with Carlyn Smith
Suzanne Ircha with son Brick
with daughter Allesandra
Rina Migliaccio with baby Hazel
Bunny Hop with Gregory Fowlkes
children Mimi
daughter Sophia
Marina Rust Connor with daughters Caroline
niece Cecilia
Raphael le Masne de Chermont
A Shanghai Tang Imperial Tailor fits Luigi Tadini
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The New York Botanical Garden Orchid Dinner at Rainbow Room.
From Artist Gregory Johnston's Passepartout exhibition
Collette the artist with John Wegorzewski
wife Daphne
Gus Mills with his wife
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Party at Roseland Ballroom.
Shugar the Dog
Emma the Dog
Michael the Dog
the Dog
Mel the Dog
the Dog
Mel the Dog
Willoughby the Dog
Emma the Dog
daughter
wife Maria
Benefit Committee co-chairs
Kipton Cronkite sitting in the back of a Porsche 911 Carrera 4S Cabriolet in front of Wally Findlay Galleries
Debutantes curtsy
Escorts curtsy
"Royal Coach" bringing "Kaiser Franz Joseph" to the Ball
Entrance procession of 2009 Debutantes
escorts
Horses roam the hallway of the Waldorf =Astoria on their way to the 2009 Viennese Opera Ball
dressed to the “nines”
West Point Cadet escorts USA Crystle Stewart
Heller with H.E. Thomas Mayr-Harting
Pres of the US-Austrian Chamber of Commerce
Chairman of the VOB Executive Committee
Marcie Rudell with Hedi Herz
Guests at the Tanz Bar after-party
Kate Lindsey as Prince Orlofsky welcomes guest to the Ball
Casino Royal at the “Tanz Bar” afterparty
Ines de la Fressange
Ines de la Fressange
friends
Ines de la Fressange
Anne de la Gueronniere
Nikki Breedlove and
Liz Dussault and
Chris George presenting prize from Steuben Glass to Emily Berger
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Olivia Chantecaille at Calvin Klein's Women's Fall 2009 collection.
Blake Lively watches with intent
The collection
Clockwise from top left: Dylan Lauren
Ralph Lauren waves to the crowd
models
Clockwise from top left: Janice Combs
Paz de la Huerta
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Marc Jacobs Fall 2009 Collection at the NY State Armory.
and Ari Marcopoulos
A big Betsey fan
Michael Bastian w/ Model Backstage
model
model
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Front Row at the annual Heart Truth’s Red Dress Collection show at The Tents in Bryant Park.
guest
Adam Levin with NYCB dancers Tyler Angle
the 2009 Janice Levin Dancer Honoree
Sharon Jacob with students from the School of American Ballet
with her daughter Kimberly Tighe
with students from the School of American Ballet
Donya Bommer bids on the live auction for a private ballet class led by NYCB Principal Dancer Darci Kistler
Front row with Diane Striar
friends
Front row with Patty Sprague
friends
Inside the Graff boutique
Eduard E. van der Geest
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Outside Elaine's for Interview Magazine's 20th anniversary party for Patrick McMullan.
friend
Committee member Kathryn Tucker
her daughter making a perfect Valentine.
Cubs take action
meet their favorite puppets from the afternoon’s show.
Families enjoy making valentines for a special someone
Guests dive into the crafting fun
Committee member Kimbrough Towles
her son design their own Crewcuts book plate
Cubs learn the art of making paper by hand
Moms daughters
their daughters
her son entranced by the puppet show performance at the party
Billy Crudup helps his son sign up for a Library Card
Cubs Committee Co-chair Gretchen Rubin
her daughter enjoy coloring at the Crewcuts craft station
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
At The Angel Orensanz Foundation for WET presents LOVE
a benefit to support its 10th season.
Evidence board members
dancers
Evidence dancers
Evidence Board members
Mickey Wechsler on her 99th birthday
Happy 99th birthday
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Students at The Lycee Francais de New York's 10th annual Gala.
Sigrid vanEck
Danielle deBenedictis
Danielle deBenedictis
of The Women's Board
friend
son Levasseur
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Karole Armitage at Armitage Gone! Dance Think Punk! Gala at Capitale.
dancers
friend
friend
friend
Tashi Chodron with friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Drama League Directors Project's 25th anniversary at the Rainbow Room.
Cast of Hair
Cast of Will Roger’s Follies
Lola del
Julio del
Jamie deRoy
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
von Simson Families at a family bowling party to benefit children’s health services at NYU Langone Medical Center.
Chris Geslin with Trudy Elbaum Gottesman
Frances Bordoni with Achi
Antonio Pierce with Sammy Arthur
wife
former Judge Sol Wachtler
daughter
Yankee Hall of Famer
singer
who performed for the crowd
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Jr. at RIVERKEEPER's Art Auction to Raise Funds for Water Protection.
A toast for the Birthday Girl — Marilyn Horne Guare.
Ann Ziff with baritone Dmitri Hvorostovsky
Mercedes Bass with playwright John Guare
Marie Nugent Head cheer on long-time friend
Rita Hauser with Richard Debs
Bass-baritone James Morris with CAMI’s Matthew Epstein
Martin Katz with Marilyn
Sheldon Harnick with William Bolcom
friend
Alfred Hubay’s guests: Mary Kirk
Thomas Quasthoff with Marilyn
Cynthia Gunn with Marilyn
Marilyn with David Boren
Evelyn Lear with baritone Lester Lynch
Frederica von Stade with Joe Volpe
Evidence founder &amp
artistic director Ronald K. Brown
Evidence dancers Otis Donovan Herring
Grace in Winter Gala Committee
friends
avier Evans
Evidence vice chair Neil R. Lowe
Board member Joanne Hill
Uptown publisher Jocelyn Taylor
Chairman of the Board
Principal dancer
Evidence executive director
Guests celebrating at the home of David
Atlantic Media Chairman David Bradley toasts Gwen Ifill
Gwen Ifill signing books for guests
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Adrienne bon Haes
Gettin' Down on the Dance Floor Southampton Inn Inaugural Ball
WLIU's Bonnie Grice
newly elected Town Councilwoman Sally Pope
Gala chairs Grania
Omar Gould chats with Lucius Ware
wife Dede Gotthelf Moan
Shinnecock Elder Elizabeth Thunderbird Haile with Committee Chair Gordon Herr
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
An antique show regular
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Women's Committee of the Central Park Conservancy took to the ice on Tuesday night for their annual skating party honoring the Playground Partners
Patrons of the Women's Committee.
Paz de la Huerta
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dinner at New York City Opera's Antony
Cleopatra Winter Gala at Carnegie Hall.
Princess Alexandra of Greece
Susan Baker with friends
Princess Alexandra of Greece
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Grace Gomez-Brea at the kick off for the 55th Annual Winter Antiques Show Young Collector's Night.
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Jeremiah Avila at the 2009 FSF Geoffrey Beene Fashion Scholarship Dinner at the Marriot Marquis.
friend
friends
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The debutantes at the 54th Anniversary of the International Debutante Ball
dinner dance in the Grand Ballroom of the Waldorf-Astoria.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Mary Alice Stephensen with students at Free Arts
NYC Day at the Little Sisters Family Health Service in East Harlem.
Roberto Cavalli amongst friends
students
Susan Shin during the jewelry raffle
Mimi So jewels
Veuve Cliquot champagne kept the guests busy
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Santa with children at Doubles.
Wendy Carduner with Santa
The Rappaports with Santa
Hunter Dean of Nursing
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
CVZ Contemporary's "Theory of Wants" by Ohad Maiman at Milk Gallery.
Cindy Adams with Juicy
Laurie Tisch with her daughter Carolyn Sussman
Israeli to the U.N. Gabriella Shalev
Consul of Israel in New York Asaf Shariv
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
her family at New York City Ballet
The School of American Ballet's The Nutcracker Family Benefit.
Gingerbread houses decorated each table.
her children with a toy soldier from The Nutcracker
Julia Koch with children from the production
her daughter with dancer Erica Pereira
the Sugarplum Fairy
her daughter
The littlest fans of The Nutcracker await an autograph from a dancer
Dewdrop with Donya Bommer
Chris Cuomo with their daughter
friends
Young supporters
friend
friend
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Mary Lynn Wolfe at New York City’s Hospital for Special Surgery’s dinner to benefit medical education.
his fiancé Kathryn Tomberlin along with Dines' parents
his wife Karen
her husband Bruce Cronstein
his wife Helene Pavlov
his Marcia Mintz
surgeon-in-chief at Hospital for Special Surgery
Broadway performer KT Sullivan
s Mary
surgeon-in-chief at Hospital for Special Surgery
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Christmas scene at Doubles.
friend
friends
Pretty in White
friends
friend
William J. vanden Heuvel
William J. vanden Heuvel
Willam J. vanden Heuvel
William J. vanden Heuvel
Consul of The Republic of Poland Krzysztof W. Kasprzyk
The Republic of Poland Krzysztof W Kasprsyk
Consul of The Republic of Poland Krzysztof W. Kasprzyk
husband Sven Oehme
Consul of The Republic of Poland Krzysztof W. Kasprzyk
YPLC Steering Committee members Cari Widmyer
dinner host June Wu
YPLC Steering Committee members Alvin Crawford
YPLC member Jonathan Schorr
Fashion designer
this year's Young Patrons Arts Leadership Award recipient Zac Posen with Allison Aston
YPLC Steering Committee member Courtenay Burley with Dov Barnett
Margaret Betts with Eliza Lipsky-Karasz
YPLC member Paul Sa
YPLC Steering Committee members Courtenay Burley
YPLC Steering Committee member April Thibeault
Dinner host June Wu
YPLC members Paul
YPLC Steering Committee member Alvin Crawford
Fashion designer Zac Posen pays tribute to the dinner hosts
The staff of the 6 Columbus
Blue Ribbon Sushi as the dinner portion of the evening comes to a close
YPLC Steering Committee member Kara Medoff Barnett with Emily Finkelstein
dinner host Jessica Betts
YPLC Steering Committee member Courtenay Burley with musicologist Rob Kapilow
the of HSBC Bank
the executive director of New York Cares
a New York Cares volunteer;
a partner in Sidley Austin's New York office
a member of the firm's Management
Executive committees.
Anton Levy with friends
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The dinner scene at 7 World Trade Center for The MacDowell Colony's evening in honor of Jane Alexander.
playwright Tina Howe
The Yale Baker's Dozen performing
Constantino Castellano as Santa with the Yale Baker's Dozen
the Yale Baker's Dozen
The Hendersons with Christopher Hyland
Constantino Castellano as Santa
Christopher Hyland delivering the birthday cake
R. Stewart Ewing with Alana Henderson
Maria Eugenia with Ricardo Arias
wife Maraquel
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The New York Botanical Garden's Enid A. Haupt Conservatory.
A model of the Enid A. Haupt Conservatory
friend
Maria Eugenia with Ricardo Arias
wife Maraquel
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Co-chairs Zachary Pomerantz
Co-chairs Michael T. M. Jones
Dana Wallach Jones with friend
friend
Steering Committee Member Krishna Nadella with friends
Adie Kreigstein with a friend
Steering Committee member Julia Blankhertz
friend
Climate Change exhibition
friends
Avi Barak witha friend
friends
friend
The scene at Touch.
On the runway
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Parrish Art Museum's annual Parrish Presents Holiday Bazaar.
David deForest Keys
tephan Fowlkes
Hans Boujaran with sister Azar Boujaran
Terrie Sultan with Phyllis Sultan
her dad Marc
friend
friend
Jonathan Capehart with his Margaret
David Friend of Vanity Fair
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Clarke Murphy with Katie von Strasser
his wife Barbara
NYCB dancers Megan Fairchild
who appeared as part of the evening's performance
Rachel Roy with Al Roker
NYCB dancer Maria Kowroski
friends
friends
Roger Daltry rocking out ...
Classical Action founder Charles Hamlen
musical director Rob Bowman
musician Kevin Thompson
Piano prodigy Devin Plumb
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Queen Silvia of Sweden
His Excellency Miguel d’Escoto Brockmann
Queen Silvia of Sweden
Mario performs
wife Susan
Queen Silvia of Sweden
friend
Princess Madeline of Sweden
Queen Silvia of Sweden
Queen Silvia of Sweden
Princess Madeline of Sweden
Michael R. Bloomberg receives the Sport of the City Award - a pair of NIKE sneakers presented by a student from Casita Maria
Senator Hillary Rodham Clinton with students from Esperanza Preparatory Academy in Harlem
RISF honoree
receiving the Environmental Steward Award
Garth Fagan dancers.
Master of Ceremonies Maurice DuBois
Garth Fagan dancers
fans
Garth Fagan dancing with guest
Deborah Norville presenting Woman of Distinction award
2008 Girl Scout Future Woman of Distinction Irene O'Hare
her children
The scene at the Guggenheim
friend
Gloria von Thurn und Taxis
Gloria von Thurn und Taxis
Adam Gopnik with his children
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
CCBF s James Bussel
holding football signed by Tiki Barber
friend
friend
and Peggy Siegal
son
friend
son
Donald Fagen of Steely Dan
Monica Knoll founder of CANCER101
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
resident Paula S. Wallace accepting the Vision Award.
Women in Design Panel audience.
Paula S. Wallace with SCAD students
partygoers
Brooke Shields with Cookie publisher Carolyn Kremins
her daughter
daughter
Brooke Shields' daughter
The Young Leadership Committee at the Jewish Children’s Museum
Hip-hop violinist Miri Ben-Ari
boxer Dimitry Salita
Marcia Robbins-Wilf presents a check for $10
000 to the JCM
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Peter DiCapua at Fountain Gallery's 7th Annual Celebration of Life.
Fountain Gallery artist Leonard Aschenbrand
Fountain House board member Lynn Nicholas
Fountain Gallery artist Jonathan Glass
Fountain House board chair Alexandra Herzan
Fountain Gallery artist Deborah Standard
Sandra Miller of Con Edison
ABC-7 News Anchor Bill Ritter with ABC's Rebecca Campbell
Joan's Legacy Board Member Tess Wachs with Carol Weisman
Wendy Levine with Joan's Legacy Board Members Raymond Chalme
Makeup Artist Laura Geller with Joan's Legacy Board Members Daisy Holmes
Joan's Legacy Executive Director Susan Mantel
Joan's Legacy Board Member Roxanne Donovan with NBC's Brian Williams
Joan's Legacy Development Director Gretchen McGarry with Genevieve LaBean
Joan's Legacy Founding Board Members Tom Scarangello
LL Cool J wrapping gifts at Wrap to Rap
Young people wrapping gifts
Christopher Mason serenading Mario with a song written especially in his honor. Here's a verse ... The truth is plain
dear little Mario
We’re quite alarmed for your career
Although you’re burning
yearning
mad to decorate
We think you better wait
‘cause everything you do we hate! You’ve odd ideas
dear little Mario
Although we all think you’re a prince
Your chosen future Plainly doesn’t suit ’ya
Although we are charmed
We’re very alarmed With your obsession with chintz! Click here for the song in its entirety.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Jr. Conservation Award Luncheon at The Rainbow Room.
friend
friend
Danny at the bar
mom Iris Blanc
The Gold family
First Prince of Western High
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dinner scene at CFDA/VOGUE Fashion Fund Awards.
Andre Leon Talley from the front
ALT from the back
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
hassenfeld Committee Co-chair
hassenfeld Committee Co-chair
Susan Block Casdin hassenfeld Committee Co-chair
hassenfeld Committee Co-chair
hassenfeld Committee Co-chair
hassenfeld Committee Co-chair
hassenfeld Committee Co-chair
hassenfeld Committee Co-chair
dean of
of NYU Langone Medical Center
hassenfeld Committee Co-chair
director of the NYU Cancer Institute
director of the NYU Cancer Institute
Elizabeth Raetz associate of Pediatrics at NYU Cancer Institute
director of the Pediatric Neuro-Oncology Program at NYU Cancer Institute
hassenfeld Advisory Board member
NYU Cancer Institute board member
former New York Knick
friends
Email address:
and Jim Davis
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dayle Haddon at the L’Oreal Legends Gala to benefit ovarian cancer research.
Email address:
Founder/Artistic Director of Ice Theatre of New York Moira North
co-chair Curtis McGraw Webster
skating champion Paul Wylie
honoree Nancy Kerrigan
honoree Joan Erdheim
co-chairs Margaret Rapetti
Derrick Delmore with Elizabeth McGraw Webster
Honorary Chair of the event
children
Performers at the Ice Theatre of New York's annual gala
JoAnna Mendl Shaw with friends
Peter Eurich with Ice Angel Award Recipient Joan Erdheim
Dinner in the Milstein Hall of Ocean life.
friend
Models modeling
Harry Stendhal with their girls
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
wife
Models wearing Max Mara
Karen LeFrak in front of The Corner Bookstore.
children
daughter
Clockwise from above: Former Senator Robert Kerrey
Email address:
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Norma Dana accepting HSNY award of excellence
HSNY Chairman of the Board Bobbie Margolis
The crowd at Deitch Projects for a private viewing of Kehinde Wiley’s “Down.”
friend
friend
friend
friend
The party ...
Janna Bullock with Dixie
friends
Karen LeFrak with some hot dogs
family with Superman
Mikel Witte with "Malcolm"
friend
Judge Couri Hay picks his winner for best costume
a Poodle with a poodle skirt
Email address:
Modeling GRAFF jewelry
and Donald
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
friends
friends
Beatriz de la Mora
friends
friends
friend
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click to order.
Email address:
friend
Bill Gallo of the Daily News
gala guest. Seated: Naomi Watts
WWO gala co-chairs Janet Kagan
Children from the National Dance Institute present an electrifying African dance performance
Performing artist Sasha Lazard
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Donna Karan hosted The Kageno Harambee Gala at the Stephan Weiss Studio.
William vanden Heuvel
Email address:
The Children’s Storefront Performance
Maggie Norris with model
friend
The fve honorees: Ann Cook
a vice at Planned Parenthood NYC;
director of the NYCLU’s Reproductive Rights Project
May Del Rio with performers from Circus Amok
Peer educators with the NYCLU’s Teen Health Initiative
benefit chair Sheila Lambert
C.H.A.S.E. for Life Executive Board Members Tim Beach
Chairman/Director of ER Services for The Bronx-St. Barnabas Hospital
Paddy the Penguin
Farley Boyle with Senator Joe
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Young Lions Disco Dance party in Astor Hall at 2008 Library Lions Benefit.
2008 Library Lions honorees: Edward Albee
Young Lions Dance co-chairs Nicholas Brown
friend
Email address:
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Outside the The Plaza for The Boys’ Club of New York's 60th Annual Fall Dance.
James Rigas presenting the Global Effects of Lung Cancer
Master of Ceremonies Sapna Parikh
friends
Boys’ Club member Darion Stevens
Boys’ Club boys
Sending a boy to camp
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Mather Zickel at The Cinema Society
Lancome's screening of Rachel Getting Married.
Pat Mitchell with Ken Brecher
Executive Director of Sundance Institute
playwright Moises Kaufman
friend
ALS patient Claire Tow
John McEnroe Sr. with John McEnroe
Hockey Hall of Famer Rod Gilbert
ALS patient Ray Donnelly
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The mix at Doubles for Roric Tobin’s 30th birthday party hosted by Geoffrey Bradfield.
Geoffrey from the back
Jerry aand Barbara Freundlich
Charlotte Moss with ABT Dancers
Fredrica Friedman with ABT Dancers
Jamee Gregory with ABT Dancers
The scene from above
Good enough to eat
wear
Cesare Paciotti greeting Glenda Bailey
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at The New York Women’s Foundation's first annual gala
Gala Co-chairs Joyce Haupt
Eugenie Niven andd Nicholas Goodman
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
John deNeufville
Development for The Paley Center for Media
actor Tony Roberts
John Hasse from the Smithsonian
of
of The Paley Center for Media
TV critic Jeffrey Lyons
Development for The Paley Center for Media
Curator for The Paley Center for Media
with film critic Jeffrey Lyons
who is going over this notes for his introduction
Original work by LeRoy Neiman of Toots Shor
of SnagFilms
with Ron Simon
Curator for the Paley Center for Media
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Library Cubs get in the Halloween Spirit with Harry from Cyberchase.
her crime fighting duo with Harry from Cyberchase
Michele Barakett with a sweet kitty cat
committee member Nancy Donahoe explore the Forbidden stacks with their trick or treaters
Jennifer Newstead enjoy the party with their brave dinosaur
charming bug
her favorite bumblebee
Orpheus Chamber Orchestra's Opening Night Concert.
friend
Cameron Bruekner with Laurie Brueckner
Christine Hong with a Young Orpheus member
friends
friend
Karen Ziemba singing
At the Prospect Park Ball: NYC Council Member Mathieu Eugene
friend
WCBS-TV anchor
the evening’s “Green” auctioneer
NYC Parks &amp
guest
Global of Chanel
The Frick Collection Autumn Dinner 2008: Guests enjoy the opportunity to dine among the masterpieces in the long West Gallery
which was Henry Clay Frick’s impressive private paintings gallery when he lived in the mansion.
Chairman of PLNYS
Irene Roosevelt Aitken greeting Francois Poulet
friend
Town &amp
Country's Sarah Medford
Director of the Phillips Collection
Heidi Rosenau with Bill Cunningham
Director Anne L. Poulet having just presented a silver commemorative salver from Tiffany
Company to Luca Crespi
son of honoree Countess Giuila Maria Mozzoni Crespi
wife of Giovanni Castellaneta
Italian to the United States
Bill Beekman with Dick Crozier
Lamin Periera dos Santos
guests with his Hot &amp
Auction winners with Eric Ripert
Clockwise from top left: Ron Ben-Israel Cakes
Black Tuna Salad Sandwich from Geisha
CH Apron by Nicole Miller
Proscuitto from A Voce
Desserts from Waldorf=Astoria.
City Harvest's Jilly Stephens
Clockwise from top left: 57 Restaurant at the Four Seasons
Billy's Bakery Cupcakes
Akhtar Nawab from Elettaria
Don Pham from Geisha
Stone Barns V8 from Blue Hill
Clockwise from top left: T Bar Steak &amp
House Cured Ham from Telepan.
Sipping Hot &amp
Cold Pina Coladas with Francois Payard
Clockwise from top left: Truffle Oil from da Rosario Organics
Smoked salmon salad from Aquavit
Smoked salmon salad from Aquavit
Tacos Al Pastor from Toloache.
Princess Gloria von Thurn und Taxis
American Museum of Natural History's Family Party Chairs
Vice Chairs. Bottom row: Joan Rex
Jessica Marinaccio. Middle row: Catherine Sidamon-Eristoff
of the Museum Ellen V. Futter
Rebecca Shalam. Top row: Lyss Stern
A United Hospital Fund Gala record-breaking crowd of more than 800 filled the Grand Ballroom at the Waldorf Astoria.
The First of the State of New York
Iris Cantor Women’s Health Center
Clinical Associate of Psychiatry NewYork-Presbyterian Hospital/Weill Cornell Medical Center
The Richard T. Silver Distinguished of Hematology
Attendees Dig for Dinosaurs.
children
Touch of Nature
Budding scientist examines shell
daughter
children
Goosebumps author R. L. Stein autographs books
Stiltwalker greets guests
children
Magic Al-Garber performs for children
past Hadrian Award recipients
The Lenox Hill Hospital Autumn Ball in the Grand Ballroom of the Waldorf Astoria.
of King’s College London
of the University of Minnesota
of the University of Minnesota
former provost
dean of faculties of Columbia University
emerita
member of NARSAD’s Board of Directors
Nobel laureate Paul Greengard of Rockefeller University
Catharine Duman of Yale University
Chair of HeartWatch Medical Advisory Board Chief
Division of Cardiology
Dept. of Medicine
founder of Hilliard Farber &amp
Dan Haupt of Washington University
son Alexander
wife Janina
with Betts Custer
co-founder
member of NARSAD’s National Leadership Council
William Carpenter of University of Maryland
director of NYU Bellevue INSPIRES Program
all with Merrill Lynch
Presentation of Special Gift by Connie Lieber-pictures of grandchildren
Stuart Anderson of Weill Cornell Medical College
chairman of neurobiology at Yale University;
chairman of psychiatry at Weill Cornell Medical College
Nirav Patel with Joseph Camnarosano
Daniel Battsek at The Cinema Society's screening of “Blindness.”
friends
husband
friends
Jesse Carrier with friends
friend
Williams-sonoma Home store team-Davide
Mi'shell
Top row: Phillip Gorrivan
Jesse Carrier. Bottom row: Charlotte Moss
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
A group toast at Pratt Institute's Legends 2008: A Pratt Institute Scholarship Benefit Honoring Icons of Art
H.S.H. Prince Albert II of Monaco
Katie Lee Joel with Penny the Dog
From Defining Luxury: The Qualities of Life at Home.
Drums at the Soldiers’
Airmen’s Club's 12th Annual Military Ball.
massimo Vignelli
Afterparty at The Russian Tea Room.
Dancing to the Bob Hardwick Sound at Casita Maria's annual Fiesta.
Thalia with her
Karla diAndre
Christine Schwarzman with Claire Champy in the background
Prince Dimitri of Yugolslavia
friend
Bill Haseltine with Amanda Haynes-Dale
Brooklyn Youth Chorus at National Park Foundation's annual black-tie "Expedition America!" gala
fundraiser.
Vice Chair of the National Park Foundation
Board Member of the National Park Foundation
owner of Chelsea Piers
Vice Chair of the National Park Foundation
of
of Discovery Communications
documentary filmmaker
of
of the National Park Foundation
husband
of
of the National Park Foundation
of Musco Lighting
his wife Cookham
former director of the National Park Service
Superintendent of the National Capital Parks East
National Park Foundation Staff Members with gift boxes
friend
friends
Table Setting at Le Bernardin - by Lets Have An Affair
Wellness Center Medical Director Alain deLotbiniere
Catherine deLotbiniere
Gala Co-chair O. Anthony Maddalena
Guest of Honor Rosamond Bernier
Carol Morris with William Bristol
The Junior committee of the AMC: Alieda Keevil
Tinsley Mortimer with friends
friends
husband John Cusimano
The Bacon Brothers perform
Judith Ripka models
contestant on “America’s Greatest Dog”
Nicole Fiscella from “Gossip Girl”
Radio personality Goumba Johny
radio personality Maria Milito
H.R.H Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
and Xavier Flouret
friend
Frank Sinatra School for the Arts Chamber Singers perform at Americans for the Arts 2008 National Arts Awards.
At the Metropolitan Club for the 3rd Annual Purses &amp
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Donna Karan's Surprise Birthday Party.
friends
Donna Karan amongst friends
friend
friends
friends
friend
The scene inside The Box
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Nibbling on treats at Bergdorf Goodman for a breakfast
shopping event hosted by Best &amp
CRI executive director Jill O'Donnell-Tormey
Event chair
CRI trustee Carlos Ferrer
"and Radar"
Jill O'Donnell-Tormey congratulate Roy Bostock
whose team placed second in overall low net score
Carlos Ferrer congratulates Andy Paul
who won longest drive
taking third place in overall low net score
daughter
Guests shopping
More guests shopping
friend
wife Lynn
Panel discussion.
Keep a Child Alive with a guest
Lynn Redgrave meet members
NAC members
Aldon James with Lynn Redgrave
Dary Day with NAC member
Lynn Redgrave with Arts Club members
At the Park Avenue apartment of Michele
Larry Herbert to kick off the NYU Tisch School of Arts Fall Gala.
friend
friend
Alex Garfield amongst Dress For Success staff
supporters.
daughter
The Garden Terrace Room table setting
friends
friend
First Dorrit Moussaieff of Iceland
Ólafur Ragnar Grímsson of Iceland
his band
H.E. Bingu wa Mutharika of the Republic of Malawi
HRH Prince Talal of Jordan with twin children HRH Princess Rajaa Bint
HRH Prince Talal of Jordan
HRH Prince Talal of Jordan
Terrance Howard sings a song from his new album
John Mayer performs
Jerry Seinfeld performs stand up for guests
Music Director Lorin Maazel conducting the New York Philharmonic at Avery Fisher Hall.
Dinner in the tent in Damrosch Park under the Swarovski crystal chandeliers.
Music Director Lorin Maazel with his wife
Paul Calello of Credit Suisse
Walking down the rejuvenated staircase.
Co-chairs Angela Latigona
Jonathan Feldman with Gadin Rosenwaks
Co-chairs Lori Toub
Zachary Pomerantz with Sheri Toub
Associate Dean of Science for Education
Department of Herpetology
at the American Museum of Natural History with guests
Co-chair Samuel Stahl
Co-chairs Zibby
Guests at the Junior Council Event
Candee with Kim Campbell
Young shoppers
friend
Leonel Piraino with Martha Glass
Brenda van der Mije
Helena Christensen with Vipp family
Founder of
chairman of FMR.
Fguests on a tour of the New York Public Library of The Performing Arts
Andrew W. Mellon Director of the New York Public Libraries
The New York Public Library for the Performing Arts
Founder of
chairman of FMR;
wife of Luciano Pavarotti
at New York University
Co-founder of FMR
Derek Jeter with his limited edition Rose Gold piece $7700 model.
The Jeter family
of
of Movado Efraim Grinberg
Derek Jeter with World Wide of Movado Jeff Cohen
Four Season’s Table
Michael Kuhn at The Cinema Society's screening of “The Duchess.”
Jazz at Lincoln Center
wife Libby Ellis
Wynton Marsalis with NYC Councilwoman Inez Dickins
Stanley Crouch with Jazz at Lincoln Center Chairman Lisa Schiff
Jazz at Lincoln Center Board member Mark Rosenthal
Jazz at Lincoln Center Board member Tom Lee
Jazz at Lincoln Center Board member Alan Cohn
wife Betsy Cohn
friend
Jazz at Lincoln Center Board member Melanie Shorin
Jazz at Lincoln Center Board member Dick Cashin with wife Lisa Cashin
friend
Outside the 5th Annual Fete de Swifty tent on 73rd
her son Hudson
The lovely ladies working the raffle tickets
Matthew Modine auctioning off a Fender Bass guitar
autographed by STING
Stella Adler teaching
age 75
Outreach Division student Laura
Outreach Division instructor Carlos Caldart
students
Susan Magazine with NYFC Children
Oscar de la Renta
Patti LaBelle with NYFC Members
guests
honorees
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Tom Rosenberg at Cinema Society's screening of the new film “Elegy” co-hosted with Glamour magazine’s Editor-in-Chief Cindi Leive.
friends
friend
Participants mingle during the cocktail reception at Evidence
A Dance Company's fifth annual fundraiser “On Our Toes” in the Hamptons.
"On Our Toes" in the Hamptons Honorary Chair Crystal McCrary Anthony
Benefit Committee Chair Nancy A. Armand with HSBC Premier
A Dance Company board member Joyce Mullins-Jackson
A Dance Company board member Reggie Canal
his wife Gillian Canal
board member Zaid Abdul-Aleem
A Dance Company artistic director Ronald K. Brown
board member Reggie Canal
Board member Joanne E. Hill
board chair Reginald Van Lee
Mistress of Ceremonies Rene Syler
board member Andrea Hoffman
board member Dwayne Ashley
A Dance Company dancer Clarice Young
Evidence founder
choreographer director
artistic director Ronald K. Brown perform "Grace"
Marion Burnside dance together during the benefit after party
A Dance Company dancer Tiffany Quinn
her husband Chad Quinn
dancer Clarice Young
dancer Arcell Cabuag
dancer Otis Donovan Herring
"On Our Toes" in the Hamptons lead sponsor HSBC Premier provided complimentary cab service to
from the venue
select points in Bridgehampton during the event
Executive Director of the Princess Grace Foundation
Jackie McClaine with friends
MARC JACOBS Spring 2009 Collection After Party at The Greenwich Hotel
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Halle Berry as Calvin Klein celebrated its 40th Anniversary.
The official anniversary event was held at a custom designed space designed by renowned architect John Pawson alongside the High Line – the elevated rail structure soon to become a public park – in the West 30s along Tenth Avenue.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The match between Evian Blue
Evian Pink at “A Taste of Polo.”
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at the First Annual Watermill Benefit Concert.
elicitas Brant
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Team Hedi spearheaded by Kimberly Kravis Schulhof
Strides for Life Co-Chair.
Children’s 50-Yard Dash.
Palin families form Team Caryl in memory of Caryl Palin.
Strides for Life
Strides for Life
Lung Cancer Research Foundation Board of Directors: Ashish P. Sanghrajka
Southampton’s Epley
Three-time lung cancer survivor Lorette Pucylowski before the ribbon is cut
Three-time lung cancer survivor Lorette Pucylowski
Lorette's Team
A young runner keeps her pace up
Co-Anchor of FOX News
Three-time lung cancer survivor Lorette Pucylowski cut the ribbon at the starting line
Rosanna’s Marion Scotto gets a ride in the pace car with Jacques Nordeman
her daughter near the finish line
Members of Team Hedi
Clockwise from top left: Rosanna Scotto delivers some inspirational words
Runners with well-deserved Tory Burch gift bags.
Women’s race winner Tara Farrell
A young member of Team Pat
A young runner enjoys a lollipop from Dylan’s Candy Bar
Two youngsters get some help crossing the finish line with their fathers
Men’s race winner Angel Rojas crossing the finish line
Volunteers cheer on runners at the finish line
Rosanna Scotto nears the finish line
Claws for Paws Jr. Committee
Chris Lentz with ARF dogs "Biggie
Oliver Oliver being interviewed
Gale Drukier with ARF kitten "Harry"
ARF's Sara Davison with ARF puppy "Berger"
Linda Nudelman accepting the Robert A. Boas award from Susan Claster
daughter of Boas
Stephanie Katz with her Arthur Katz
winner of Robert A. Boas award
with husband Jeff
Gallery at Coldwell Banker in East Hampton
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
fans at an evening celebration for Gossip Girl stars
designer Eric Daman.
Andrew &amp
The crowd outside Henri Bendel.
Oscar de la Renta
friend
Roger Federer coming...
going ...
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
" a benefit to Aid The People of DARFUR
hosted By Sarah Silverman.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The dinner Tent at the Preservation Society of Newport County's Tiffany Ball.
Dancing in the Great Hall.
Pierre duPont Irving
Chairman of the Board of Trustees of the Preservation Society
Trudy Coxe. She is &amp
Executive Director of the Preservation Society
Peter Englehart of Tiffany &amp
Elizabeth Prince de Ramel with Fernanda Kellogg
Regis Philbin with Kathie Lee
friend
wife Joy
Nikki with Eva Mohr
friend
friends
friend
Regis with Leba Sedaka
friend
Kathie Lee blowing out her candles
Taylor Dane with friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Count Alexandre deLesseps
Countess LuAnn deLesseps
Lisa d'Urso
Sara Herbert-Galloway with a friend
Lisa d'Urso
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
D&amp;G models at a luncheon
Fall 2008 fashion presentation in Southampton.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The dinner scene at Art Crush.
and Gary Garrels
L. to r.: Bettina Zilkha
L. to r.: Bettina Zilkha
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Tom Cruise at the L.A. premiere of “Tropic Thunder.”
friend
A.C.E.s Susan Needles
2 Fresh Air visitors
nine-year-old Isidra
ten-year-old Kayla
Edward Nahem’s Fresh Air participants
14-year-olds Joseph
his Fresh Air visitors
14-year-olds Joseph
Tom Elghanayan with their Fresh Air girls
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
” a benefit for Amaryllis Farm Equine Rescue.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Bambi Felberbaum at Diamond Ranch in Water Mill for the 19th Annual Wild Wild West Family Day Carnival to benefit the Albert Einstein College of Medicine.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Back row: Meredith Dunn
Anna Gavazzi. Front row: Alix Smith
L. to r.: Elizabeth Pyne
Audrey del Rosario
Enriquillo del Rosario
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Women’s Board of Ravinia hosted the festival’s annual Gala Benefit Evening in Chicago.
Jr. with the Hon. Mario Cuomo
Dinner under the tent
Paul Goldberger with friends
Sirio Maccioni with Fabrizzio
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Guests gathered at the Hotel Cipriani's Granai to celebrate La Festa del Redentore with cocktails
a five-course feast
a fireworks display over the lagoon
dancing by the Cipriani pool with a midnight buffet.
The Church of the Redentore
the temporary bridge.
Guests being transported by Gondola to the Hotel Bauer.
The décor at the Giorgio Cini Foundation dinner.
Frederick Ilchman speaking at San Sebastiano.
The décor at the Granai. Matteo Corvino designed two spectacular long tables
surrounded by colored lanterns
adorned with stunning arrangements of fresh lemons.
Andrew Jones at Palazzo Polignac Decazes
Elizabeth Locke at Palazzo Polignac Decazes
The Haegler family working on the treasure hunt
Michael LaPlaca at the Hotel Bauer
Matteo Corvino in the cloisters of the Giorgio Cini Foundation
Maureen Footer at San Giorgio Maggiore
Paolo Costagli at Palazzo Polignac Decazes
David Clement at the Cini Foundation
Tony Ingrao at the Hilton Molino Stucky
Anne Hawley at the Palladio Hotel &amp
Modeling a piece from Alessandro Possati's Sete-Cento fashion line
Gunter Blobel at the Granai
Shirley Sherwood at the Hotel Cipriani
Barbara Seig at the Granai
Tim Reid with Tina Walls at the Granai
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
her arriving at St. James Church.
Andrew Martin on the way to the reception.
Khaled Said anticipate the couple's arrival.
The matron of honor
Exchanging vows.
Clockwise from top left: Carolina Gonzalez-Bunster
Clockwise from above: Jenny
Ryan Prince with Tara Bernard Archer
Rose petals.
The wedding programs.
The bride signing the marriage certificate.
The parents of the groom
The parents of the bride
The bride
her walking down the aisle.
The newlyweds exiting the church.
The groom with his best man
The couple on the way to their car.
A close-up of the Palio performers.
The dinner reception in the Salone del Trono.
Andrew brother
his brother
Luca del Bono
The best man
giving a toast.
The of the bride
giving a toast.
The groom making his toast.
The bride
groom in front of the Salone del Trono.
Clockwise from top left: Tessa Mills
More wedding guests.
The cutting of the cake.
The first dance.
The guests enjoying the Palio Performance from the terrace at Palazzo Corsini.
The Performance by the medieval Palio flag throwers
drummers.
The wedding party posing on the terrace at Palazzo Corsini.
CLICK here to subscribe to our mailing list.
Katherine Kennedy Bailey at the inaugural event of the 40th anniversary of the Robert F. Kennedy Memorial at the East Hampton estate of Courtney Sale Ross.
oanna Goldenstein
L. to r.: Diane
Countess LuAnn deLesseps
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Liliana Cavendish at a birthday celebration at Bungalow 8 for Hunt Slonem
Lisa's sparkling birhday cake arrives.
Hunt blowing
Lisa blowing
Rufus blowing out his birhday cake.
A big birthday greeting for Hunt
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
A sneak peek of some of the dresses from Holy Toledo! Isabel Toledo
the Art of Fashion
which opens June 19
2009 through September 26
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Young Patrons of Lincoln Center's Tango On the Rocks.
Countess LuAnn deLesseps
Liberachi doing his own thing
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Rush Philanthropic's Annual ART FOR LIFE GALA 2008.
Michael del Giudice
Taking in the firworks
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dinner at the Park Avenue Armory prior to the performance of Die Soldaten by the Lincoln Center Festival 08.
In The Drill Hall for the performance of Die Soldaten.
friend
Kelly d'Halluin
Lang Lang performs to a standing ovation.
Vivienne with David Chines
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
30 Rock's Judah Friedlander
Under the tent
family
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Fireworks display at the Hudson Valley Hero Gala at Washington Irving’s Sunnyside in Tarrytown
Safari party style
friends
honoree Joseph Cotter
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
French master chefs
American top chefs gathered to celebrate French cuisine at the Citymeals-on-Wheels annual Chefs Tribute event in Rockefeller Center.
Honored French chefs Georges Blanc
Citymeals-on-Wheels
chef
chef
award-winning chef Paul Liebrandt
Oak Room at the Plaza Hotel Paul Bartolotta
Artisanal Fromagerie &amp
eighty one David Burke
davidburke &amp
donatella Jawn Chasteen &amp
Vincent on Camelback Hubert Keller
Gotham Bar &amp
Grill Antonio Prontelli &amp
Rock Center Café / Cucina &amp
Citymeals-on-Wheels Chefs Tribute 2008 Crème de la Crème honored masters of French Cuisine.
Adour at The St. Regis Hotel Larry Forgione
Pizzeria Mozza/ Osteria Mozza Joachim Splichal &amp
Executive Director of Citymeals-on-Wheels
of “Crème de la Crème”;
award-winning actress Kathleen Turner
chef
chef
chef
Gotham Bar &amp
chef
chef
Guests sample French cuisine at the “Crème de la Crème
chef
Artisanal Fromagerie &amp
Barbera Glatt with friends
family
Nicole B. Brewer with friends
family
Linda Beck with friends
family
fam
Steve Schneider with fam
Pascal Levy with kiddies
kiddies
kiddies
kiddies
The Harland family
The Mnuchin family
kiddies
kiddies
Kirsten Galef with kiddies
kiddies
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
co-chair
Blair Husain with table centerpiece - dwarf corn plant
Wendy Breck extracting DNA from mashed bananas
Kristen Strecker wins Liz Watson's new book
CSHL basket
Cold Spring Harbor Director of Research
Mary Tyler Moore with Nebraska
Bernadette Peters with Fluffy
both with Dumpling.
DaVinci with Joel Grey
Elvis with Ruth
event co-chair Kevin Murray
NBA Hall of Famer
event co-chair Susan Murray
Court TV’s Jack Ford
Former NFL player Jeremy Lincoln
From Totally Rad: New York in the 80s.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Cocktails for a cause at Hollywould.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dinner scene at the Sixth Annual Hedge Fund Industry Awards gala.
Sandra Kozlowski receiving Tiffany's raffle prize from Christian MacDonald
friend
friend
Thomas B. Harris accepting the award for Public Fund Investor of the Year from Lora Goldwater
Michael Steinhardt receiving his Lifetime Achievement Award from Paul Kazarian
Marcel Herbst accepting the Fund of Hedge Funds Leader of the Year Award from Dylan Curley
Phil Goldstein receiving his Outstanding Contribution Award from Steve Samuels
of AdultVest
accepting the award for Hedge Fund Launch of the Year
Davide Serra posing with his award for Emerging Manager of the Year
a band comprising members from the hedge fund industry
played in support of the charity A Leg to Stand On
J. Tomilson Hill's acceptance speech for Institutional Manager of the Year
Paulson &amp
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Study in Black
Joan Ganz Cooney greeting Zibby Right
Peter Brown with Shirley Rosenthal
Nico del Castillio
Joe Allen talking to Laurie Everson
Susanne O'malley's son
the Hawian Tropic Girls
Grace dos Santos
friends
Grace dos Santos
husband Ben Mezrich
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The French-inspired dinner scene at the 2008 Caramoor International Music Festival's Opening Night Gala
Benefit in Katonah
Jenna lazar
Liz Dent with a friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
l. to r.: Cooper Union Chairman Ron Drucker
l. to r.: Lloyd G. Trotter
l. to r.: Kevin Burke
Irwin S. Chanin School of Architecture Dean Anthony Vidler
The pre-dinner scene at 7 World Trade Center.
Art auction
Cooper Union Vice Chairman of the Board of Trustees Mark Epstein
Cooper Union Chairman of the Board of Trustees Ronald Drucker
Members of the Chapter's Junior Committee
A Fireman to keep the party under control
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
A view from the Turret of the Central Park Arsenal at the Merchant’s House Museum annual fundraiser.
“The Vicar of Vintage Vinyl”
direct descendant of Joseph Brewster
builder of the house
John Bosquet-Morra with friends
Ms. Nancy Listorti of Loro Piana
Board Member Anthony Bellov with Former Parks Commissioner Henry Stern
friends
and Bosquet-Morra with friends
Staff of the Merchant’s House Museum
Timothy Grajak in a Tango
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Andrew M. Paul presented the Oliver R. Grace Award to Carlos A. Ferrer
Philip D. Greenberg presented the Coley Award to Michael Bevan
Yu-chin Lo
Michael &amp
Tom &amp
he is former to Austria
he is chairman of the Garden Conservancy
former director of the Abby Aldrich Rockefeller Folk Art Collection
the Pennsylvania Academy of Fine Arts
the Whitney Museum of American Art
the Andy Warhol Museum
sculptor
director of
curator of the Storm King Art Center
trustee of the Storm King Art Center
of the Storm King Art Center
chairman of the Storm King Art Center
trustee of the Storm King Art Center
scholar of modern
contemporary crafts.
trustee of the Storm King Art Center
Director of the Whitney Museum
trustee of the Storm King Art Center
trustee of the Storm King Art Center
The Duke of Devonshire
Lunching under the tent
of Group for the East End
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Performance shot in Zankel Hall at Carnegie Hall’s Annual Notable Occasion hosted by Nicola Bulgari.
Jason Danieley performing in Zankel Hall
Clockwise from above: Arial shot of Bulgari store
featured speaker Ruth Arnoldi Kohn
with her sons Daniel
her son Jeffrey E. Tabak
Museum director
her daughter Helen Kener Gray
Patti Kenner welcomes guests
wife of Museum Trustee Jeffrey E.Tabak
wife Janie
William DeMeo with Janel Baldow
Marlborough Gallery's Marcia Levine
Marlborough Gallery's Janis Cecil
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Co-chairs Lindsay Baldwin
Guy Merison. Bottom row: Oakleigh Thorne
son
friend
friend
and Nick Seffer
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Ingeborg Rennert with Paul LeClerc
The Buckley library
The Buckley bedroom
rank Piazola
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The dinner scene at Hale House's 39th Anniversary Gala Benefit Dinner
Andrew &amp
friend
Shea Stadium. Take one good last look ...
fiancé Dee Occleppo in the stands
Tommy Hilfiger throws out first pitch while Mets Pitcher Johan Santana looks on
Daryl Strawberry mobbed by fans in VIP Tent
friends
L. to r.: Divya Gugnani
Jonas Mekas with Christo
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dancing at The School of American Ballet's annual Workshop Performance Benefit.
sLaura Zeckendorf
guest
SAB students
The dance floor
friend
Members of the chorale's side by side education program.
Lauren Flanigan singing
Joseph Grillo with the students from the chorale's education program
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Guests in the Perennial Garden at The New York Botanical Garden's annual spring gala
The two birthday cakes that were presented to Melanie Seymour Holland.
Peter deNeufville
Click to order
Frederique van der Wahl
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dinner in the Cullman Hall of the Universe for AMNH's Corporate Dinner.
their daughter María Luisa Mendoza Leviant
their son
Princess Firyal of Jordan
Princess Firyal of Jordan
Dino-dessert.
Chairmen of the Museum Board of Trustees Lewis Bernard
Abbe Raven with friends from A&amp;E Network enjoying dinner
David H. Koch with his Distinguished Service to Science
Education Award presented by Ellen V. Futter
Guests of The CAA Table
Adam Horovitz of The Beastie Boys
Maurice Marabel of the Ghetto Film School
Stosh Mintek of the Ghetto Film School
his wife Jill Shapiro
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Team Airstream versus Team Zuma at the season opener at the Greenwich Polo Club.
Team Airstream versus Team Zuma
" which runs through July 11 at The Hebrew Union College Museum.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The crowd dancing at the the Ross School’s Fifth Annual Starlight Ball.
Indian musicians hypnotize the crowd.
Zoo Handler with Ferret Fox
honorees Emily Altman
Fulbrighter from Niger
former honoree Cornelius Prior
former Board member Tony Williams
event Meera Gandhi
Fulbrighter from Iraq
Cécelia Rohde with her daughter
Clockwise from above: Daniel Boulud at work
Dos de Bar aux Poireaux et aux Ecrevisses
Mousse au Chocolat au Sabayon.
Chic on stage with singers
Chic drummer
Danielle Aceti Gingerich in Morgane Le Fay gowns
adopted father
some of the kids who attended Flip Flop Casual
Enrico Proietti giving pasta lessons to Ronald McDonald House guest
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
UJA-Federation of New York’s Women’s Philanthropy Division Committee of 100 at its inaugural event
In Her Footsteps: Collective Power Making an Impact.
honoree Amanda Bilski
UJA-Federation's John Shapiro
Women's Philanthropy Division Chair Alisa Levin
Women's Philanthropy Division Lynn Kroll
her husband Howard Silverstein
performer Phoebe
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
the scene of Jazz at Lincoln Center's 2008 Spring Gala.
CW 11's Peter Thorn
friend
friend
friend
friend
Eli Manning's ring
Composer Ira Gasman stays during construction
Christy Turlington with a friend
The Untold Story of Black New Orleans
friend
Marina of the Zabbaleen
SF's Lindsay Spiller
Fire Under The Snow Tibetan monk Palden Gatso
Filmamkers in the Target Lounge.
The Schnabel gals
Schnabel Gals kissing Dick Cavett
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at the Society for Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center's Spring Gala.
friend
friend
The view from the second floor landing
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dinner in The Edna Barnes Salomon Room at The New York Public Library for a dinner in honor of Stephen Schwarzman.
U.S. to Jamaica Brenda Johnson
Mistress of Ceremonies Hoda Kotb
Heckscher Playground in Central Park.
Bob the Builder
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Joan’s Legacy Board Mary Ann Tighe
Joan’s Legacy Executive Director Susan Mantel
Joan’s Legacy Executive Director Susan Mantel
his daughter
guest
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
El Museo's 15th Annual Gala.
Agatha Ruiz de la Prada
Agatha Ruiz de la Prada
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Parkinson’s Disease Foundation's Bal du Printemps at The Pierre.
PDF's Scientific Director
F.R.C.P. accepts the Isobel Robins Konecky Creativity Award from Gala Dinner Chairman
his wife Diane
her husband Charles
wife Carmen
A performance by MSM students
friend
Director of Publications
Editor-in-Chief
former Award winner
Paris Correspondent for The New York Times
The book table displays the finalists for the 2008 New York Public Library Helen Bernstein Book Award for Excellence in Journalism
The kiddies during the show
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Merce Cunningham Dance Company performs at Dia:Beacon Spring 2008 Benefit.
Merce Cunningham Dance Company performs.
Ines de la Fressange
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
On the dance floor at the American Cancer Society's "Celebration of Life."
Prince Jean d'Orleans
HRH Prince Jean d'Orleans
HRH Prince Jean d'Orleans
Pilar Molyneux with Elizabeth Stribling
HRH Prince Jean d'Orleans
friend
ron Black
accepts her award
shares a card given to her by CV Residents
Pier 60 filled with over 500 CV supporters
family John
a CV Alum
Earvin "Magic" Johnson shares some inspiration with CV Residents
performs
Nestled under the 59th Street Bridge
Sotheby's Auctioneer Eliza Osborne
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The London Symphony Orchestra held its 2008 New York Gala at the Metropolitan Club.
The recital performance.
The Knot colleagues
Susan Nitze with Greater New York Girl Scouts
Liz Ann Sonders with guests
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Fred Doner with Barbara Tober
friend
Ann Jurdem with a friend
friends
friend
friend
friend
friend
his daughter
friend
friend
Jay Levy with Paige Peterson
Jason Hirsch taking in the scene
Katherine Pew with Marc Griffin
friend
Tammy Winn with her daughter
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Lucy Drummond at the 67th Bal des Berceaux
Emmett Rahn-Oakes sings The Star Spangled Banner
the Marseillaise
friend
Sigourney Weaver with their daughter Charlotte
her son Jake
H.E. the Permanent Representative of France to the U.N.
event
The Grand Ballroom at The Plaza
the evening’s host
St. Luke’s Board Member
the event’s designer
St. Luke’s Board Member
dancer/choreographer Mikhail Baryshnikov
New York City Department of Cultural Affairs Commissioner Kate Levin
St. Luke’s
the evening’s honoree
with St. Luke’s Board Chairman Norman Benzaquen
his wife Diana Benzaquen
mezzo-soprano guest soloist at the event
guest conductor
Members of the Straus Family
Chief Curator of the Tel Aviv Museum of Art
Chief Curator of the Tel Aviv Museum of Art
the Straus’ granddaughter
Chief Curator of the Tel Aviv Museum of Art
Deputy Director of the Tel Aviv Museum of Art
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Curator of The Phillips Collection
Brooklyn Museum of Art
Director of The Phillips Collection
Peter Jay Sharp Chief Curator of The Frick Collection
Center for Curatorial Leadership.
Collectors Committee member
Collectors Committee member
Collectors Committee members Helen C. Fioratti
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
At the Young Friends of the New-York Historical Society gala.
friend
and
The scene at Aurora Lopez’s SoHo loft
Fiona Rudin with Honoree Lisa Perry
National Institute of Reproductive Health Kelli Conlin
daughter Samantha
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Carolyn Korins in the New York Restoration Project's Garden of Hope’s newly designed space.
Presentation to Betty Sherrill: Ann Jeffery
Boys' Club boys
Berge Wathne with Henry Plattt
Boys' Club boys
Lear DeBessonet receives a 's Award from Maggie Boepple
Maggie Boepple with Kate Levin
Jill Varney Bernard in front of a Warhol of Emily
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
A touch of red in The Conservatory Garden in Central Park.
Stacey Bosworth with a friend
Ruth Westheimer with Broadway Knights of Monty Python's Spamalot
Vicki Downey with Broadway Knights of Monty Python's Spamalot
Valerie Bickel with Broadway Knights of Monty Python's Spamalot
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Under the tent at the Women’s Committee of the Central Park Conservancy's 26th Annual Frederick Law Olmsted Awards Luncheon.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Peter Lyden at ABT II's premiere of "Cake" at the Joyce Theater.
Joseph Gorak.jpg
wife Soon-Yi Previn
A study for a house as table centerpiece.
Dancing in the Rainbow Room.
Toast by Alex Gorliln
Clockwise from top left: A study of a residential tower in Boston
Study for the Spangler Center at the Harvard Business School
Study for a mountain clubhouse.
Howard Socol accepts honor from Alber Elbaz
Diane von Furstenberg accepts honor from Anderson Cooper
A look from Grace Shin '08
A look from Angela Gao '08
A look from Sarah Law '08
Students receive standing ovation
Parsons Designers of the Year Nayeon Lee
Parsons alum designer Derek Lam
Parsons alum designer Peter Som
of Creative Design Studio
Parsons alum designer Chris Benz
Anamaria Wilson of Harper's Bazaar
Julie Gilhart of Barneys New York
Parsons alum Jeffrey Banks
Parsons Board Member Paul Rosengard of Perry Ellis
Oscar de la Renta
Executive Director of the CFDA Steven Kolb
David Neville of Rag &amp
Jeffrey Costello of Costello Tagliapietra with Alber Elbaz
friend
&amp
Annette de la Renta
Special guest
host Sarah Jones.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dancing on the New York State Theater Promenade at New York City Ballet's Spring Gala.
Ralph Rucci with Event Chairmen Charlotte Moss
Darci Kistler with their daughter Talicia Martins
NYCB dancers Giovanni Villalobos with Georgina Pazcoguii
NYCB dancer Ashley Bouder with Event Chairmen Barry S. Friedberg
NYCB dancers David Prottas
NYCB dancer Sara Mearns
NYCB dancer Megan Fairchild
NYCB dancers Gretchen Smith
NYCB dancer Maria Kowroski
NYCB dancer Ana Sophia Scheller
friend
friend
The luncheon scene
Sarah Rothwell amongst silent auction items
friends
Luly Duke with her son
The colorful dinner scene at the Louis D. Brandeis High School.
Ruth Lande Shuman with Christo
Mark Ecko signing a Publicolor student's shirt
Nathan Diana with a friend
Publicolor students
friend
her daughter Deva
An assembling of Skadden Fellows.
Linda Kay Klein from the Sister Fund
Ai-jen Poo
Maddy deLone
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Readers on stage at the 2008 Young Lions Fiction Award: Brian F. O’Byrne
Barbara Currie with her son Ron Currie
winner of the 2008 Young Lions Fiction Award
Anne Jackson with Eli Wallach
Gillian Auferheide with a friend
Marge Champion with Fiddler on the Roof author Joe Stein
friend
Members of Orpheus Chamber Orchestra
Ensemble of the Budapest Chamber Orchestra
Arriving in style
guest
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Panel discussion in the LeFrak Theater for the American Museum of Natural History's 18th annual Spring Environmental Lecture
The Dessert plate.
The luncheon in the Milstein Hall of Ocean Life
Antony Todd stands by his table.
Diana Quasha from afternoon Designer Showcase
Clockwise from top left: Miles Redd for Oscar de la Renta Home
Ingrid Edelman &amp
Gay Hackett for Gay Hackett
Marco Maccioni for Le Cirque
Murphy &amp;
Linda Fargo for Bergdorf Goodman
Harry Heissmann of Albert Hadley
The back room at Swifty's
The birthday menu
Chi-town Boys
Front row: Dennis Swanson
Zari Pope. Back row: Rabbi Joseph Potasnik
youth from Project Kavod
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Winchester College Chapel Choir from Great Britain performs "The Immigrant's Song" at the 2008 Ellis Island Family Heritage Awards.
Mel Brooks in Battery Park
Foundation Founding Chair Lee Iacocca as they approach Ellis Island
The Winchester College Chapel Choir from Great Britain performs "God Bless America."
Lynn Sherr of ABC News serves as Master of Ceremonies
Statue of Liberty National Monument
Catherine Forbes ride the ferry to Ellis Island
Lee Iacocca presents her Luke Higgin's 1906 manifest to Literature Honoree Mary Higgins Clark
Education Honoree Donna E. Shalala accepts the manifest marking the 1900 Ellis Island arrival of her Lebanese grandfather from Lee Iacocca
Lee Iacocca presents B.C. Forbes' 1904 manifest to Business Honorees Robert "Bob" Forbes
Mel Brooks reads his family's immigration story to his granddaughter
son
Lee Iacocca presents the manifest documenting the 1896 arrival of 3-year-old Max Kaminsky from Austria to Max's son
Lee Iacocca in the Great Hall
The Children's Storefront Gospel Choir
daughter Chloe
Scenes from The “Country Fair” at Cipriani 42nd Street.
the kids
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Ted Turner at National Center for Learning Disabilities' annual benefit dinner
“Voices of Our Children
Voices of Our Future.”
Students from The Churchill School
Center in New York
guests
The dinner scene at Guastavino’s.
Kelly d'Halluin
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Stevie Nicks performing at NewYork-Presbyterian Hospital's annual black-tie gala benefit.
The table settings
friends
Lisa Perry with a friend
and Mark Gerschwind with Herbert Pardes
and James Giglio
and Neal Flomenbaum
Peter Davis arrive
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
LGBT @ NYPL Steering Committee member Joe Chang
Paul LeClerc presented Hermes Mallea
Carey Maloney with a framed poster of the Library’s 1994 exhibit Becoming Visible
Looking at treasures from the Library’s LGBT holdings: Celeste Dupry-Spencer
anf Rachel Zoe
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
reparing for dinner at the 11th Annual ASPCA Bergh Ball.
Richard Ferraiolo with Merlin
friends
Stacks of books all gone by night's end
friends
friends
Friends of The Fresh Air Fund
The scene at Touch
friend
Fresh Air Fund volunteers
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
New Yorkers For Children's Spring Gala: "A Fool's Fete."
The Duchess of York
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Christopher Walken at the Film Society of Lincoln Center's 35th annual tribute.
Meryl Streep poses with the evening's sponsors
Meryl Streep solo
with Jonathan Demme
Meryl Streep with more of the evening's sponsors
The scene at Guastavino's.
Michael Bolton with his daughter Isa
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The dinner scene at Rush Philanthropic Arts Foundation's first Art For Life Miami Beach gala.
Jonathan Adler with his Cynthia
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
25th Annual Women In Need Gala Dinner at The Pierre Hotel.
H.S.H. Prince Pierre d'Arenberg
Jonathan Lethem with his wife
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
H.S.H. Princess Pierre d'Arenberg
H.S.H. Prince Pierre d'Arenberg
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Claudia Cividino with friends
Paula Froelich with Carl
Recreation of Architecural Digest Green Room designed by Carleton Varney for backstage at the Oscars
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at The 2008 Brooklyn Ball.
Bernard de la Tour d'Auvergne
Orpheus Chamber Orchestra in action
James Lunt admires Mish's creation
A selection jewelry from Mish New York was on sale along with the botanical inspired artwork of Jeffrey Rudell
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Design Industries Foundation Fighting AIDS launched its 2008 Dining by Design National Tour.
L. to r.: Sherrell Aston
L. to r.: Sherrell Aston
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Walter Green surrounded by models
Susan Taylor’s friends
family
Fashions by Courtney Washington
S&amp;S
Sharne Jackson with Scholarship Award winners
Hasoni Pratts with Senator Kevin Parker
Jordan Oliver and Allyson Leigh Bolden
Marcella Maxwell with her True Service Award surrounded by Grace Ingleton
Linda Zango-Haley with her Marjorie Elliott
Marcia Bayne-Smith with her family
her daughter Markita
Judith West with her granddaughter Allyson Leigh Bolden
David Kest with
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at the Metropolitan Club for the Iridescent Masked Ball
hosted by the Young Friends of Save Venice.
friend
friend
Beatrice Rossi-landi
friend
his "Layer" birthday cake.
Charles Roos with Matko Tomicic
Executive Director of Irish Arts Center Aidan Connolly
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
of Zimbabwe Machivenyika Mapuranga
consul Embassy of Mexico
greets Salud y Genero honorees Luis Gerardo Ayala Real
Nina Totenberg of NPR was the evening's emcee
Geeta Rao Gupta addresses the crowd
a friend
Justice Stephen Breyer takes an oath while assisting World Bank economist Apurva Sanghi in his magic trick
Sarah Jones delighted the audience with a short performance of three distinctly different female characters ...
Central Park benches.
Leroy Neiman with board members of Arts Horizons
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Charles Nolan with Junior Council
ABT dancers.
Carola Nolan with guests
God’s Love We Deilver Committee Board
Behind the scene at God's Love
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The invitation from The Frick Collection's “Un Ballo In Maschera.”
Unveiling of the 2009 Lamborghini Gallardo LP560-4
The Frick's Associate Director
both dressed by Elie Saab
Masked guests in The Frick Entrance Hall
left behind
Marina Rust Connor in the "Library"
Young Fellows Steering Committee members Caitlin S. Davis
Maggie McQuade in the "Oval Room"
Roddy Tilt in the Garden Court
Kim Hicks in the "West Gallery"
Young Fellows Steering Committee members Lydia Fenet
Lauren Remington Platt with Parmigianino Naples
that inspired the theme of Un Ballo in Maschera
Chessy Wilson in Elie Saab
Two masked guests
Entrance Hall of The Frick Collection
Elie Saab with Virginia Lawson of Moet Hennessy USA
Jonathan Reed in the "Living Hall"
Justin Baer in the "Oval Room"
Tatiana Papanicoulaou dancing in the 'Music Room'
Guests enjoy viewing the mysterious portrait of Antea by Parmigianino
the painting that inspired the theme of Un Ballo in Maschera
In the Frick "West Gallery
Young Fellows Steering Committee member Olivia Pirovano
Guests at the 2008 Young Fellows Ball
Un Ballo in Maschera
dance in the "Music Room"
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Peter Cotton Tail Easter Egg Hunt at Doubles.
Timothy as
Nicolas as Peter Parkers
Nicolas as
Timothy as
hristina Botta
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Stella Adler from the trailer for Shadow of the Thin Man
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Highlander docked in Palm Beach.
Duchess of Marlborough
Clockwise from above: 's hat signed by Prince Edward
Duke of Windsor
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Clockwise from above: Erick Montes
'Mizrahi Girls’ dressed by Isaac: Olivia Flatto
Princess Alexandra of Greece
L. to r.: Niki Sarich-Rising
L. to r.: Niki Sarich-Rising
the Duchess of Marlborough
the Duchess of Marlborough
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Gala Marcia Santoni with Honoree Morgan Freeman
Co-host Joanna Gleason
Vice of Sotheby’s
his granddaughter Edena Hines with Desmond Richardson
Board member Elizabeth Richebourg Rea of the Dungannon Foundation
Frank duPont
Lisa Selby with daughter Patsy
Catherine Carey with sons Paul
daughter Sara with Kate Kenny
Heather Mnuchin with daughter Dylan
son John
Christina Addison with daughter Carolina
Pamela Gross with son Alexander
Dayssi Olarte de Kanavos with sons Nicholas
Niki Beels with daughter Alessandra
Jennifer Creel with son Lowell
Muffie Potter Aston with twins Bracie
Mary Snow with daughter Annabell
Marjorie Gubelmann with son Cyrus
Bartender preparing specialty Sidecar
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dessert in
Dancing in
Roberto Cavalli with Winter Dance Chairs Tinsley Mortimer
friend
Chairman of the Museum's Board of Trustees Lewis Bernard
Long table in Dzanga-Sangha Rainforest diorama
Dinner in the Hall of Biodiversity
Sheila C. Johnson with Steven Stolman
Parsons alumna Jane Bannerman
friend
Parsons faculty member Lisa Pincus
Vera List Center for Art
architect Lyn Rice
Georgetown Public Library blaze on April 30
Touring the charred interior of the Georgetown Public Library: Reid Dunavant
the library architectural historian
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Guild Hall’s Academy of the Art's 23rd Annual Lifetime Achievement Awards at the Rainbow Room.
Table decor by LMD.
Installation by MK Guth.
Claudeand Joseph Audi with Henri Barguirdjian
Models in Graff jewels
friend
Faith Prince performing
Guests in the Foyer of Gracie Mansion
The audience at the 2011 World Police &amp
2011 World Police &amp
Fire Games Executive Board with Gala honorees
Attendees bid on Silent Auction items provided by Steiner Sports Memorabilia
Abigail Kirsch's table.
Executive Chef of Payard Bistro
C-CAP graduate Ja-Laurel Torres
A chef from Dovetail
C-CAP gratuate speaker
pastry cook at the Four Seasons in Dallas
Marcus Samuelsson of Aquavit
Michael Lomonaco of Porter House New York
Sarabeth Levine of Sarabeth's
a C-CAP graduate
Sous Chef at Café des Artistes
Executive Chef at Café des Artistes
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
L. to r.: Tom Bergeron
Women's Project Presents: "I Want What You Have"
The Award plates Merrie Spaeth
The Award plates
friends
Director of NYC Landmarks Conservation
friend
friend
Executive Director Environmental Advocates of NY
Bill Hubbard with friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
SAB students perform for the guests on the Promende of the New York State Theater at its Winter Ball.
SAB students line up on the stairs.
friend
Peter Martins with an SAB student
Darcey Kistler with an SAB student
Jeff Koons with
and Thomas Cahill
The Sixth Form on display. Click to order.
friend
Friends of the ICA
The scene at ICA
Lexus presented a preview of Christie’s Interiors at the inaugural Lexus Young Collectors Night.
Kelly d
Nicolas d
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Natalie Portman at a private screening for “The Other Boleyn Girl."
Bonpoint staff
Chairman of the Board
amie Drake-Drake Design Associates
Brian Covington for Ferguson &amp
The Rainbow Room foyer
LMD Floral Events Interiors-Escort card table
Orchids provided by Banchet
friends
friend
Sherrill Canet arranged by Plaza Flowers
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Co-hostesses Brenda Blackmon
Eagle Academy For Young Men students with New York City Schools Chancellor Joel Klein
Rudy Clause escorts Denise Nappier
Show prep
Cubs co-chair Amanda Benchley
son Teddy
The Center for the Book Arts teaches the art of bookbinding in Valentine Hallway
daughter Louisa
daughter Sadie
daughter Lulu
husband Nick Clavin with their child Hudson
The puppet show
son Lorcan
Some of the staff of The Society of Memorial Sloan Kettering
Claudia Overstrom with a Big Apple Circus Clown Care clown
Lynn Morris with Big Apple Circus Clown Care clowns
Click image to play a video sampling of the gala evening's performance of the Israel Philharmonic Orchestra's Tribute to Leonard Bernstein.
Face painting
hand painting
Cecelia Faraut with Ruth Wollard
Kristina Stewart Ward with son
kids
sons
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at New York Magazine's Oscar party at the Spotted Pig.
with Luncheon Corporate Chairman Marc Hruschka
NYCB dancers Tiler Peck
Mannequins modeling NYCB costumes
NYCB dancer Joaquin De Luz
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Late night scene at Nicolas Berggruen's annual party at Chateau Marmont.
soon-to-be-
Leviev models
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Guests at UJA-Federation of New York’s signature Generosity event at the Puck Building.
Dancers performing on stage at Evidence's "Grace in Winter"
Top row: David Baron
Will Bressman. Bottom row: Jeffrey Mazur
Top row: Shanna Weinberg
Alexandra Weiss. Bottom row: Jeffrey Mazur
The Chamber Music Society of Lincoln Center
La Maison du Chocolat chocolates
friends
ludwig Austner
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Medora's tutu from Le Corsaire
on display at a cocktail reception for the artists of ABT at the home of Emilia Fanjul Pfeifler.
friend
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at the Opening of the Broad Contemporary Art Museum at LACMA.
Champagne for the hundreds of "cool" attendees.
friend
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
At The Young New Yorkers for the Philharmonic's "A Mid-Winter's Eve": Phoebe Booth
friend.
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at Marc Jacob's after party.
Marc Jacobs with Rachel Zoe ...
together again
Another interpretation
Click above to order Drawing Fashion: The Art of Kenneth Paul Block.
hawing
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Bill Cunningham having a good laugh
Herb Sambol with a friend
Abbey Muneer of Liberty News
Roberta Fabiano of the Peter Duchin Orchestra
Mercedes Bass talking to Charlie Rose
Oscar de la Renta
friend
Tiki Barber with Adam D. Breier Grace Garofolo
Crown Hall's library set for the dinner for special guests
Hubbard Street Dancers before performing B-Sides by Brian Enos
Dean of the IIT School of Architecture
with her son
his father
David Vitale with Gordon Segal
artistic director of Hubbard Street Dance
with Lewis Collens
past of IIT
head of the Mies Society with Adrienne Booth
the pillow guests sat on for the IIT/Hubbard Street performance
Brian Fuller with his wife
Hubbard Street dancer
Kathleen McCreary with Douglas Walter
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
dancers on the Ballroom floor
Ballet dancers at the Viennese Opera Ball
Austria's UN Gerhard Pfanzelter
Choreographer Kerenza on the Horse drawn carriage
Marge Champion with Manuel Rojas
Princess Sarah Zeid with husband H.R.H. Prince Zeid Ra'ad
Deb sisters Alexa
Coco Haas with the West Point Cadets
Procession of the VOB 2008 debutantes
escorts
co-hosts of VOB 2008
Singers from The Met Opera perform on the Ballroom floor
Presentation of the Debs of VOB 2008
VOB Ballroom atmosphere
Executive Director of VOB Heinz Heidenreich
Portuguese to UN Joao Salgueiro with UN Gerhard Pfanzelter
911 fireman hero Jay Jonas
dad of VOB debs Julia
VOB 2008 Deb's dance
friends
friend
friend
Let the party begin ...
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at the Chelsea Art Museum for a White Gold Winter party.
Mercedes Bass with friends
Ann Ryan with the Monte Hacketts
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Suzanne Rheinstein at Hollyhock in West Hollywood welcomed some of the Los Angeles design community’s most interesting personalities to a book-signing party for Margaret Russell’s new Elle Décor book
L. to r.: Gillian Miniter
L. to r.: Gillian Miniter
Friends of
supporters of
Margaret Russell signing away
Ruthie Sommers with daughter Eloise
her
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Honoree John J. Mack with LC Chairman Frank A. Benack
American Songbook supporters Maury
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The dinner scene at the 2008 Frederic E. Church Award dinner to benefit the Olana Partnership.
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Taking bows at the opening night of Broadway's THE LITTLE MERMAID.
friend
friend
Edible Cuban cigars
Limited edition S T Dupont created for Nat Sherman Lighter
Former schoolmates Brooke Shields
Joel Sherman lights up Carl Banks
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The scene at Robert Rauschenberg's RUNTS Opening Reception.
Heather Palmer with a friend
Friends of Kaufman Center Orchestra
Post-concert crowd in Merkin Concert Hall Lobby
Noelle ike
Kaufman Center exterior
Face the Music Ensemble
sAmanda Ross
friend
Saying their farewells ...
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Central Park Conservancy Women's Committee hosted its annual Skating Party in Wollman Rink.
Skaters warmign up
friends
friend
Rocky Aoki pounding the sake drum
Steven Hall with Vivian
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Esquire magazine's Official New Year's Eve party at Cipriani 55 Wall St.
the Honorable Judy
Jared Lewis at New York’s Hospital for Special Surgery's gala dinner.
physician-in-chief at New York City’s Hospital for Special Surgery
Clockwise from above: Charles N. “Chip” Cornell
surgeon-in-chief
L. to r.: Chris March
Michael Kowalski addresses the gathering
Federal Hall National Memorial lights up Wall Street for the New York Harbor Conservancy Holiday Benefit Gala
the Tiffany &amp
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Paul Newman at Historic Hudson Valley's gala dinner dance.
William vanden Heuvel
HHV trustee William Plunkett
HHV trustee Robert DeLaMater
HHV trustee Jan Adelson
HHV trustee Charles Rockefeller
HHV trustee Mark Rockefeller
Melinda vanden Heuvel
William vanden Heuvel
HHV trustee Barbara Israel
Auction items
bidders
Dana Esposito with Nathaniel Pearson
her celebrity Fire Fighter husband
Beneficiaries of New York Police &amp
Fire Widow's &amp
Children's Benefit Fund
Rita Williams with fellow beneficiaries of New York Police &amp
Fire Widow's &amp
Children's Benefit Fund
Rita Williams with friends
family
l. to r.: Tangie Murray
friend. Standing
l. to r.: Porschla Coleman
friend
widow of NYPD Detective Keith Williams
widow of NYFD Lieutenant John Bellew
Brouillard Communications team
FDNY bagpipers
The dinner scene in Gotham Hall
students
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Orpheus Chamber Orchestra at The Russian Tea Room
Orpheus Chamber Orchestra at Carnegie Hall
Vice-Chairman of Spencer Stuart
Chairman of the Board
Young Orpheus members
all commissioned by Orpheus as part of the New Brandenburgs project
Chairman of the Board
Consul of the Federal Republic of Germany
pianist
composer
Emily Israel with Madison Dancers doing their thing
Jayne Harkness with daughter Nicole
Publicolor staff
volunteers
Publicolor Founder &amp
Alex Shuman with son Nathaniel Shuman
On Line w/ Toy Donation
The scene inside
Amber Ray with a couple costumers
fans
Not a tiny dancer
Party gals
David Barton with Monti
Performence Artist Fabu flanked by a couple of partyers
Suzanne Bartsch with a couple revelers
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Alvin Ailey American Dance Theater stars at its Opening Night Gala performance.
Table Decor by David Watkins
his fiance
AAADTs Willy Laury with Ebony Haswell
AAADT's Hope Boykin
Judith Jamison with Dancers of AAADT
Alicia J. Graf in Badgley Mischka's Platinum designs
Rene Robinson in Badgley Mischka's Platinum designs
Janie Eisenberg with members of the Hilton wait staff who raised $1
400 among themselves to donate to the Newfield Professorship
Event co-chair William Lynch
master of ceremonies Kenneth Knuckles
his wife
latia Bradley
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Jessie Montgomery with Third Street students
friends
supporters.
Third Street students.
Steinway &amp
Sons' staff.
Edmée Firth with Paul Kellogg
friends
UBS reps
Frank Minerva with Third Street students
friend
In the art-filled McCausland-Seve drawing room to celebrate the upcoming exhibition of the extraordinary jeweled creations of the late Theo Faberge
his daughter Sarah for the St. Petersburg Collection to benefit The Nutrir Foundation.
In addition to the Fabergé family works of art for sale
a unique cookbook created by Violy’s sister Patricia McCausland
was also offered for purchase with all proceeds going to the foundation.
sister Patricia McCausland Gallo
Concert pianist Roberto McCausland
Egg of the Covenant created for Israel's birthday
The Buddleia Egg by Theo Faberge
The Poppy Egg by Theo Faberge
The Victory Egg by Theo Faberge
Peterhof Egg depicting the opulent parks of Peterhof
Ryan Rafferty sings
The Menu for the Big Apple Circus Cocktail Party created by Canard
- On The Bar - • Puff Pastry Parmesan Cheese Straws • Parmesan Tuilles with Caesar Salad • Smoked Salmon
Caviar on Buckwheat Waffles • Prosciutto Waffle with Roasted Fig
Stilton Confit • Savory Cranberry Star • Crab Cakes with Orange Rèmoulade • Croque-Monsieur • Mini Tacos: - Ahi Tuna with Cilantro Cream
Chive - Roast Duck with Mango~Onion Salsa
Cracklings - Beef with Cheddar
- Peking Duck Table - • Chinese Chef carving classic Peking Ducks onto Pancakes with slivered Cucumber
Saffron Basmati Rice with Sambal Goreng Kering Tofu • Skewered Lamb with Kaffer Lime • Chicken in Coconut Milk • Shrimp with Mango • Green Papaya Salad • Pickled Vegetables • Peanut Sauce
Crispy Shallots - Sweets - • Holiday Parfaits • Fresh Berry Tartlets • Banana Strudels • Chocolate Petit Fours • Cashew Praline Bars • Toffee Pecan Brownies • Mini S'mores • Fruit Jellies • Decorated Holiday Cookies
Mary Jane Brock with Susanna
Princess Alexandra of Greece
Allure's Marie Jones
Nora Ephron with Noah Baumbach
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Aaron Jay Kernis on hand to join in the applause for Thomas Kraines
Michael Boriskin as Copland House celebrated the Italian Futurists.
composer Aaron Jay Kernis
pianist Michael Boriskin
NPR Performance Today radio host Fred Child
James Babcock. Back row: Gary L'Hommedieu
Peter Ezersky with Matthe
Dellis Cay island
Interior of Piero Lissoni beach villa
Piero Lissoni beach villa
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
friend
friend
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Tracy Pollan with the Co-Chairs of "A Funny Thing Happened on the Way to Cure Parkinson’s."
Illustration of truffle hunter attire
the truffle hunter
with Laura Maioglio Blobel’s truffle hunting canine friends
Spode truffle dog plates
just for the occasion
Italian Consul Francesco Talò with his wife Ornella
Chairman of Save Venice
Bob Guthrie smelling the truffle aroma
Mel Oldenburg with Günter Blobel
Jennifer Guthrie with her sister Mary Kathryn Navab
More truffles ...
The Duchess of Marlborough
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Bryn Terfel with ensemble at The Collegiate Chorale's Gala Benefit at Carnegie Hall.
Performers with ensemble
Dinner in the Rohatyn Room
The dinner scene at Pier Sixty
The gang from Phillips-Van Heusen
family
The Karpf sisters with Vicki Modell
The scene
The Museum of Arts &amp
Design's Visionaries! Awards gala benefit
Dan off
honorees Najda Swarovski
honorees Frank Doroff
Byrganym Aitimova of the Permanent Mission of the Republic of Kazakhstan to the United Nations
Gov. George Pataki of Chadbourne &amp
of the 62nd session of the United Nations Assembly
H.E. Srgjan Kerim with Gov. George Pataki
her husband Frank Cappelleri with Amy Holden
Managing Partner of Chadbourne &amp
Israeli dignitaries
American dignitaries at Tribute to Jan Karski.
Banner over consulate in Tribute to Jan Karski
Chief Rabbi of Israel Meir Lau
Consul of Poland Krzysztof Kasprzyk
Cantor Joseph Malovany with dignitaries
Bernice &amp
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The 13th Annual Artwalk Benefiting New York's Coalition for The Homeless.
friend
L. to r.: Chantal McLaughlin
L. to r.: Chantal McLaughlin
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
producer Paul Parmar
producer Michael Cerenzie
THINKFilm's Mark Urman
Gail Monaghan signing books
greeting guests
“I take the week off from the UN when Batsheva comes to New York. Batsheva is the pinnacle of beauty
excellence
they are the real s of Israel
” Dan Gillerman said before he introduced Executive Director Naomi Bloch Fortis who announced that Batsheva will be back in New York with Ohad Naharin’s “Kamuyot” at the Jewish Community Center on Amsterdam Avenue in March 2008.
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
daughter Lindsay
Consul of France in New York
The Duchess of Marlborough
The Duchess of Marlborough
Angela Lansbury with her twin brothers
"Wings" star David Schramm presents the John Houseman Award to Edgar Lansbury
TONY winner Marian Seldes
music moguls
theater moguls Clive Davis
Acting Company Board Member Joan Feick with Spyros Skouras
Bernadette Peters sang for Honorees Edgar Lansbury
Gerry Schoenfeld with Pulitzer-Prize winning playwright Frank Gilroy
Princess Alexandra of Greece
Harrison Graham with Pamela Thomas-Graham
Calliste with George Skouras
The Ballroom at The Pierre.
JTS Board of Trustees member Harold Jacobsohn with his wife Beatriz
Friends from Philadelphia: Rabbi David Ackerman
Chancellor Arnold Eisen presents the Neubauers with the Louis Marshall Award
chairman of the JTS Board of Trustees
chairman emeritus
Louis Marshall honorees
Chancellor of JTS
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Teen volunteers at New Yorkers For Children's 5th Annual "Wrap to Rap."
Coralie Charriol Paul with a Teen Volunteer
Teen Volunteers doing karaoke with Spotlight Live
L. to r.: Eric Olson
Fred. Toby was named “Dog of the Year;” both Toby
Fred belong to Debbie Parkhurst of North East
Toby saved Debbie’s life by performing a version of the Heimlich maneuver.
Chairs/Honorary Chairs of the ASPCA Humane Awards Luncheon Committee Cynthia Lufkin
Robin Duke surrounded by International Rescue Committee team
Joel Marcus w/wife Barbara
friend
Robert Grossman of NYU Medical Center
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Sandra's suite of books
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
In the Milstein Hall of Ocean Life for The American Museum of Natural History's annual Museum Gala.
Cindy Gallop during the auction
auctioneer C. Hugh Hildesdley
Tom Harvey with Ellen V. Futter
Donna Dixon during the auction
HCC staff: Ed Haran
Janet Cahill at podium
with Rebecca Campbell
David Sloan of ABC
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Artistic Director Francisco Núñez leading The Young People's Chorus of NYC at a sold-out Carnegie Hall.
Three-sheet poster announces 10th anniversary Carnegie Hall concert of the Young People's Chorus of New York City.
Kendra from American Idol
Benefit co-chairs Nancy Bloom
the Young People's Chorus of NYC sing "High Hopes"
his wife Ann with benefit co-chair Suzan Kremer
Francisco J. Nunez poses with YPC founding trustees George Nemeth
Ethan Hawke reading Little Red Riding Hood to Cubs
Sisterhood of the Traveling Pants author
daughter
children
Cubs co-chair Gretchen Rubin
Little Red Riding Hood with Cubs
In the Map Division
Trent Steele with model of FoundCare Community Health Center now under construction in West Palm Beach
Donna Mulholland with Lawford's book "Symptoms of Withdrawal"
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Patricia Kennedy at the Career Transition for Dancer's annual gala.
Dinner chairs Southampton.s Janice
her jeweler Laurence Krashes
Sue Rosenberg Zalk honorees
of Baruch College
Oxygen Media of Programming
of Queensborough Community College
anchor of WABC's Eyewitness News
Britni Lindsay of Figure Skating in Harlem
Judge Maria Lopez with Urban Heroes
Asmaou Diallo of Global Action Project with family
wife Joan with volunteer
Corporate honoree
founder partner
senior partner of Donovan &amp
Event emcee
of WABC's Eyewitness News
Judge Lopez with Elizabeth De La Cruz from Added Value &amp
Sade Baderinwa with Michael Wayne of Free Arts
L. to r.: Alex
L. to r.: Alex
Jamee Gregory with Charles Hickox
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dancing in the Grand Ballroom of the Waldorf=Astoria for Lenox Hill Hospital's Autumn Ball 2007.
Lenox Hill Hospital's first annual dinner at the original Waldorf Astoria where the Empire State Building now stands.
and John Won
and Rogers
wife Gudrun
The dynamic Lenox Hill Hospital Autumn Ball Team
Clockwise from top left: Janice Reals Ellig with a friend
family
Los luchadores in action
Model Ling Tan with designer Zang Toi
Jana Pasquel with fiancé Adam Shapiro
Clockwise from above left: The Angel Orensanz Foundation
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Clockwise from top left: Yansi Fugel
Marissa McFarker with Elizabeth Meyer
a friend
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The gang at Steiner Studios for a benefit for The Auditory Oral School of New York.
Anna Bergman belts it out
Ron Raines sings to Patricia Neal
Greta Blackburn arrives with Michael Crecco
Screenwriter Budd Schulberg with wife Betsy
Shirl Penney receives award from Joe Mara
Nat Sherman cigarette girls
HSNY GreenTeam speaker Myrna Davis
Marja Samson with Chibi
Heather Randall with the girls
NYCC staff
Bowling anyone?
Making an entrance ...
Bowling enthusiasts
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Evie Lyon with the Douglasses
the Hortons
the Davidsons at Bob Hardwick's 30th anniversary celebration.
the Biggs
friend
Bob's newly created Group Carte Blanche
Tina McPherson with the Limbockers
her fiancee
the Irwins
Bob with the Hiltons
Bob with the Dodges
The Rumbougha with Abam Claude
friends
Bob with the Burkes
friend
friend
Carol Kurzig present the Women's Empowerment Crusader award to Rhonda Henderson with support from Dianna Ashmore
Members of the "Vintage Division" of Mississippi
winners of a special Imari Seduction division incentive contest join Andrea Jung
Carol Kurzig present the Community Advocate Award to Yolanda Jimenez
Carol Kurzig present the Medical Advancement in Breast Cancer Award to the Capital Breast Care Center
accepted by Peter G. Shields
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
director James Gray
director James Gray
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
L. to r.: Tim
L. to r.: Tim
friend
The New York City Opera group
Pretty princesses
family
Peter Pan gets help with his costume
Magician Al Garber’s show
Watching the magic show
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Orpheus Chamber Orchestra celebrated the Opening Night of its 2007-08 Carnegie Hall season.
Young Orpheus members
A happy afternoon at Dogs in the Garden
Event Chair Cornelia Guest with a few of her many dogs
Cornelia Guest's dog
The late Peggie Phipps Boegner's beloved Tilly
The Davison family enjoying High Tea
A quiet moment for Godfrey the basset
A fireman's holiday
Humane Society of New York's "Willis" waiting
L. to r.: Celerie Kemble
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Students from Brooklyn’s PS 97 opened the ceremonies performing “Give My Regards to Broadway.”
Cast members of Broadway’s “Three Mo’ Tenors” performed highlights from the show: Kenneth D. Alston
Karen Ziemba presenting a Broadway Beacon award to Bebe Neuwirth
Bebe Neuwirth accepting the award
A.R. Gurney presented the Broadway Beacon award to Rebecca Luker
his wife Rebecca Luker accepting the award
New York City Council member David Weprin
The Tung family: William Tung with his son William Jr.
wife Ellen
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
David Taylor for Agostino Antiques.
Thomas Burak for Scandia Down.
Thom Filicia for The Urban Electric Co.
The panel headed by Dominique Browning
her
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Tarot Cards at The Central Park Conservancy 's annual Halloween dinner dance.
Megan Cassidy as 'Jessica Rabbit'
Matthew Feig as 'Roger Rabbit'
Costume winner Brett Graham as 'The Chick Magnet'
The Dance floor
Chicago by Jonathan Chair
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
friend
Carmen dell'Orifice
Pam Schafler with friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
friend
Princess Alexandra of Greece
friend
Princess Alexandra of Greece
Princess Alexandra of Greece
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Co-chair Cass Adelman with Jasper
Co-chair Alexandra Scott
family
Co-chair Catherine Shepard
family
family
son
son
The Pappas family
friends
HRH Prince Talal bin Muhammad
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Top row
l. to r.: Co-chairs Lisamaria Falcone
Kelly Mallon. Bottom row
l. to r.: Amy Krause
daughter
Honorary chair Meera Gandhi with son Kabir
Stiltwalker welcomes guests
Catherine Sidamon-Eristoff with daughters
Joan Rex with children
friends
A Touch of Nature
Tracy Stern with children
Vice-chair Gillian Miniter with daughter Serena
founder of Divalysscious Moms
with son
friends
Microscope mania
High School Musical performer Olesya Rulin
Stiltwalker greets the arrivals
Vice-chair BJ Blum with daughter Isabel
Vice-chair Lira Lee with husband Jon Cohen
children
Olesya Rulin signs autographs for fans
Chris Davis with daughter Katie
friends
Space walk
Broadway Babies performs for crowd
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
friends
Princess Fiametta d'Arenberg
friend
Kim Won-soo
friends
Fiametta d'Arenberg
Wyclef Jean performing
Manager of VH1 Tom Calderon
Save the Music founder John Sykes
Jamie Landis receiving golf instruction
and Hlilary and
I love chess
little Max
Mick Hazen on the Bosu Ball
Patrick Stubgen with Maria Bell
friend
Clinton in high spirits during the auction action.
Clinton examining the Clinton Foundation Equation of Time
George-Henri Meylan with Clinton
Francois Henry Bennahmias listening to Clinton discussing the Clinton Global Initiative
Alice Riese Rolley with Clinton
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
friend
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Dinner at the Boys' Club Fall Dance at Cipriani 42nd Street.
Si Anthony with Boys' Club boys
Cosby George on the dance floor
Monique Merrill welcomes guests
From the back
Fall Dance scene
Adriana Pidwerbetsky with a friend
Tarot card readings
Salman Rushdie with a friend
worldwide leader of Bon Monastery
with Shelley Rubin
Co-founder
Monks play Tibetan longhorns to herald the beginning of the awards presentation
Moushumi Khan accepting RMA Mandala Award on behalf of Muhammad Yunus
Staircase at the Rubin Museum of Art
conversation
Actress Liv Ullman enjoying dinner in the RMA galleries with guests
CTFD executive director Alex Dube
Patricia Kennedy with Alberto Milane
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Princess Alexandra of Greece
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Steven Stolman with his Caviar Birthday Cake
Liz Callaway belting out a ballad
lle Ferrazzano
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
friend
friend
friend
friend
Damon Johson with Doug Dechert
friend
friend
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
From Evelyn Lauder's Flowers exhibition
friend
friends
friends
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Josh David at High Line Chef's Dinner Benefiting Friends of the High Line.
From Steven Gregory's "Bone Stone Bronze"
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
At Geoffrey Bradfield's "30th year in America" celebration.
Clockwise from left: Native American-dressed security at the door
friend
friend surrounded
friend
Geoffrey poses with guests
Ingrid with Geoffrey Bradfield
home of the New York Philharmonic
Post-concert Gala dinner
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
wife
New Yorker's For Children
B. Michael meets
greets
Lauren Davis listens intently
Mark Ecko with his wife
friend
Peter Lyden with Nancy Ellison
blinded by the light
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The Lung Cancer Research Foundation's 2nd Annual Strides for Life.
Fred George in front of the phtoto he took on September 12
Louise Mirrer addressing the crowd
Children's 50-yard dash
Laurie Carson with The Kotin Family’s winning team “Pop’s Pals”
Southampton ladies
Kayce Jennings with “PJ’s Team” in memory of Peter Jennings
Women’s Winner Tara Farrell
LCRF Board of Directors
Post race rest
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The finale from Van Cleef's “Une Journée à Paris.”
friend
Lido cabaret
The Plastiscines on stage
friends
The creative team
Jock Soto in the kitchen
Megan leCrone
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
friend
Princess Alexandra with her two sons
friend
Agassi with the Gastineau girls
The fifth anniversary “Alice In Wonderland” themed celebration of Alice &amp
Olivia by Designer Stacey Bendet
held at her Bryant Park Shoppe.
Stacey Bendet with an Alice &amp
Olivia model
Marcus leatherdale
friend
with a little help foAmanda Lepore
staged their latest “Star-Spangled-Smiles” Collection.
Carmen Elecktra at tents
Edith wears Marc Bouwer Vintage
Fashionistas here
there
everywhere
Village Voice representing
/Richie Rich at the tents
Patrick MacDonald at the tents
More from Mao Fashion Week's launch party.
23-year-old Indashio revealing his best collection to benefit the wonderful ”Make A Wish Foundation.”
From Y &amp
Kei’s “Urban-Hippie” Collection.
friends
friends
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Bill Frist with wife Karyn
friend
of
of Save the Children
Ginger Pennington wearing Style Paris by Susan Sutherland
In the Courtyard on Jobs Lane
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Backstage at Ralph Lauren's 40th anniversary celebration.
models
friend
Models with Zac Posen
DHL's Tote for Teachers
his high school English Lit teacher Jane Avrich
L. to r.: Michael Kors with Jessica Simpson
Michael Kors Backstage with models
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
Andy Valmorbida front row at "Warhol Factory X LEVI'S X Damien Hirst" Spring 2008 Collection at Gagosian Gallery.
Clockwise from top left.: Paul Solberg
Antony Genn of The Hours
The Hours on stage
The full-blown scene
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
John Legend at the M Missoni fashion show at W Hotel Hamptons Hideaway
Ralph Destino Jr. at the W Hotel Hamptons Hideaway
Joanne de Guardiola at Joanne’s home in Southampton
Alexandra Lind Rose at Joanne de Guardiola’s home in Southampton
Andrew Borrok at the launch of Bracco Wines Rose
Newly engaged Jeffrey Bradford
Alan Lieberman at Andrew Borrok’s estate in Watermill
Jackie Rogers outside of her East Hampton Boutique prepares for her fashion week show
Michele Gerber Klein at Maggie trunk show at the Gail Rothwell Boutique in East Hampton
Jill Zarin at Maggie Norris’s trunk show
Ken Wolfe were the VIP caterers at the Hamptons Classic
Robbins Wolfe Eventeurs created this horse centerpiece for the Hampton Classic
Carnegie member Kelly Lambreses tries on an $800
000 pink
blue sapphire necklace
Guests perusing the Graff jewels in the case at the exclusive Carnegie Abbey Club near Newport
Linda Howard models a golden pearl necklace valued at $340
000 shown by Sidney Daniels of Graff Diamonds
Owner of Carnegie Abbey
party host Brian O’Neill with Barbara Rackoff
Karen Schulze with Tooni MacDonald
A sea of jewelry lovers
Jazz trio serenades the guests
Click here for NYSD Contents
Click here for NYSD Contents
The King of Morocco
S.A.R. Mohammed VI holding the Crown Prince Moulay Al Hassan
his wife Princess Lalla Salma holding their daughter Princess Lalla Khadija
the king's brother Prince Moulay Al Rachid
the King's three sisters.
Gran cafe de Paris where Bourne Ultimatum was filmed.
View of Tangier
its beachfront on the Mediterranean
Barbara Franzheim at Dar Zero dinner
Eric Pillon at his circus party
The host front
center with Barbara Franzheim
Digital at Work: Carlos Mundy center
Eric Jansen of Pont de Vue with the Body Builders
The hosts: Henry
Vincent Coppee with Charles Sevigney at Sidi Hosni
The Party guests
The party before dinner
Gala dinner under the tent ...
... The meal
Annette de la Renta
L. to r.: Marina Rust Connor
Dylan Lauren with Aerin Lauder Zinterhofer
Clockwise from above: Ramy Sharp
Hampton’s Trunk Show
Sam Neuman with a friend
friend
Author Luncheon at Southampton Inn for Rogers Library Foundation
William deLampert
Alex de Lesseps with Marcia Mishaan
Dancing up a storm
L. to r.: Larry
L. to r.: Louise
The finale of the Service Club of Chicago’s “Day on the Terrace.”
Enlisted soldiers
L. to r.: Boykin Curry
Under the tent
Tahari’s East Hampton store opening to benefit New Yorkers for Children.
Chanel models with Elizabeth Park
Top row: Lisa Licht
Nancy Lascher. Bottom row: Jodi Sussman
kiddies at the petting zoo.
Hillary Leibowitz with her daughter
Watermelon eating contest
son with Christie Brinkley
family
Hula Hoop contest
The ballpit
Petting zoo
On the Elephant ride
Oscar de la Renta adjusting to a cabin air-conditioned to the point of refrigeration
Man's best friend
Oscar on
off the boat
Oscar with Eliza Reed Bolen
Many of the guests arrived
departed in Jon Gibb's boat
FIT Museum Director Valerie Steele with Couture Council Chairs Liz Peek
Marilyn Megargel in Bill Blass
friends
Heather Mnuchin with her daughter
Under the tent at The Summer Party to benefit Southampton Hospital.
Julie Kammer with Kristi Witker
Diane de la Begassiere
friend
Danielle deMarne
L. to r.: Kita Huynh
Sterling McBride tossing out the first ball at the 2007 Mashomack International Polo Challenge
The Berluti team: Parker Thorne Player
The Sotheby’s Best Playing Pony with Felix Martrez
Phillip McTaget with his daughter
wife
Audrey Bernard with a friend
members of Evidence
The scene at the Frederick P. Rose Hall
of Movado
CFDA's new members of 2007
Hampton sunset
the Crawfords
The living room
Spectators at Fitch's Corners Horse Trials in Milbrook.
Peter Duggin with Fernanda Kellogg
A view from the back
Julie Bucklin in a chicken hat
his daughter
The ribbon holder
Making new friends
J. Ira Harris with Laurie Miller Brotman
The designers for The 2007 Hampton Designer Showhouse
The showhouse from the back
friends
Seal the Deal committee members Rhonda Clinton
and Alan
Carl del Paro
Pilar Visconti with The God Coast Caterer
Frankie de la Barre
Frankie de la Barre
Katrina vanden Heuvel
a Great Horned Owl
Carl Andreas van der Goltz
Millennial Society's Amanda Lullo
Leslie Steinberg at the 4th Annual Hamptons Happening for the Samuel Waxman Cancer Research Foundation.
Fireworks under the clear-top tent
Howard P. Milstein with his parents
Guests enjoyed cocktails on the veranda of Washington Irving's Sunnyside homestead
Charles Rockefeller with Courtney Lorenz
chairman of the board of trustees of Historic Hudson Valley
L. to r.: Annabelle Dexter Jones
William Egan with Elizabeth Brooke Blake
friends
A dinner at Grey Gardens to honor Wayne Pacelle
of the Humane Society.
The Beals with Cindy Cook
L. to r.: Jackie Rodgers
Oliver Hirsch found his way to a happy home through ARF. He
JH met seven years ago when he was about three years old.
L. to r.: Samantha Haas
Cody with Joan Tobin
The Award for Creativity
whippets
Pillow staff member Mora Cantlin displays the $12
500 necklace up for auction later that night
The Pillow videography crew: Nel Shelby
Clockwise from left: Liz McCullough
Jamie McCullough from afar
up close
his Annie-B Parson
one of the winners of the Award for Creativity
co-director of Big Dance Theater.
Diamond Committee Co-chair Adrienne Vittadini
Bill Irwin after the performance
Auctioneer Stephanie Landess of Christie’s USA
auction spotter
The Boys &amp
Girls Choir of Harlem Alumni Ensemble perform
Honoree Valesca Guerrand-Hermès with her award
her daughter Eulala
Modeling DVF's latest
friends
L. to r.: Stewart F. Lane
L. to r: Debbie Bancroft
L. to r.: Jane
L. to r.: Sarah Gavlak
Foundation Members during Live Auction
friend
Shinnecock Tribe exhibition
Shinnecock Tibe mural
Drive Against Prostate Cancer mobile screening unit
actor Jonny Pasvolsky
Archlight's founder Victor Syrmis
co-writer MacBeth
MacBeth producer Martin Fabriniy.
her Diana Hill
The huge crowd at Soho Synagogue's Miracle at Ground Zero
Princess Caroline of Monaco
Prince Ernst of Hanover
The scene at the Rare Time Club at the Timeo Hotel during the Taormina Film Fest.
Principal of Frederick Douglass Academy II
Scholarship recipients
Senator Evan Bayh of Indiana
Revelers enjoy the party
Dinner at the Rose Ball
The almost completed Visitor &amp
friend
L. to r.: Stephanie Chassing
friend
friends
Shia LaBeouf with a friend
Dinner is served
Benny Shabtai with his daughter Nicole
Curtis Sliwa with the Olszewski sisters
Prince Dimitri of Yugoslavia
Margo van den Bosch
Charlie Chaplin with wife Oona O'Neill at their first public appearance at the Mocambo
1943. Image courtesy MPTV.net
L. to r.: David Cabo
Click to order
Waiters in J. Crew
Shannon Smith with her father
her son
his wife Kathy Ferguson
Alzheimer’s Association
Executive Director of the NFL Players Association
wife of former NFL player Ralph Wenzel
wife of Pro Football Hall of Fame player John Mackey
of
of the Alzheimer’s Association
“Forget-Me-Not” gala Chairs
Counsel for the NFL Management Council
accepting “Community Leadership Award” on behalf of Harold R. Henderson
NFL Executive Vice for Labor Relations
Chairman of the NFL Management Council Executive Committee.
Chefs at
farmers at
Pickled Georgia White Shrimp with Summer Vegetable Salad served by Chefs Anne Quatrano &amp
Clifford Harrison of Bacchanalia in Atlanta
Charlie Palmer of Aureole in New York
Drew Nieporent with Chefs Mark Gaier
Clark Frasier of Arrows Restaurant in Ogunquit
Chef Charlie Palmer of Aureole in New York
Chef Alice Waters of Chez Panisse in Berkeley
Chef Jonathan Waxman of Barbuto in New York
Chef Joachim Splichal of Patina Restaurant Group in Los Angeles
Chef Jawn Chasteen of The Sea Grill in New York
Executive Director of Citymeals-on-Wheels
Co-founder &amp
Chair of Citymeals-on-Wheels
Patick O'Meara with Bonnie Strauss
Maz Gomez with daughter Katie
of Southampton Hospital
Mary Snow with friends
The dinner table
Anait Bian with friends
models
Donald Rubin with Sam Botero
Verdura’s Ward
L. to r.: Heather Mnuchin
wife Sue arrive
“Evening” stars Claire Danes
Mamie Gummer backstage
Chairman of NIFF Brendan Kelley chats with Carrie Townsend
Kathy Staab with film director Lajos Voltai
actor Jason Isaacs
The red carpet rolled across historic Washington Square
Greer Beecroft with filmmaker Leah Pines
producer Jill Footlick
writer Michael Cunningham
filmmaker Tricia Regan
his grand
designer Eileen Marcuvitz
guy Van Pelt
The hottest ticket in Newport
friends
Carole Hochman receiving the Zero Tolerance Award from her daughter
VIP Cafe host Jean-Georges
The Promenade of the New York State Theater for "Dance with the Dancers Lost in Translation: Tokyo-oke 2007."
friend
Bartender pouring Zen Green Tea cocktails
Arthur Elgort takes in the dancers skit
Georgina Pazcoguin as part of the dancers' skit
Sterling Hyltin with the designer
daughter
Tina Brown's daughter
friends
snd Hendrik Hertzberg
daughter
Grace dos Santos
Party scene
Jill Flint an Drew Conrad
Doreen Remen with a friend
Joan’s Legacy Executive Director
Henry Freedman assemble
decorate their kites
his son
Volunteers from Southampton High School
her daughter
mom
Andrew x 2
break dancing
Tending bar
an dAlexis Bryan
YMCA of Greater New York
Jamaica YMCA youth member
Martha Plimpton with friends
The DeVilleneuve family
friend
Dancing at a celebration for Wynn Handman
the 45th anniversary of The American Place Theatre.
Wynn's Birthday Card
wife Marianne Leone
Wynn Handman with daughters Liza
friend
J Mendel on the runway
daughter Allegra
Boys will be boys
Face painter with kids
children
"Midsummer Dream" at the Southampton beach house of Janna Bullock.
Janna Bullock with the Keno brothers
Dancing on the beach
Christine Alfaro &amp
Page Morton Black on video screen
Margo Catsimatidis with Lewis Rowland
Dinner scene at American Ballet Theatre's 67th annual Spring Gala
Lewis Ranieri with Nora James Orphanides
Blaine Trump with Maxim Beloserkovsky
Duchess of York
L. to r.: Tara Rockefeller
David Koch with Deborah Norville
Taking it all in
Heidi Rosenau swing dancing
Robert Becker III with Galen Lee
their Artwork
her
ADC Staff Member presents gift bags
Samuel L. Jackson Silent Auction Package donated by Samuel L. Jackson
Silent Auction Mets Package donated by Shawn Morrissey
friend
his wife with Kathryn Chenault
Tai Foster with a friend
E. L. ow
The speakers for The Library of America's 25th anniversary gala program at the Morgan Library
E. L. ow
E. L. ow
L. to r.: Tom Wolfe
Margo Jefferson speaks about Charles Chesnutt
The Library of America's 25th anniversary gala program at the Morgan Library
Museum featured Margo Jefferson
E. L. ow
Amy Sedaris with fellow Girl Scout
L. to r.: Nina McLemore
friend
guests
Girl Scout Council of Greater New York Dolores Swirin
Table by Murphy
Company Florist &amp
Table by Dennis Rolland
Table by Harry Heissmann
Table by Gay Hackett &amp
friend
Jumaane N'namdi
AFO programs
John Chamberlain entertains
Maija Garcia with Janet Wong
Scarlett Johnason by Cyrille Margarit
Cindy Jin in front of Mike Tyson painting by Cyrille Margarit
Katherine Rothman with Robert De Niro look alike Joe Manuella
La Goulue Restaurant’s Steven
friend
friends
Young supporters
The dinner scene
friend
Keeping things lively
J Mendel on the Runway
The Epstein family
L. to r.: Alice Tisch
Yigal Ozeri with friends
Preston Scott Cohen receiving Visionary Award from Morderchai Omer
Jamie Niven auctioning off a Donald Sultan
Lauren Schwartz with Michael A. Nachman
William vanden Heuvel
L. to r.: Amanda Hearst
L. to r.: Lenny Kravitz
L. to r.: Deborah Barrow
Alvin Singleton with Becky Starobin
Grand Prize winner Leslie Burr Howard
Second Place winner Eric Hasbrouck
The crowd
Florence Peyrelongue Guerra with Vanessa
girls on the fence
Carol Beller wins a prize
In Barry Cord prize earrings MC Roberts
friends
The luncheon
of Chopard
Isaac Mizrahi petting ASPCA dog
Honory Chair of the Tribeca Ball
Ali Larter in GUCCI
Ziyi Zhang in GUCCI
Ryan Vigilan at "Strike Out Colon Cancer"
Heatherette's Galen Drever
Yodit Teklemariam with a friend
Christina laTouche
Katherine deWerth
friend
The out-of-this-world dessert at AMNH's Corporate Dinner.
Opus 118 Harlem School of Music performing at dinner
Richard D. Parsons with his Distinguished Service to Science
Education Award presented by Ellen V. Futter
Chairman of the Museum's Board of Trustees Lewis Bernard
Rothschild with Ron Lauder
Bagpiper leads guests to dinner
his wife Jonine Bernstein celebrate with their daughter
Bernstein’s
friend
Rudy Giuliani presents the Rifkind Award to Randy Mastro
In Gray Foy's Salon celebrating the publication of The Grand Surprise: The Journals of Leo Lerman.
Click to order The Grand Surprise
Queen Rania of Jordan
L. to r.: Amy Greenspun
Katherine Oliver with jump ropers at Issey Mikaye
Wolford Window with Gillien Luckie
Dinner scene at the New York Pops 24th birthday celebration
James E.Gray with Macy's Great American Marching Band
Anika Noni Rose with the New York Pops Kids Jazz quartet
L. to r.: Felicia Taylor
L. to r.: Pamela Thomas-Graham
Lawrence OtisG raham
L. to r.: Candace Bushnell
L. to r.: Jackie Lyden
Runners at the start of the Thomas G. Labrecque Classic
son David
Click to order
John A. Gambling from WABC Radio
Jr. with Margot
Labrecque family with grandchildren
Former JPMChase colleagues of Thomas labrecque
his son
Tom labrecque
The Winners with Tom Labrecque
his daughter Mary
Miami Dophins star
friend
Connie Anne Phillips with friends
The dinner scene
Tom Quick with Hilary Geary Ross
The Central Park Conservancy opened The Peter Jay Sharp Children’s Glade
a newly designed area at the Great Hill in Central Park
Jon Heinemann with Hudson
Schuyler Hazard Cut the Ribbon
friend
Salisbury’s book signing in booth 3 at the Antique Garden Furniture Show tent
VP for Horticulture &amp
Todd Forrest at Salisbury’s Auricula Theater Ribbon Cutting Ceremony
associates
friend
Under the tent for the Hat Luncheon
Unveiling the Josie Robertson School of Music
Ed Rappa with Boys' Club rafflers
Women's Board of The Boy's Club of New York
Boys' Club of New York performers
View from the Allen Room
Dancing to the sound of Wyclef
Two players from the Women's Army Basketball Team
Women's Army Basketball Team
Kayce Freed Jennings with the Peter Jennings Prize winners
client speaker
Mark Phillips with Jennifer Gould Keil
The Kumble family
At the Food Allergy Initiative's 8th annual Spring Luncheon
the Knickerbocker Greys
Collins with Saatchi
of Didier Aaron
A full house at the LeFrak Imax Theater for The American Museum of Natural History's 17th annual Spring Environmental Lecture
Lunch in the Milstein Hall of Ocean Life
friend
Co-chairs Kathryn Hearst
Susan Rudin with friend
Anne Sidamon-Eristoff with husband Constantine
Meera Gandhi with friend
Jacques d'Amboise
Young ARTS teens
Real fitting a model for the show
friends
Preparing for the show
Walking down the runway in Serge &amp
Serge &amp
Real with models
Alice Netter with daughters Patricia Shiland
The Grand Ballroom at The Pierre
Post debs helped with the Live Auction: Julia Foster
Sophie l'Helias Delattre
Vicki Rideout drew the raffle
friend
Frederique von der Wal
Bernie Marcus toasting the guests
Top right: Nicole Miller
right: Rosemary Feitelberg
friends
owner of HGRP Gallery
Taka's daughter
Colette with friends
Cothes in window
Colette's closet
Colette's Apartment
Bambi de la Gueronniere
Bill Novelli with the 1897 manifest of his grandfather's arrival through Ellis Island
Secretary of the U.S. Department of the Interior Dirk Kempthorne
John J. Mack with the 1903 manifest of his grandfather's arrival through Ellis Island
Secretary of the U.S. Department of the Interior Dirk Kempthorne
Stephen A. Briganti with John J. Mack
the Mack family
Mistress of Ceremonies
Marilyn Dodds with brother Allan Dodds Frank
Peter Klestadt signs Wynn Handman's Birthday Card
Wynn Handman gets a hug from Olympia Dukakis
Cellphone cuisine
Vogue cover model Doutzen Kroes
L. to r.: Amy Smilovic
friend
Benjamin Moore executives
Publicolor kids
friend
Anita de la Rosa Berrizbeitia
Betsy Ennis with a friend
1952 New York City Archival pigment print on 100% rag paper 27" x 28"
Bill Berloni with Chico
The live auction
The gift bag
Lara getting ready in the bridal suite with a little help from with her
sister
The sister of the groom
Caroline Shaw with her daughter
her father
The groomsmen during the ceremony
Claude Shaw with the officant
Lisa Meiland reading at the ceremony
Exchanging the rings
The parents of the groom
Claude with his
The bride with Ware Sykes
Cocktail hour
The couple with the wedding party
Hors d'oeuvres
A wedding Portrait
Centerpieces during the cocktail hour
Clockwise from top left: of the bride making a toast
Claude making a toast
Claude's siblings giving a toast.
The place cards
The First Dance among wedding cake fireworks.
Greater New York Links Chapter Members at the 58th annual Easter luncheon
Patrick Kennedy making the rounds
Attah-jundwe Obiajulu
honoree Dionne Polite
honoree LaChanze
honoree Esther Silver Parker
A Noel Brogan model
honoree LaChanze
Noel Brogan models
her Myrah Brown-Green
Rev. Elaine Flake leads the luncheon in prayer
Consul from Barbados
Consul from Panama
Bob ans Suzanne Wright
Master of Ceremonies Tom Brokaw
Downtown at the Angel Orensanz Foundation
OATH hosted an evening benefiting the civilians of Darfur.
friend
her partner in crime
The table settings
Bobbi Brown with Dress For Success Honorees
Dave Reuter of Bentley Motors
friend
friend
Azure outside
Arnage outside
Under the Dinner Tent at East Side House Settlement’s Gala Preview of the 2007 New York International Auto Show.
Trying out the Lexus LS 600h for size
Clockwise from top left: Meg Wolitzer
L. to r.: Judith Miller
The malachite collection
Under the Dinner Tent at East Side House Settlement’s Gala Preview of the 2007 New York International Auto Show.
Trying out the Lexus LS 600h for size
Clockwise from top left: Meg Wolitzer
L. to r.: Judith Miller
The malachite collection
Hayground students
The great chefs
Student Chefs with Miche Bacher
Daniel Boulud with guest chefs at "Savoring Citymeals"
The Duke of Marlborough
The Duke of Marlborough
Chip Brady with his parents June
Moira Forbes Mumma with Allison Weiss Brady
Moira Forbes Mumma with Craig Millard during the wine auction
Kip Forbes with San Lee Park
Craig Millard with Moira Forbes Mumma in the background
Kip Forbes bidding during the live auction with Michele Millard seated next to him
friend
kids
child
foster children
Celebrity Kids from Dora the Explorer
Jeff Koons paints with children
Chairteens at Teen Effort's annual celebration
Nine Days' drummer banging it out
Award winners
friend
Princess Firyal of Jordan
Alexandra of Greece
friend
the McLaughlin Family
The Friends of New Yorkers For Children kicked off its April 19th dinner
dance at Emanuel Ungaro.
Clockwise from top left: Kimberly Pozner
A striker's pose
Lisa Watkinson with their children.
Hopeful Women of Achievement
Dancing up a storm
friend
friend
friends
friends
Itzhak Perlman with Chamber Musicians
Artistic Director of CMS Wu Han with Honoree Itzhak Perlman
Hjertonsson with Christina Lang Assael
Executive Director of CMS Norma Hurlburt
Dave Brubeck receiving his award
C-CAP founder Richard Grausman
Deborah Grausman with Metropolitan Opera performers
C-CAP student
Lidia Bastianich's birthday cake from Sarabeth's
C-CAP founder Richard Grausman
Chef grad
C-CAP grad Kelvin Fernandez
C-CAP students
Gift bags by Zabar's
Sitting for dinner at Lighthouse International's “Music of Winternight”
Performers at their best
Co-curator Nina Gray
Rob Florio with his guest Ellen
the Kids Kick In Committee at the kickoff for the SMSKCC's Bunny Hop
which takes place tomorrow.
Women modeling Graff Jewels
Director's Council Chairmen: Mark Gilbertson
"yum yum" Annabell Addison
friends
Angel Sanchez &amp
friend
Megan Fairchild at the Premiere Commission Gala Evening
Butch pops
his pops
friend
friend
friends
Charles Askegard in "A Waltzer in the House"
Bruce Springsteen toasts friends at the Breast Cancer Research Foundation's symposium
ad Mary Ellen Burke
Myra Biblowit and
friend
her Ladies in Waiting"
Lydia Prio touzet
Evidence A. Dance Company at the Grace in Winter Gala.
Neil R. Lowe with Betty Lamarr
Charles N. Atkins with Gayle Perkins Atkins
Evidence Board with the Dancers Reginald Van Lee
Alexis Clark in b. Michael
b. Michael
Taking in the dinner
friend
Katie Holmes with Graydon Carter
The red carpet waiters serving Taittinger
The ladies from Related
friends
friend
A masked reveler
Oscar Mora for Valentino
Eric Cohler Design &amp
Dylan Lauren next to her table
Dancing the night away
friends
Ernest de la Torre for Lladró
Council of Japan in New York
Isaac Mizrahi for S. Harris
